Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30,
2026, and June 30, 2027, appropriations are hereby made, restrictions and
limitations are hereby imposed, and transfers, capital improvement
projects, fees, receipts, disbursements and acts incidental to the foregoing
are hereby directed or authorized as provided in this act.
(b) The agencies named in this act are hereby authorized to initiate
and complete the capital improvement projects specified and authorized by
this act or for which appropriations are made by this act, subject to the
restrictions and limitations imposed by this act.
(c) This act shall not be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-
6702(a), and amendments thereto.
(d) The appropriations made by this act shall not be subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 46-155, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2.
ABSTRACTERS' BOARD OF EXAMINERS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Abstracters' fee fund (016-00-2700-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$25,723
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$25,733
Sec. 3.

HB 2082 2
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the board of accountancy fee fund (028-00-2701-0100) of the
board of accountancy is hereby increased from $482,769 to $534,357.
Sec. 4.
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
fund, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Board of accountancy fee fund (028-00-2701-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$483,965
Provided, That expenditures from the board of accountancy fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,600.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$489,996
Provided, That expenditures from the board of accountancy fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,600.
Special litigation reserve fund (028-00-2715-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that

HB 2082 3
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive
director of the board of accountancy, with the approval of the director of
the budget, may transfer moneys from the board of accountancy fee fund
(028-00-2701-0100) to the special litigation reserve fund (028-00-2715-
2700) of the board of accountancy: Provided, That the aggregate of such
transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not exceed
$20,000: Provided further, That the executive director of the board of
accountancy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of the budget and the director of legislative research.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the executive director
of the board of accountancy, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer moneys from the board of accountancy fee fund
(028-00-2701-0100) to the special litigation reserve fund (028-00-2715-
2700) of the board of accountancy: Provided, That the aggregate of such
transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall not exceed
$20,000: Provided further, That the executive director of the board of
accountancy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of the budget and the director of legislative research.
Sec. 5.
STATE BANK COMMISSIONER
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the bank commissioner fee fund (094-00-2811) of the state
bank commissioner is hereby decreased from $13,607,801 to $13,557,797.
Sec. 6.
STATE BANK COMMISSIONER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Bank examination and investigation fund (094-00-2013-1010)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Litigation expense fund (094-00-2499-2499)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

HB 2082 4
Provided, That the above agency is authorized to make expenditures from
the litigation expense fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
costs, fees and expenses associated with administrative or judicial
proceedings regarding the enforcement of laws administered by the
consumer and mortgage lending division and the enforcement and
collection of assessed fines, fees and consumer refunds: Provided further,
That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, a portion of the moneys
collected as a result of fines and investigative fees collected by the
consumer and mortgage lending division, as determined by the deputy of
the consumer and mortgage lending division, shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and credited to the litigation expense fund.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That the above agency is authorized to make expenditures from
the litigation expense fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for
costs, fees and expenses associated with administrative or judicial
proceedings regarding the enforcement of laws administered by the
consumer and mortgage lending division and the enforcement and
collection of assessed fines, fees and consumer refunds: Provided further,
That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, a portion of the moneys
collected as a result of fines and investigative fees collected by the
consumer and mortgage lending division, as determined by the deputy of
the consumer and mortgage lending division, shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and credited to the litigation expense fund.
Consumer education settlement fund (094-00-2560-2500)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the consumer education
settlement fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for consumer
education purposes, which may be in accordance with contracts for such
activities, which are hereby authorized to be entered into by the state bank
commissioner or the deputy commissioner of the consumer and mortgage
lending division, as the case may require, and the entities conducting such
activities.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the consumer education
settlement fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for consumer
education purposes, which may be in accordance with contracts for such
activities, which are hereby authorized to be entered into by the state bank
commissioner or the deputy commissioner of the consumer and mortgage
lending division, as the case may require, and the entities conducting such
activities.
Bank commissioner fee fund (094-00-2811)

HB 2082 5
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026..............................$13,667,399
Provided, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality for the division of
consumer and mortgage lending shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further,
That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality for the division of banking
shall not exceed $1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...............................$13,711,453
Provided, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality for the division of
consumer and mortgage lending shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further,
That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality for the division of banking
shall not exceed $1,000.
(b) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 9-2209, 9-2218, 16a-2-302 and
16a-6-104, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, all moneys
received under the Kansas mortgage business act or the uniform consumer
credit code for fines or settlement moneys designated for consumer
education shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the consumer education settlement fund (094-00-2560-2500).
Sec. 7.
KANSAS BOARD OF BARBERING
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the board of barbering fee fund (100-00-2704-0100) of the
Kansas board of barbering is hereby increased from $227,481 to $249,079.
Sec. 8.
KANSAS BOARD OF BARBERING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Board of barbering fee fund (100-00-2704-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$258,595
Provided, That expenditures from the board of barbering fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$263,654
Provided, That expenditures from the board of barbering fee fund for the

HB 2082 6
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027 for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
Sec. 9.
BEHAVIORAL SCIENCES REGULATORY BOARD
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund (102-00-
2730-0100) of the behavioral sciences regulatory board is hereby
decreased from $1,243,446 to $1,206,956.
Sec. 10.
BEHAVIORAL SCIENCES REGULATORY BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund (102-00-2730-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,226,463
Provided, That expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory board
fee fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality
shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That all expenditures from the
behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, for disciplinary hearings shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the behavioral sciences regulatory
board fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,234,535
Provided, That expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory board
fee fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality
shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That all expenditures from the
behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, for disciplinary hearings shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the behavioral sciences regulatory
board fee fund for fiscal year 2027.
Coronavirus relief fund (102-00-3753)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Sec. 11.
STATE BOARD OF HEALING ARTS
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 16(a) of
chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas for official hospitality
from the healing arts fee fund (105-00-2705-0100) of the state board of

HB 2082 7
healing arts is hereby increased from $1,000 to $5,000.
Sec. 12.
STATE BOARD OF HEALING ARTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Healing arts fee fund (105-00-2705-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$7,878,653
Provided, That expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $5,000:
Provided further, That all expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for disciplinary hearings shall be in
addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the healing arts fee fund
for fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$8,037,946
Provided, That expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $5,000:
Provided further, That all expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for disciplinary hearings shall be in
addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the healing arts fee fund
for fiscal year 2027.
Medical records maintenance trust fund (105-00-7206-7200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$35,000
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$35,000
Sec. 13.
KANSAS STATE BOARD OF COSMETOLOGY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the cosmetology fee fund (149-00-2706-0100) of the Kansas
state board of cosmetology is hereby increased from $1,315,590 to
$1,454,755.
Sec. 14.
KANSAS STATE BOARD OF COSMETOLOGY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Cosmetology fee fund (149-00-2706-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,144,367

HB 2082 8
Provided, That expenditures from the cosmetology fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,157,893
Provided, That expenditures from the cosmetology fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Sec. 15.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF CREDIT UNIONS
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the credit union fee fund (159-00-2026-0100) of the state
department of credit unions is hereby decreased from $1,439,263 to
$1,397,029.
Sec. 16.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF CREDIT UNIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Credit union fee fund (159-00-2026-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,417,916
Provided, That expenditures from the credit union fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $300.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,374,455
Provided, That expenditures from the credit union fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $300.
Sec. 17.
KANSAS DENTAL BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Dental board fee fund (167-00-2708-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$544,000
Provided, That expenditures from the dental board fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.................................. $510,000
Provided, That expenditures from the dental board fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Special litigation reserve fund (167-00-2749-2000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

HB 2082 9
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027..........................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Sec. 18.
STATE BOARD OF MORTUARY ARTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Mortuary arts fee fund (204-00-2709-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026....................................$353,511
Provided, That expenditures from the mortuary arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$359,143
Provided, That expenditures from the mortuary arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Sec. 19.
KANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN FITTING AND
DISPENSING OF HEARING INSTRUMENTS
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of

HB 2082 10
Kansas on the hearing instrument board fee fund (266-00-2712-9900) of
the Kansas board of examiners in fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments is hereby decreased from $49,369 to $37,986.
Sec. 20.
KANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN FITTING AND
DISPENSING OF HEARING INSTRUMENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Hearing instrument litigation fund (266-00-2136-2136)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the hearing instrument
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the hearing instrument
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Hearing instrument board fee fund (266-00-2712-9900)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$38,255
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$38,973
Sec. 21.
BOARD OF NURSING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all

HB 2082 11
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Education conference fund (482-00-2209-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Board of nursing fee fund (482-00-2716-0200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$3,854,238
Provided, That expenditures from the board of nursing fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$3,954,238
Provided, That expenditures from the board of nursing fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
Criminal background and fingerprinting fund (482-00-2745-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Gifts and grants fund (482-00-7346-4000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Sec. 22.
BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN OPTOMETRY
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the optometry fee fund (488-00-2717-
0100) as authorized by section 24(a) of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session
Laws of Kansas, this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made from such moneys in
an amount of not to exceed $1,000 for official hospitality.
Sec. 23.
BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN OPTOMETRY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Optometry litigation fund (488-00-2547-2547)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the optometry
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable

HB 2082 12
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the optometry
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Criminal history fingerprinting fund (488-00-2565-2565)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Optometry fee fund (488-00-2717-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$273,704
Provided, That expenditures from the optometry fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$254,869
Provided, That expenditures from the optometry fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Sec. 24.
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the board of pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100) of the state
board of pharmacy is hereby decreased from $3,768,713 to $2,726,649.
Sec. 25.
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:

HB 2082 13
State board of pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$2,947,109
Provided, That expenditures from the state board of pharmacy fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$3,607,526
Provided, That expenditures from the state board of pharmacy fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,500.
State board of pharmacy litigation fund (531-00-2733-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the state board of
pharmacy litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure,
and delay until the next legislative session on the requested action would
be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is
not one that was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature
and is not contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested
action will assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that
bears a valid relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the state board of
pharmacy litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure,
and delay until the next legislative session on the requested action would
be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is
not one that was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature
and is not contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested
action will assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that
bears a valid relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Prescription monitoring program fund (531-00-2827-2827)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Harold Rogers prescription fund (531-00-3188-3110)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Strategic prevention framework for prescription
drugs – federal fund (531-00-3284-3284)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

HB 2082 14
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Prescription drug overdose data-driven prevention
initiative – federal fund (531-00-3294-3294)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Non-federal gifts and grants fund (531-00-7018-7000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of pharmacy is hereby authorized to apply
for and to accept grants and may accept donations, bequests or gifts during
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That the board shall remit all moneys
received under this proviso to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto: Provided further,
That, upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit
the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the non-federal gifts
and grants fund: And provided further, That all expenditures from the non-
federal gifts and grants fund for fiscal year 2026 shall be made in
accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the
president of the state board of pharmacy or a person designated by the
president.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of pharmacy is hereby authorized to apply
for and to accept grants and may accept donations, bequests or gifts during
fiscal year 2027: Provided, however, That the board shall remit all moneys
received under this proviso to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto: Provided further,
That, upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit
the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the non-federal gifts
and grants fund: And provided further, That all expenditures from the non-
federal gifts and grants fund for fiscal year 2027 shall be made in
accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the
president of the state board of pharmacy or a person designated by the
president.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive
secretary of the state board of pharmacy, with the approval of the director
of the budget, may transfer moneys from the state board of pharmacy fee
fund (531-00-2718-0100) to the state board of pharmacy litigation fund
(531-00-2733-2700) of the state board of pharmacy: Provided, That the
aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall
not exceed $50,000: Provided further, That the executive secretary of the
state board of pharmacy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such

HB 2082 15
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the executive
secretary of the state board of pharmacy, with the approval of the director
of the budget, may transfer moneys from the state board of pharmacy fee
fund (531-00-2718-0100) to the state board of pharmacy litigation fund
(531-00-2733-2700) of the state board of pharmacy: Provided, That the
aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall
not exceed $50,000: Provided further, That the executive secretary of the
state board of pharmacy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(d) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-16,130, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, no expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 or 2027 as authorized
this or any other appropriation act of the 2026 or 2027 regular session of
the legislature for the purposes of enforcing regulations regarding: (1)
Dispensing thresholds for telepharmacy outlets; (2) location requirements
for telepharmacy outlets that include, but are not limited to, being at least
20 miles from any registered pharmacy or being in a county that contains a
city or municipality with a population greater than 50,000 individuals; and
(3) filling a prescription and causing the prescription to be delivered for
administration to a medical care facility pharmacy, a practitioner or a
patient who intends to transport such prescription to a medical care facility,
clinic, practitioner's office or pharmacy for administration.
Sec. 26.
REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Special litigation reserve fund (543-00-2698-2698)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary

HB 2082 16
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Appraiser fee fund (543-00-2732-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$443,064
Provided, That expenditures from the appraiser fee fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$400,503
Provided, That expenditures from the appraiser fee fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Federal registry clearing fund (543-00-7752-7000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
AMC federal registry clearing fund (543-00-7755-7755)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
the executive director of the real estate appraisal board, with the approval
of the director of the budget, may transfer moneys from the appraiser fee
fund (543-00-2732-0100) of the real estate appraisal board to the special
litigation reserve fund (543-00-2698-2698) of the real estate appraisal
board: Provided, That the aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall
not exceed $20,000: Provided further, That the executive director of the
real estate appraisal board shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
Sec. 27.

HB 2082 17
KANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Real estate fee fund (549-00-2721-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,354,013
Provided, That expenditures from the real estate fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,383,770
Provided, That expenditures from the real estate fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Background investigation fee fund (549-00-2722-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Special litigation reserve fund (549-00-2821-2821)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Real estate recovery revolving fund (549-00-7368-4200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

HB 2082 18
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
the executive director of the Kansas real estate commission, with the
approval of the director of the budget, may transfer moneys from the real
estate fee fund (549-00-2721-0100) to the special litigation reserve fund of
the Kansas real estate commission: Provided, That the aggregate of such
transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall not exceed $20,000: Provided further, That the
executive director of the Kansas real estate commission shall certify each
such transfer of moneys to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the budget and
the director of legislative research.
Sec. 28.
STATE BOARD OF TECHNICAL PROFESSIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Technical professions fee fund (663-00-2729-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$890,319
Provided, That expenditures from the technical professions fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$906,120
Provided, That expenditures from the technical professions fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
Special litigation reserve fund (663-00-2739-0200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special litigation

HB 2082 19
reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and delay
until the next legislative session on the requested action would be contrary
to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is not one that
was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature and is not
contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will
assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid
relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Sec. 29.
STATE BOARD OF VETERINARY EXAMINERS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Veterinary examiners fee fund (700-00-2727-1100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$406,361
Provided, That expenditures from the veterinary examiners fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $700.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$412,101
Provided, That expenditures from the veterinary examiners fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $700.
Sec. 30.
GOVERNMENTAL ETHICS COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year or years specified, the following:
Operating expenditures (247-00-1000-0103)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$560,191
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.........................................$560,191
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2027.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall

HB 2082 20
not exceed the following:
Governmental ethics commission fee fund (247-00-2188-2000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 25-4152, 25-4180, 25-4181, 25-
4186, 46-280, 46-288 and 75-3036, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, all moneys received from civil penalties charges and collected by
the governmental ethics commission under K.S.A. 25-4152, 25-4180, 25-
4181, 25-4186, 46-280 and 46-288, and amendments thereto, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the state general fund.
Sec. 31.
LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $821,290 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 24(a)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state general
fund in the legislative coordinating council – operations account (422-00-
1000-0100), the sum of $49,893 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,153,147 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
24(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the legislative research department –operations account
(425-00-1000-0103), the sum of $50,000 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $4,801,277 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
24(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the office of revisor of statutes –operations account (579-
00-1000-0103), the sum of $538,588 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 32.
LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Legislative coordinating council –
operations (422-00-1000-0100).................................................$965,242
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative coordinating
council – operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Legislative research department –
operations (425-00-1000-0103)..............................................$5,632,057
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative research
department – operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is

HB 2082 21
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Office of revisor of statutes –
operations (579-00-1000-0103)..............................................$5,060,760
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of revisor of
statutes – operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Legislature employment security fund (422-00-3756).....................No limit
Legislative research department special
revenue fund (425-00-2111-2000)...............................................No limit
Sec. 33.
LEGISLATURE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operations (including official
hospitality) (428-00-1000-0103)...........................................$26,022,660
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations (including
official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account, pursuant to vouchers
approved by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the legislative
coordinating council, to pay compensation and travel expenses and
subsistence expenses or allowances as authorized by K.S.A. 75-3212, and
amendments thereto, for members and associate members of the advisory
committee to the Kansas commission on interstate cooperation established
under K.S.A. 46-407a, and amendments thereto, for attendance at
meetings of the advisory committee that are authorized by the legislative
coordinating council, except that: (1) The legislative coordinating council
may establish restrictions or limitations, or both, on travel expenses,
subsistence expenses or allowances, or any combination thereof, paid to
members and associate members of such advisory committee; and (2) any
person who is an associate member of such advisory committee, by reason
of such person having been accredited by the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws as a life member of that organization,
shall receive the same travel expenses and subsistence expenses for
attendance at meetings of the advisory committee as a regular member, but
shall receive no per diem compensation: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account for services, facilities and
supplies provided for legislators in addition to those provided under the

HB 2082 22
approved budget and for related copying, facsimile transmission and other
services provided to persons other than legislators, in accordance with
policies and any restrictions or limitations prescribed by the legislative
coordinating council: And provided further, That no expenditures shall be
made from this account for any meeting of any joint committee, or of any
subcommittee of any joint committee, chargeable to fiscal year 2026
unless such meeting is approved by the legislative coordinating council:
And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 45-
116, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall
be made from this account for the printing and distribution of copies of the
permanent journals of the senate or house of representatives to each
member of the legislature during fiscal year 2026: And provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-138, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall be made from this
account for the printing and distribution of complete sets of the Kansas
Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature in excess of one
complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member at the
commencement of the member's first term as legislator during fiscal year
2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
77-138, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures
shall be made from this account for the legislator's name to be printed on
one complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated during fiscal year 2026:
And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-
165, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall
be made from this account for the printing and delivering of a set of the
cumulative supplements of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member
of the legislature in excess of one cumulative supplement set of the Kansas
Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature during fiscal year
2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
75-1005, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may
be made from this account to reimburse members of the legislature for
expenses incurred in printing correspondence with constituents: And
provided further, That no expenses shall be reimbursed unless a legislator
has first obtained approval for such printing by the director of legislative
administrative services: And provided further, That such reimbursements
shall only be issued after a legislator provides written receipts showing
such expense to the director of legislative administrative services: And
provided further, That the maximum amount reimbursed to any legislator
shall be equal to or less than the maximum amount allotted to any
legislator for constituent correspondence pursuant to policies adopted by
the legislative coordinating council: And provided further, That in addition
to the provisions of the Kansas legislative intern program pursuant to
legislative coordinating council policy 37, expenditures shall be made by

HB 2082 23
the above agency from this account in fiscal year 2026 to pay for the
actual mileage of Kansas legislative interns traveling to the capitol for the
required minimum of 12 days of attendance at the capitol.
Legislative information
system (428-00-1000-0300)....................................................$9,003,547
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative information
system account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Legislative special
revenue fund (428-00-2260-2200)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the legislative special
revenue fund, pursuant to vouchers approved by the chairperson or the
vice chairperson of the legislative coordinating council, to pay
compensation and travel expenses and subsistence expenses or allowances
as authorized by K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto, for members
and associate members of the advisory committee to the Kansas
commission on interstate cooperation established under K.S.A. 46-407a,
and amendments thereto, for attendance at meetings of the advisory
committee which are authorized by the legislative coordinating council,
except that: (1) The legislative coordinating council may establish
restrictions or limitations, or both, on travel expenses, subsistence
expenses or allowances, or any combination thereof, paid to members and
associate members of such advisory committee; and (2) any person who is
an associate member of such advisory committee, by reason of such
person having been accredited by the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws as a life member of that organization,
shall receive the same travel expenses and subsistence expenses for
attendance at meetings of the advisory committee as a regular member, but
shall receive no per diem compensation: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for services, facilities and
supplies provided for legislators in addition to those provided under the
approved budget and for related copying, facsimile transmission and other
services provided to persons other than legislators, in accordance with
policies and any restrictions or limitations prescribed by the legislative
coordinating council: And provided further, That amounts are hereby
authorized to be collected for such services, facilities and supplies in
accordance with policies of the council: And provided further, That such
amounts shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the expenses

HB 2082 24
incurred for providing such services, facilities and supplies and shall be
consistent with policies and fees established in accordance with K.S.A. 46-
1207a, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That all such
amounts received shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the legislative special revenue fund: And provided further,
That all donations, gifts or bequests of money for the legislative branch of
government which are received and accepted by the legislative
coordinating council shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
an account of the legislative special revenue fund: And provided further,
That no expenditures shall be made from this fund for any meeting of any
joint committee, or of any subcommittee of any joint committee, during
fiscal year 2026 unless such meeting is approved by the legislative
coordinating council: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 45-116, and amendments thereto, or any other statute,
no expenditures shall be made from this fund for the printing and
distribution of copies of the permanent journals of the senate or house of
representatives to each member of the legislature during fiscal year 2026:
And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-
138, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall
be made from this fund for the printing and distribution of complete sets of
the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature in excess
of one complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member at
the commencement of the member's first term as legislator during fiscal
year 2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 77-138, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no
expenditures shall be made from this fund for the legislator's name to be
printed on one complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated during fiscal
year 2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 77-165, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no
expenditures shall be made from this fund for the printing and delivering
of a set of the cumulative supplements of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to
each member of the legislature in excess of one cumulative supplement set
of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature during
fiscal year 2026.
Capitol restoration – gifts and
donations fund (428-00-7348-7000)............................................No limit
(c) As used in this section, "joint committee" includes the joint
committee on administrative rules and regulations, health care stabilization
fund oversight committee, joint committee on special claims against the
state, legislative budget committee, joint committee on state building
construction, joint committee on information technology, joint committee
on pensions, investments and benefits, joint committee on state-tribal

HB 2082 25
relations, confirmation oversight committee, J. Russell (Russ) Jennings
joint committee on corrections and juvenile justice oversight,
compensation commission, joint committee on Kansas security, Robert G.
(Bob) Bethell joint committee on home and community based services and
KanCare oversight, capitol preservation committee, joint committee on
child welfare system oversight, joint committee on fiduciary financial
institutions oversight and any other committee, commission or other body
for which expenditures are to be paid from moneys appropriated for the
legislature for the expenses of any meeting of any such body or for the
expenses of any member thereof.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to install and make available
during the 2026 regular session of the legislature short-range wireless
technology to transmit live audio of the house of representatives and
senate chamber during such chambers' session with access to such audio
limited to approved legislator devices or otherwise allow for bluetooth
connection and provide an independent internet network for such
technology and access to such network be limited to legislators.
Sec. 34.
DIVISION OF POST AUDIT
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $3,478,835 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
28(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the operations (including legislative post audit committee)
account (540-00-1000-0100), the sum of $364,673 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 35.
DIVISION OF POST AUDIT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operations (including legislative post
audit committee) (540-00-1000-0100)....................................$3,602,447
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations (including
legislative post audit committee) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 36.
GOVERNOR'S DEPARTMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

HB 2082 26
Governor's department (252-00-1000-0503)................................$4,300,449
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the governor's department
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from
this account for official hospitality and contingencies without limitation at
the discretion of the governor.
Domestic violence
prevention grants (252-00-1000-0600).................................$24,110,151
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the domestic violence
prevention grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the domestic violence prevention grants account for
official hospitality and contingencies without limitation at the discretion of
the governor.
Child advocacy centers (252-00-1000-0610)...............................$4,249,073
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child advocacy centers
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from
the child advocacy centers account for official hospitality and
contingencies without limitation at the discretion of the governor.
CASA grant (252-00-1000-0630).................................................$1,230,535
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CASA grant account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from the CASA
grant account for official hospitality and contingencies without limitation
at the discretion of the governor.
(b) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for travel
expenses of the governor's spouse when accompanying the governor or
when representing the governor on official state business, for travel and
subsistence expenditures, for security personnel when traveling with the
governor and for entertainment of officials and other persons as guests
from the amount appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by
subsection (a) from the state general fund in the governor's department
account (252-00-1000-0503).
(c) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for travel
expenses of the lieutenant governor's spouse when accompanying the
lieutenant governor or when representing the lieutenant governor on
official state business, for travel and subsistence expenditures, for security
personnel when traveling with the lieutenant governor and for
entertainment of officials and other persons as guests from the amount
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by subsection (a)
from the state general fund in the governor's department account (252-00-
1000-0503).

HB 2082 27
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Special programs fund (252-00-2149)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the special programs fund
for operating expenditures for the governor's department, including
conferences and official hospitality: Provided further, That the governor is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such conferences: And
provided further, That fees for such conferences shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of the operating expenses incurred for such conferences,
including official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received
for such conferences shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the special programs fund.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (252-00-2409)....................................................No limit
Kansas commission on disability concerns
fee fund (252-00-2767)................................................................No limit
White collar crime fund (252-00-2853)............................................No limit
Residential substance abuse –
federal fund (252-00-3006).........................................................No limit
Arrest grant – federal fund (252-00-3082).......................................No limit
National criminal history improvement
program – federal fund (252-00-3189)........................................No limit
Violence against women grant –
federal fund (252-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (252-00-3216).........................................................No limit
Project safe neighborhoods –
federal fund (252-00-3217).........................................................No limit
Coverdell forensic science improvement –
federal fund (252-00-3227).........................................................No limit
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (252-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Pandemic assistance/vaccine
equity fund (252-00-3372)...........................................................No limit
Access visitation grant –
federal fund (252-00-3460).........................................................No limit
Battered women/family violence prevention –
federal fund (252-00-3461).........................................................No limit
Sexual assault services program –
federal fund (252-00-3465).........................................................No limit

HB 2082 28
Family violence prevention services –
ARPA federal fund (252-00-3640)..............................................No limit
Emergency rental assistance –
federal fund (252-00-3646).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan –
state fiscal relief –
federal fund (252-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Edward Byrne justice assistance grants –
federal fund (252-00-3757).........................................................No limit
Prison rape elimination act –
federal fund (252-00-3758).........................................................No limit
John R Justice grant –
federal fund (252-00-3802).........................................................No limit
Hispanic and Latino
American affairs commission –
donations fund (252-00-7236).....................................................No limit
Advisory commission on
African-American affairs –
donations fund (252-00-7242).....................................................No limit
Sec. 37.
ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Natural gas litigation (082-00-1000-0041).....................................$830,000
Operating expenditures (082-00-1000-0103)..................................$340,228
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the crime victims compensation fund (082-00-2563-2060) for
state operations of the attorney general is hereby increased from $681,791
to $840,092.
Sec. 38.
ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Litigation costs (082-00-1000-0040)................................................$40,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the litigation costs account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Operating expenditures (082-00-1000-0103)...............................$8,941,036
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account

HB 2082 29
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Office of inspector general (082-00-1000-0300).........................$1,082,999
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of inspector
general account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Child abuse grants (082-00-1000-0400)...........................................$75,000
Child exchange and
visitation centers (082-00-1000-0450).......................................$128,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-7334, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the above agency may use moneys in the child exchange
and visitation centers account for matching funds.
Abuse, neglect and
exploitation unit (082-00-1000-0500)........................................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the abuse, neglect and
exploitation unit account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made by the attorney general from the abuse, neglect and
exploitation unit account pursuant to contracts with other agencies or
organizations to provide services related to the investigation or litigation of
findings related to abuse, neglect or exploitation.
Protection from abuse (082-00-1000-0900)....................................$570,900
Memorial hall move (082-00-1000)................................................$450,000
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, in the
natural gas litigation account (082-00-1000-0041) is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Court cost fund (082-00-2012).........................................................No limit
Private detective fee fund (082-00-2029).........................................No limit
Provided, That in furtherance of the purposes authorized by K.S.A. 75-
7b17, and amendments thereto, specifically obtaining "such other
information as deemed necessary by the attorney general" pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-7b17(b)(5), and amendments thereto, expenditures may be
made from the private detective fee fund to secure from the Kansas bureau
of investigation criminal history record information related to adult
convictions, adult non-convictions, adult diversions, adult expunged
records, juvenile adjudications, juvenile non-adjudications, juvenile
diversions and juvenile expunged records for fingerprints submitted in
conjunction with an application for a private detective firearm permit.

HB 2082 30
Scrap metal theft reduction
fee fund (082-00-2085)................................................................No limit
Kansas attorney general batterer
intervention program
certification fund (082-00-2103).................................................No limit
Attorney general's committee on crime
prevention fee fund (082-00-2113)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the attorney general's
committee on crime prevention fee fund for operating expenditures
directly or indirectly related to conducting training seminars organized by
the attorney general's committee on crime prevention, including official
hospitality: Provided further, That the attorney general is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for conducting training seminars
organized by the attorney general's committee on crime prevention: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the direct and indirect operating expenses incurred for conducting
such seminars, including official hospitality: And provided further, That all
fees received for conducting such seminars shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the attorney general's
committee on crime prevention fee fund.
SSA fraud prevention
federal fund (082-00-2174).........................................................No limit
Protection from abuse fund (082-00-2239)......................................No limit
Bond transcript review
fee fund (082-00-2254)................................................................No limit
Bail enforcement agents
fee fund (082-00-2259)................................................................No limit
Provided, That in furtherance of the purposes authorized by K.S.A. 75-
7e01 through 75-7e09, and amendments thereto, expenditures may be
made from the bail enforcement agents fee fund to secure from the Kansas
bureau of investigation criminal history record information related to adult
convictions, adult non-convictions, adult diversions, adult expunged
records, juvenile adjudications, juvenile non-adjudications, juvenile
diversions and juvenile expunged records for fingerprints submitted in
conjunction with an application for a bail enforcement agent license.
Fraud and abuse criminal
prosecution fund (082-00-2262)..................................................No limit
Debt collection administration cost
recovery fund (082-00-2305).......................................................No limit
Provided, That the attorney general shall deposit in the state treasury to the
credit of the debt collection administration cost recovery fund all moneys
remitted to the attorney general as administrative costs under contracts

HB 2082 31
entered into pursuant to K.S.A. 75-719, and amendments thereto.
Interstate water
litigation fund (082-00-2311)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes authorized by K.S.A.
82a-1802, and amendments thereto, expenditures may be made from the
interstate water litigation fund for: (1) Litigation costs for the case of
Kansas v. Colorado No. 105, Original in the Supreme Court of the United
States, including repayment of past contributions; (2) expenses related to
the appointment of a river master or such other official as may be
appointed by the Supreme Court to administer, implement or enforce its
decree or other orders of the Supreme Court related to this case; and (3)
expenses incurred by agencies of the state of Kansas to monitor actions of
the state of Colorado and its water users and to enforce any settlement,
decree or order of the Supreme Court related to this case.
Sexually violent predator
expense fund (082-00-2379)........................................................No limit
Tobacco master settlement agreement
compliance fund (082-00-2383)..................................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (082-00-2405)....................................................No limit
Concealed weapon
licensure fund (082-00-2450)......................................................No limit
County law enforcement
equipment fund (082-00-2470)....................................................No limit
Abuse, neglect and exploitation of
people with disabilities unit grant
acceptance fund (082-00-2482)...................................................No limit
Attorney general's open
government fund (082-00-2497).................................................No limit
Attorney general's antitrust special
revenue fund (082-00-2506)........................................................No limit
Crime victims
compensation fund (082-00-2563)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the crime victims compensation fund for
state operations shall not exceed $851,889: Provided further, That any
expenditures for payment of compensation to crime victims are authorized
to be made from this fund regardless of when the claim was awarded.
Child exchange and visiting
centers fund (082-00-2579).........................................................No limit
Crime victims assistance fund (082-00-2598)..................................No limit
Tort claims fund (082-00-2613)........................................................No limit
Medicaid fraud prosecution
revolving fund (082-00-2641).....................................................No limit

HB 2082 32
Provided, That all moneys recovered by the medicaid fraud and abuse
division of the attorney general's office in the enforcement of state and
federal law which are in excess of any restitution for overcharges and
interest, including all moneys recovered as recoupment of expenses of
investigation and prosecution, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the medicaid fraud prosecution revolving fund: Provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 21-5933, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made from the medicaid
fraud prosecution revolving fund for other operating expenditures of the
attorney general's office for medicaid fraud prosecution direct and indirect
costs.
False claims litigation
revolving fund (082-00-2650).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the false claims litigation
revolving fund for costs associated with litigation under the Kansas false
claims act, K.S.A. 75-7501 et seq., and amendments thereto.
Children's advocacy
center fund (082-00-2654)...........................................................No limit
911 state maintenance fund (082-00-2747)......................................No limit
Roofing contractor
registration fund (082-00-2774)..................................................No limit
Human trafficking victim
assistance fund (082-00-2775).....................................................No limit
Criminal appeals cost fund (082-00-2779).......................................No limit
State medicaid fraud
forfeiture fund (082-00-2822).....................................................No limit
Kansas fights addiction fund (082-00-2826)....................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-776, and
amendments thereto, expenditures shall be made from the Kansas fights
addiction fund to include under the Kansas fights addiction act as a
qualified applicant, as defined in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-776, and
amendments thereto, any for-profit private entity that provides services for
the purpose of preventing, reducing, treating or otherwise abating or
remediating substance abuse or addiction and that has released its legal
claims arising from covered conduct against each defendant that is
required by opioid litigation to pay into the fund.
Municipalities fight
addiction fund (082-00-2838)......................................................No limit
Charitable organizations
fee fund (082-00-2863)................................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice assistance grant
federal fund (082-00-3057).........................................................No limit
State medicaid fraud control unit –

HB 2082 33
federal fund (082-00-3060).........................................................No limit
Com def sol – violence against women
federal fund (082-00-3082).........................................................No limit
SUID case registry fund (082-00-3098)...........................................No limit
Crime victims compensation
federal fund (082-00-3133).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne state/local law enforcement
federal fund (082-00-3213).........................................................No limit
Violence against women – ARRA
federal fund (082-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Comm prsct/project safe neighborhood
federal fund (082-00-3217).........................................................No limit
Public safety prtnt/comm
pol fund (082-00-3218)...............................................................No limit
Anti-gang initiative
federal fund (082-00-3229).........................................................No limit
Alcohol impaired driving cntrmsr
federal fund (082-00-3247).........................................................No limit
Children's justice grant
federal fund (082-00-3381).........................................................No limit
Sexual assault kit initiative
federal fund (082-00-3416).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial JAG – ARRA
federal fund (082-00-3455).........................................................No limit
DOT prohibit
racial profiling (082-00-3566).....................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (082-00-3753).............................................No limit
Medicaid indirect cost
federal fund (082-00-3919).........................................................No limit
Federal forfeiture fund (082-00-3940)..............................................No limit
Attorney general's state agency
representation fund (082-00-6125)..............................................No limit
Crime victims grants and
gifts fund (082-00-7340).............................................................No limit
Provided, That all private grants and gifts received by the crime victims
compensation board shall be deposited to the credit of the crime victims
grants and gifts fund.
Attorney general's antitrust
suspense fund (082-00-9002)......................................................No limit
Attorney general's consumer protection
clearing fund (082-00-9003)........................................................No limit
Medicaid fraud
reimbursement fund (082-00-9034).............................................No limit

HB 2082 34
Suspense fund (082-00-9112)...........................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, grants made pursuant
to K.S.A. 74-7325, and amendments thereto, from the protection from
abuse fund (082-00-2239-2030) and grants made pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
7334, and amendments thereto, from the crime victims assistance fund
(082-00-2598-2070) shall be made after consideration of the
recommendation of an entity that has been designated by the United States
department of health and human services and by the centers for disease
control and prevention as the official domestic violence or sexual assault
coalition.
(d) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $50,000 from the state
general fund to the sexually violent predator expense fund (082-00-2379-
2310) of the attorney general.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-769, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, no expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature, to set legal representation charges for state agencies at a
rate exceeding $100 per hour.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $600,000 from the state
general fund to the medicaid fraud prosecution revolving fund (082-00-
2641-2280) of the attorney general.
Sec. 39.
SECRETARY OF STATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Cemetery and funeral audit
fee fund (622-00-2225)................................................................No limit
HAVA ELVIS fund (622-00-2353-2150)..........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (622-00-2418)....................................................No limit
Information and services
fee fund (622-00-2430-2300)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the information and services fee fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
State register fee fund (622-00-2619-2500)......................................No limit
Uniform commercial code

HB 2082 35
fee fund (622-00-2664-2600)......................................................No limit
Technology communication
fee fund (622-00-2672-2900)......................................................No limit
Athlete agent registration
fee fund (622-00-2674-2700)......................................................No limit
Democracy fund (622-00-2702).......................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the democracy fund shall be to
provide matching funds to implement title II of the federal help America
vote act of 2002, public law 107-252, as prescribed under that act.
Help America vote act federal fund (622-00-3091)..........................No limit
HAVA title I federal fund (622-00-3283-3283)................................No limit
State homeland security
grant federal fund (622-00-3629)................................................No limit
HAVA election security fund 2018 (622-00-3956-3956)..................No limit
State flag and banner fund (622-00-5130-4600)...............................No limit
Secretary of state fee
refund fund (622-00-9047)..........................................................No limit
Suspense fund (622-00-9046)...........................................................No limit
Electronic voting machine
examination fund (622-00-9101).................................................No limit
Prepaid services fund (622-00-9114)................................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (622-00-9434)..........................................No limit
Professional employer
organization fee fund (622-00-2678)...........................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 by the above agency by this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by
the above agency from such special revenue fund or funds to provide a
report to the house appropriations committee and the senate ways and
means committee detailing the costs of publication in a newspaper in each
county pursuant to K.S.A. 64-103, and amendments thereto, of any
constitutional amendment that is introduced by the legislature during the
2026 regular session of the legislature and detailing costs to local units of
governments for conducting elections that include proposed constitutional
amendments.
(c) On or before the 10th day of each month commencing July 1,
2025, during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer from the state general fund to the democracy fund interest
earnings based on:
(1) The average daily balance of moneys in the democracy fund for
the preceding month; and

HB 2082 36
(2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio for
the preceding month.
Sec. 40.
STATE TREASURER
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the state treasurer operating fund (670-00-2374-2300) of the
state treasurer is hereby decreased from $2,009,194 to $1,904,147.
Sec. 41.
STATE TREASURER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Bond services fee fund (670-00-2061-2500)....................................No limit
Kansas postsecondary education savings
expense fund (670-00-2096-2000)..............................................No limit
KS ABLE savings
expense fund (670-00-2177-2177)..............................................No limit
Unclaimed property
expense fund (670-00-2362-2200)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the unclaimed property expense fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
State treasurer
operating fund (670-00-2374-2300)........................................$1,959,222
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of the uniform unclaimed
property act, K.S.A. 58-3934 et seq., and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, of all the moneys received under the uniform unclaimed property
act during fiscal year 2026, the state treasurer is hereby authorized and
directed to credit the first amount equal to the expenditure limitation
approved by this or other appropriation act of the legislature received and
deposited in the state treasury to the state treasurer operating fund:
Provided further, Notwithstanding any provision of the uniform unclaimed
property act, K.S.A. 58-3934 et seq., and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, on June 30, 2026, the state treasurer shall certify any remaining
unencumbered balance in the state treasurer operating fund exceeding
$100,000 to the director of accounts and reports, who shall transfer such
certified amount from the state treasurer operating fund to the state general
fund on June 30, 2026: And provided further, That, after such aggregate
amount has been credited to the state treasurer operating fund, then all of
the moneys received under the uniform unclaimed property act during
fiscal year 2026 shall be credited as prescribed under the uniform

HB 2082 37
unclaimed property act: And provided further, That all moneys credited to
the state treasurer operating fund during fiscal year 2026 are to reimburse
the state treasurer for accounting, auditing, budgeting, legal, payroll,
personnel and purchasing services and any other governmental services
which are performed to administer the provisions of the uniform
unclaimed property act that are not otherwise reimbursed under any other
provision of law.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (670-00-2461-2700)..........................................No limit
Distinctive license plate
royalty fund (670-00-2885-2885)................................................No limit
Other federal grants fund (670-00-3878-3878)................................No limit
Kansas postsecondary education savings
program trust fund (670-00-7241-7100)......................................No limit
Tax increment financing revenue
replacement fund (670-00-7391-4700)........................................No limit
Transportation development district
sales tax fund (670-00-7601-7000)..............................................No limit
County and city transient
guest tax fund (670-00-7602-6600).............................................No limit
County and city retailers'
sales tax fund (670-00-7608-6000)..............................................No limit
Community improvement district sales
tax fund (670-00-7610-7650)......................................................No limit
City bond finance fund (670-00-7654).............................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor fund (670-00-7665-6100).............................No limit
County and city compensating use
tax fund (670-00-7667-6200)......................................................No limit
Racing admissions tax fund (670-00-7670-6300)............................No limit
Rental motor vehicle excise
tax fund (670-00-7681-6800)......................................................No limit
Redevelopment bond fund (670-00-7683-6900)..............................No limit
Business machinery and equipment tax reduction
assistance fund (670-00-7684-7680).....................................................$0
Telecommunications and railroad
machinery and equipment tax reduction
assistance fund (670-00-7685-7690).....................................................$0
Fiscal agency fund (670-00-7754-6400).......................................... No limit
Unclaimed property
claims fund (670-00-7758-7700).................................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
equalization fund (670-00-7759-6500)........................................No limit
Suspense fund (670-00-9054-9000)..................................................No limit

HB 2082 38
Spirit bonds fund (670-00-9515-9515).............................................No limit
Provided, That, on the 15th day of each month that commences during
fiscal year 2026, the secretary of revenue shall determine the amount of
revenue received by the state during the preceding month from
withholding taxes paid with respect to an eligible project by each taxpayer
that is an eligible business for which bonds have been issued under K.S.A.
74-50,136, and amendments thereto, and for which the Spirit bonds fund
was created, and shall certify the amount so determined to the director of
accounts and reports and, at the same time as such certification is
transmitted to the director of accounts and reports, shall transmit a copy of
such certification to the director of the budget and the director of
legislative research: Provided further, That, upon receipt of each such
certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount
certified from the state general fund to the Spirit bonds fund: And provided
further, That, on or before the 10th day of each month commencing during
fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from
the state general fund to the Spirit bonds fund interest earnings based on:
(1) The average daily balance of moneys in the Spirit bonds fund for the
preceding month; and (2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money
investment portfolio for the preceding month: And provided further, That
the moneys credited to the Spirit bonds fund from the withholding taxes
paid by an eligible business and the interest earnings thereon shall be
transferred by the state treasurer from the Spirit bonds fund to the special
economic revitalization fund administered by the state treasurer in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-50,136, and amendments thereto.
Bioscience development and
investment fund (670-00-9510-9510)..........................................No limit
Special economic
revitalization fund (670-00-9520-9520)......................................No limit
Special qualified industrial
manufacturer fund (670-00-9525-9525)......................................No limit
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-648, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, on July 1, 2025, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $50,000 from the Kansas postsecondary education savings
expense fund (670-00-2096-2000) of the state treasurer to the KS ABLE
savings expense fund (670-00-2177-2177) of the state treasurer.
Sec. 42.
INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall

HB 2082 39
not exceed the following:
Insurance company
examination fund (331-00-2055).................................................No limit
Insurance company annual statement
examination fund (331-00-2056).................................................No limit
Insurance company examiner
training fund (331-00-2057)........................................................No limit
Securities act fee fund (331-00-2162)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the securities act fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $3,000.
Investor education and
protection fund (331-00-2242)....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the investor education and protection
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall
not exceed $6,000.
Insurance department service
regulation fund (331-00-2270)....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the insurance department service
regulation fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $7,500.
Captive insurance regulatory and
supervision fund (331-00-2309)..................................................No limit
Uninsurable health insurance
plan fund (331-00-2328)..............................................................No limit
Fines and penalties fund (331-00-2351)...........................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 40-2606, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, all moneys received during fiscal
year 2026 for penalties imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 40-2606, and
amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the fines and penalties fund.
Insurance education and
training fund (331-00-2367)........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the insurance education
and training fund for training programs and official hospitality: Provided
further, That the insurance commissioner is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for such training programs: And provided further,
That fees for such training programs shall be fixed in order to collect all or
part of the operating expenses incurred for such training programs,
including official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received
for such training programs shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the insurance education and training fund.
Settlements fund (331-00-2523).......................................................No limit

HB 2082 40
Provided, That moneys may be transferred or otherwise credited to the
settlements fund as the result of or pursuant to court orders under K.S.A.
40-3644, and amendments thereto, court-ordered settlements or legislative
authority: Provided further, That expenditures from the settlements fund
shall be made for the purpose of providing consumer education and
outreach or for costs that the insurance department may incur in closeout
of any troubled insurance company matters.
Pharmacy benefits manager
licensure fund (331-00-2665)......................................................No limit
Professional employer org reg fund (331-00-2678)..........................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (331-00-3753).............................................No limit
Private grants and
gifts fund (331-00-7301).............................................................No limit
Workers compensation fund (331-00-7354).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the workers compensation fund for
attorney fees and other costs and benefit payments may be made regardless
of when services were rendered or when the initial award of benefits was
made.
Monumental life
settlement fund (331-00-7360)....................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the monumental life settlement fund
shall be made for scholarship purposes: Provided further, That the
scholarship recipients shall be African-American students who are
currently enrolled and are attending an accredited higher education
institution in the state of Kansas and who have designated a major in
mathematics, computer science or business.
Group-funded pools refund fund (331-00-7389)..............................No limit
State firefighters relief fund (331-00-7652)......................................No limit
Insurance company tax and fee
refund fund (331-00-9017)..........................................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the insurance department from the insurance company
examination fund (331-00-2055) for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by
K.S.A. 40-223, and amendments thereto, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 40-223, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures
may be made by the insurance department from the insurance company
examination fund for fiscal year 2026 for the examination of annual
statements filed with the commissioner of insurance, regardless of when
the services were rendered, when the expenses were incurred or when any
claim was submitted or processed for payment and regardless of whether
or not the services were rendered or the expenses were incurred prior to
the effective date of this act.
Sec. 43.

HB 2082 41
HEALTH CARE STABILIZATION
FUND BOARD OF GOVERNORS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Conference fee fund (270-00-2453-2453)........................................No limit
Health care stabilization fund (270-00-7404-2000)..........................No limit
(b) Expenditures from the health care stabilization fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, other than refunds authorized by law for the
following specified purposes shall not exceed the limitations prescribed
therefor as follows:
Operating expenditures (270-00-7404-2100)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures
account for official hospitality.
Legal services and other
claims expenses (270-00-7404-2300)..........................................No limit
Claims and benefits (270-00-7404-2400).........................................No limit
Sec. 44.
POOLED MONEY INVESTMENT BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Pooled money investment portfolio
fee fund (671-00-2319-2000)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, on or before the fifth day of each month of the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the state treasurer shall certify to the pooled money
investment board an accounting of the banking fees incurred by the state
treasurer during the second preceding month that are attributable to the
investment of the pooled money investment portfolio during such month:
Provided further, That, prior to the 10th day of each month during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the pooled money investment board shall
review the certification from the state treasurer and shall make
expenditures from the pooled money investment portfolio fee fund (671-
00-2319-2000) to pay the amount of banking fees incurred by the state
treasurer during the second preceding month that are attributable to the
investment of the pooled money investment portfolio during the second
preceding month, as determined by the pooled money investment board:
And provided further, That expenditures from the pooled money
investment portfolio fee fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $800.
Municipal investment

HB 2082 42
pool fund (671-00-7537-7000)....................................................No limit
Sec. 45.
JUDICIAL COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $821,141 appropriated and
reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 44(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas
from the state general fund in the operating expenditures account (349-00-
1000-0100), the sum of $88,200 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 46.
JUDICIAL COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (349-00-1000-0100)..................................$730,028
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Publications fee fund (349-00-2297-2000).......................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (349-00-3753-3772)...................................No limit
Grants and gifts fund (349-00-7326-7000).......................................No limit
Provided, That all private grants and gifts received by the judicial council,
other than moneys received as grants, gifts or donations for the
preparation, publication or distribution of legal publications, shall be
deposited to the credit of the grants and gifts fund.
Sec. 47.
STATE BOARD OF INDIGENTS'
DEFENSE SERVICES
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $27,237,283 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
46(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the operating expenditures account (328-00-1000-0603),
the sum of $1,500,000 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 48.
STATE BOARD OF INDIGENTS'
DEFENSE SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Legal services for prisoners (328-00-1000-0500)...........................$402,382
Operating expenditures (328-00-1000-0603).............................$30,001,185

HB 2082 43
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures for indigents'
defense services are authorized to be made from the operating
expenditures account regardless of when services were rendered: Provided
further, That expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures
account for negotiated contracts for malpractice insurance for public
defenders and deputy or assistant public defenders: And provided further,
That all contracts for malpractice insurance for public defenders and
deputy or assistant public defenders shall be negotiated and purchased by
the state board of indigents' defense services, shall not be subject to
approval or purchase by the committee on surety bonds and insurance
under K.S.A. 75-4114 and 75-6111, and amendments thereto, and shall not
be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto.
Indigents' defense
services operations (328-00-1000-0610)...................................$156,847
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the indigents' defense services operations account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the indigents' defense services operations account for
the purpose of assigned counsel and other professional services related to
contract cases.
Assigned counsel
expenditures (328-00-1000-0700).........................................$31,800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the assigned counsel expenditures account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures for
indigents' defense services are authorized to be made from the assigned
counsel expenditures account regardless of when services were rendered.
Capital defense operations (328-00-1000-0800)..........................$5,429,177
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the capital defense operations account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures for indigents'
defense services are authorized to be made from the capital defense
operations account regardless of when services were rendered.
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as June 30, 2025, in the
litigation support account (328-00-1000-0510) is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:

HB 2082 44
Indigents' defense
services fund (328-00-2119)........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the indigents' defense
services fund for the purpose of assigned counsel and other professional
services related to contract cases.
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (328-00-2186)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences: Provided
further, That the state board of indigents' defense services is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for inservice workshops and
conferences: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of such operating expenditures incurred for inservice
workshops and conferences: And provided further, That all fees received
for inservice workshops and conferences shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the inservice education
workshop fee fund.
Capital litigation training
grant fund (328-00-3211).............................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive director
of the state board of indigents' defense services, with the approval of the
director of the budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the
state board of indigents' defense services to any other item of appropriation
for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the state board of
indigents' defense services. The executive director shall certify each such
transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of
each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the state board of indigents' defense services from the moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund
or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this act or other
appropriation act of the 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 to classify public defenders based on the level of cases
such public defenders are assigned.
Sec. 49.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

HB 2082 45
Judiciary operations (677-00-1000-0103)................................$239,581,286
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the judiciary operations
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That contracts for computer input of
judicial opinions and all purchases thereunder shall not be subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from the judiciary operations
account for contingencies without limitation at the discretion of the chief
justice: And provided further, That expenditures from the judiciary
operations account for such contingencies shall not exceed $25,000: And
provided further, That expenditures from the judiciary operations account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $4,000: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from the judiciary operations account for the
travel expenses of panels of the court of appeals for travel to cities across
the state to hear appealed cases.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Library report fee fund (677-00-2106-2000)....................................No limit
Dispute resolution fund (677-00-2126-3500)...................................No limit
Judicial branch docket
fee fund (677-00-2158-2158)......................................................No limit
Judicial branch nonjudicial salary
initiative fund (677-00-2229-2800).............................................No limit
Judicial branch
education fund (677-00-2324-1900)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the judicial branch
education fund to provide services and programs for the purpose of
educating and training judicial branch officers and employees,
administering the training, testing and education of municipal judges as
provided in K.S.A. 12-4114, and amendments thereto, educating and
training municipal judges and municipal court support staff, and for the
planning and implementation of a family court system, as provided by law,
including official hospitality: Provided further, That the judicial
administrator is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such
services and programs: And provided further, That such fees may be fixed
to cover all or part of the operating expenditures incurred in providing
such services and programs, including official hospitality: And provided
further, That all fees received for such services and programs, including
official hospitality, shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall

HB 2082 46
be credited to the judicial branch education fund.
Judicial branch nonjudicial salary
adjustment fund (677-00-2389-3200)..........................................No limit
District magistrate judge supplemental
compensation fund (677-00-2398-2390).....................................No limit
Correctional supervision
fund (677-00-2465-2465)............................................................No limit
Duplicate law book fund (677-00-2543-2300).................................No limit
Child support enforcement contractual
agreement fund (677-00-2681-2400)...........................................No limit
SJI grant fund (677-00-2714-2714)..................................................No limit
Bar admission fee fund (677-00-2724-2500)....................................No limit
Court reporter fund (677-00-2725-2600)..........................................No limit
Electronic filing and
management fund (677-00-2791-2791).......................................No limit
Specialty court resources fund (677-00-2879-2879)........................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice
assistance grant fund (677-00-3057)...........................................No limit
Federal grants fund (677-00-3082-3100)..........................................No limit
National crime history improvement
program fund (677-00-3189-3189)..............................................No limit
Violence against women grant fund –
ARRA (677-00-3214-3214).........................................................No limit
Byrne discretionary grants
program fund (677-00-3654).......................................................No limit
Coronavirus emergency
supplemental fund (677-00-3671-3671)......................................No limit
Elder justice innovation grant –
federal fund (677-00-3680).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (677-00-3753).............................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (677-00-3756-3536)............No limit
State and community highway safety –
federal fund (677-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
BJA veterans treatment court discretionary
grant program fund (677-00-3922-3922)....................................No limit
Child welfare federal
grant fund (677-00-3942-3300)...................................................No limit
Permanent families account – family and children
investment fund (677-00-7317-7000)..........................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $3,000,000 from the state
general fund to the specialty court resources fund (677-00-2879-2879) of
the judicial branch.

HB 2082 47
Sec. 50.
KANSAS PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Non-retirement
administration fund (365-00-2277).............................................No limit
Kansas public employees deferred compensation
fees fund (365-00-2376)..............................................................No limit
Kansas endowment for
youth fund (365-00-7000-2000)..................................................No limit
Kansas public employees
retirement fund (365-00-7002-7000)...........................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures may be made from the Kansas public
employees retirement fund other than for benefits, investments, refunds
authorized by law, and other purposes specifically authorized by this or
other appropriation act.
Family and children endowment
account – family and children
investment fund (365-00-7010)...................................................No limit
Optional death benefit plan
reserve fund (365-00-7357).........................................................No limit
Group insurance reserve fund (365-00-7358)...................................No limit
Optional death benefit plan
reserve fund (365-00-7357-9100)................................................No limit
Senior services trust fund (365-00-7550-7600)................................No limit
(b) Expenditures may be made from the expense reserve of the
Kansas public employees retirement fund (365-00-7002) for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, for the following specified purposes:
Agency operations (365-00-7002-7400)....................................$37,672,526
Provided, That expenditures from the agency operations account may be
made for official hospitality.
Investment-related expenses (365-00-7002-8000)...........................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 38-
2102, and amendments thereto, the amount prescribed by K.S.A. 38-
2102(d)(4), and amendments thereto, to be transferred on July 1, 2025, by
the director of accounts and reports from the Kansas endowment for youth
fund to the children's initiatives fund shall be $51,848,685.
Sec. 51.
KANSAS HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

HB 2082 48
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (058-00-1000-0103)...............................$1,202,922
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $500: Provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not to exceed $174,000 may be made from
this account for mediation services contracted with Kansas legal services.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Education and training fund (058-00-2282-2000)............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the education and training
fund for operating expenditures for the commission's education and
training programs for the general public, including official hospitality:
Provided further, That the executive director is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for such programs: And provided further, That such
fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses
incurred for such training programs, including official hospitality: And
provided further, That all fees received for such programs shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the education
and training fund.
State and local fair employment practices –
federal fund (058-00-3016-3000)................................................No limit
Sec. 52.
STATE CORPORATION COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Public service
regulation fund (143-00-2019-0100)...........................................No limit
Provided, however, That expenditures from the public service regulation
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,030.
Gas pipeline inspection
fee fund (143-00-2023-1100).......................................................No limit
Conservation fee fund (143-00-2130-2000).....................................No limit
Provided, That any expenditure made from the conservation fee fund for

HB 2082 49
plugging abandoned wells, cleanup of pollution from oil and gas activities
and testing of wells shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation
imposed on this fund: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from this fund for debt collection and set-off administration: And provided
further, That a percentage of the fees collected, not to exceed 27%, shall be
transferred from the conservation fee fund to the accounting services
recovery fund (173-00-6105-4010) of the department of administration for
services rendered in collection efforts: And provided further, That all
expenditures made from the conservation fee fund for debt collection and
set-off administration shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation
imposed on this fund: And provided further, That the state corporation
commission shall include as part of the fiscal year 2026 budget estimates
for the state corporation commission submitted pursuant to K.S.A. 75-
3717, and amendments thereto, a three-year projection of receipts to and
expenditures from the conservation fee fund for fiscal years 2026, 2027
and 2028.
Abandoned oil and gas
well fund (143-00-2143-2100)....................................................No limit
Natural gas underground storage
fee fund (143-00-2181-2120)......................................................No limit
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (143-00-2316-2300)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences conducted
by the state corporation commission for staff and members of the state
corporation commission: Provided further, That the state corporation
commission is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such
inservice workshops and conferences: And provided further, That such fees
shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenditures
incurred for conducting such inservice workshops and conferences: And
provided further, That all moneys received for such fees shall be deposited
in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the inservice education
workshop fee fund.
Facility conservation improvement
program fund (143-00-2432-2400)..............................................No limit
Energy grants
management fund (143-00-2667)................................................No limit
Motor carrier license
fees fund (143-00-2812-5500).....................................................No limit
Energy efficiency conservation
block grant – federal fund (143-00-3157)...................................No limit

HB 2082 50
Energy efficiency revolving loan program –
ARRA federal fund (143-00-3161)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the energy efficiency
revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund for the energy efficiency
revolving loan program pursuant to vouchers approved by the chairperson
of the state corporation commission or by a person or persons designated
by the chairperson: Provided further, That the state corporation
commission is hereby authorized to establish the energy efficiency
revolving loan program for the purpose of making loans for energy
conservation and other energy-related activities: And provided further, That
loans under such program shall be made at an interest rate established by
the state corporation commission: And provided further, That the state
corporation commission is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with
other state agencies and with persons, as may be necessary, to administer
the energy efficiency revolving loan program: And provided further, That
any person who agrees to receive money from the energy efficiency
revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund shall enter into an agreement
requiring such person to submit a written report to the state corporation
commission detailing and accounting for all expenditures and receipts
related to the use of the moneys received from the energy efficiency
revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund: And provided further, That
moneys repaid to the energy efficiency revolving loan program shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the energy
efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund: And provided
further, That, on or before the 10th day of each month, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the
energy efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of repaid moneys in the
energy efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund for the
preceding month; and (2) the net earnings rate for the pooled money
investment portfolio for the preceding month.
Energy efficiency revolving loan fund –
federal fund..................................................................................No limit
Special one-call –
federal fund (143-00-3477-3477)................................................No limit
Gas pipeline safety program –
federal fund (143-00-3632-3000)................................................No limit
One call – federal fund (143-00-3633-3120)....................................No limit
Underground natural gas storage –
federal fund (143-00-3639-3641)................................................No limit
Energy community revitalization –
federal fund (143-00-3656-3656)................................................No limit

HB 2082 51
Energy conservation plan –
federal fund (143-00-3682).........................................................No limit
Municipal natural gas utility distribution
grant program ARPA fund (143-00-3756)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the municipal natural gas
utility distribution grant program ARPA fund for providing small
municipalities currently being served by a natural gas gathering field to
design, construct and install natural gas distribution lines that connect to a
natural gas service provider and infrastructure for such lines: Provided
further, That the above agency shall establish an application process to
award such grants to eligible municipalities: And provided further, That the
above agency shall expend a partial amount of the grant to eligible
municipalities for the completion of a natural gas cost of service and
revenue rate requirement study on proposed natural gas distribution lines:
And provided further, That the municipality shall contract with an external
and reputable entity to conduct and complete a natural gas cost of service
and revenue rate requirement study that studies the cost of service of such
distribution lines, including the cost of the natural gas, natural gas
transport, distribution, distribution labor, maintenance and administration
of such lines, and the costs of maintaining and upgrading the natural gas
distribution lines in the city limits of such municipality: And provided
further, That such study shall provide the municipality with a natural gas
utility rate that recovers actual costs for the maintenance and necessary
upgrades of the natural gas distribution lines in the city limits of such
municipality: And provided further, That such municipality shall
implement and charge a rate that recovers the actual costs for the
maintenance and necessary upgrades of the natural gas distribution lines in
the city limits of such municipality: And provided further, That such
municipality shall identify and contract with a natural gas service provider
for the provision of such natural gas utility: And provided further, That,
upon completion of such study, implementation of such rate and contract
provision of service, the above agency shall expend the remaining amount
of the grant to the municipality for the design, construction and installation
of such lines and infrastructure.
Underground injection control class II –
federal fund (143-00-3768-3700)................................................No limit
Suspense fund (143-00-9007-9000)..................................................No limit
High efficiency electric
home rebate – federal fund..........................................................No limit
Home owner managing
energy savings – federal fund......................................................No limit
Grid resilience BIL formula – federal fund......................................No limit
(b) Expenditures for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by the state

HB 2082 52
corporation commission from the conservation fee fund (143-00-2130-
2000) or the abandoned oil and gas well fund (143-00-2143-2100) may be
made for the service of independent on-site supervision of well plugging
contracts: Provided, That all such expenditures from the conservation fee
fund or the abandoned oil and gas well fund for the purpose of plugging of
abandoned oil and gas wells during fiscal year 2026 shall be subject to the
competitive bidding requirements of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments
thereto, and shall not be exempt from such competitive bidding
requirements on the basis of the estimated amount of such purchases.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, the chairperson of the state corporation
commission, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
funds from any special revenue fund or funds of the state corporation
commission to any other special revenue fund or funds of the state
corporation commission. The chairperson of the state corporation
commission shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 55-164, 66-138 or 66-1,142b, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, all moneys received from civil fines and
penalties charged and collected by the state corporation commission under
K.S.A. 55-164, 66-138 or 66-1,142b, and amendments thereto, in the
conservation fee fund (143-00-2130-2000), the public service regulation
fund (143-00-2019-0100) and the motor carrier license fees fund (143-00-
2812-5500) shall be remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and deposited in
the state treasury and credited to the state general fund.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $100,000 from the public
service regulation fund (143-00-2019-0100) of the state corporation
commission to the state general fund.
Sec. 53.
CITIZENS' UTILITY RATEPAYER BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Utility regulatory fee fund (122-00-2030-2000)..........................$1,372,864
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to other
purposes for which expenditures may be made by the citizens' utility
ratepayer board from the utility regulatory fee fund (122-00-2030-2000)

HB 2082 53
for fiscal year 2026 for the citizens' utility ratepayer board as authorized
by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute to the
contrary, if the total expenditures authorized to be expended on contracts
for professional services by the citizens' utility ratepayer board by the
expenditure limitation prescribed by subsection (a) are not expended or
encumbered for fiscal year 2026, then the amount equal to the remaining
amount of such expenditure authority for fiscal year 2026 may be
expended from the utility regulatory fee fund for fiscal year 2026 pursuant
to contracts for professional services and any such expenditure for fiscal
year 2026 shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the
utility regulatory fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 54.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Printing plant improvements (173-00-1000-8546).........................$400,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, expenditures from the dependent care assistance program fund for
salaries and wages and other operating expenditures shall not exceed
$200,000: Provided, That on the effective date of this act, the provisions of
the proviso for the dependent care assistance program fund (173-00-7740-
7799) in section 56(c) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas
are hereby declared to be null and void and shall have no force and effect.
Sec. 55.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Licensing verification portal (173-00-1000-0030).......................$1,524,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the licensing verification
portal account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures (173-00-1000-0200)...............................$5,381,681
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-2935, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, in addition to other positions within the
department of administration in the unclassified service as prescribed by
law, expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures account
for three employees in the unclassified service under the Kansas civil
service act.

HB 2082 54
Office of public advocates (173-00-1000-0300).............................$566,230
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of public
advocates account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures
from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
KPERS bonds debt service (173-00-1000-0440).......................$85,628,490
Budget analysis (173-00-1000-0520)...........................................$2,313,769
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the budget analysis account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: And provided further, That expenditures from this account for
official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
ERP project (173-00-1000)........................................................$26,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the ERP project account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts as of June 30, 2025,
are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Docking state office
building rehabilitation and repair (173-00-1000-8545); security against
antisemitism (173-00-1000-0650); printing plant improvements (173-00-
1000-8546); and cedar crest living quarters expenses (173-00-1000-0631).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the expanded
lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
KPERS bond debt service (173-00-1700-1704).........................$38,648,221
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds or indirect cost
recoveries authorized by law shall not exceed the following:
Budget stabilization fund (173-00-1600-1600)..........................................$0
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-6706, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, on or before the 10th day of each
month during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer the interest earnings of the budget stabilization
fund from the budget stabilization fund to the state water plan fund:
Provided, however, That once the aggregate interest earnings transfers
from the budget stabilization fund to the state water plan fund reach
$30,000,000, then no additional transfers to the state water plan fund shall
be made.
Federal cash
management fund (173-00-2001-2200).......................................No limit
Curtis office building maintenance
reserve fund (173-00-2010-2190)................................................No limit

HB 2082 55
Purchasing fees fund (173-00-2017-2130).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the purchasing fees fund
for operating expenditures of the division of purchases, including training
seminars and official hospitality: Provided further, That the director of
purchases is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for operating
expenditures incurred to reproduce and disseminate purchasing
information, administer vendor applications, administer state contracts and
conduct training seminars, including official hospitality: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of such
operating expenses: And provided further, That all fees received for such
operating expenses shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the purchasing fees fund.
Building and ground fund (173-00-2028-2000)...............................No limit
Municipal accounting and training services
recovery fund (173-00-2033-1850).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the municipal accounting
and training services recovery fund to provide general ledger, payroll
reporting, utilities billing, data processing, and accounting services to
municipalities and to provide training programs conducted for municipal
government personnel, including official hospitality: Provided further,
That the director of accounts and reports is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for such services and programs: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed to cover all or part of the operating
expenditures incurred in providing such services and programs, including
official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received for such
services and programs, including official hospitality, shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the municipal accounting and
training services recovery fund.
State revolving fund services
fee fund (173-00-2038-2700)......................................................No limit
Budget fees fund (173-00-2191-2100).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the budget fees fund for
operating expenditures for the division of the budget, including training
programs, special projects and official hospitality: Provided further, That
the director of the budget is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect
fees for such training programs: And provided further, That fees for such
training programs and special projects shall be fixed in order to recover all
or part of the operating expenses incurred for such training programs and
special projects, including official hospitality: And provided further, That
all fees received for such training programs and special projects and all
fees received by the division of the budget under the open records act for

HB 2082 56
providing access to or furnishing copies of public records shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the budget fees
fund.
General fees fund (173-00-2197)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
operating expenditures for the division of personnel services, including
human resources programs and official hospitality: Provided further, That
the director of personnel services is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees: And provided further, That fees shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of the operating expenses incurred, including official
hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received, including fees
received under the open records act for providing access to or furnishing
copies of public records, shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund.
Surplus property program fund –
on budget (173-00-2323-2300)....................................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (173-00-2408-2030)..........................................No limit
Budget equipment
conversion fund (173-00-2434-2090)..........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and equipment – recycling
program fund (173-00-2435-2031)..............................................No limit
Preventive healthcare
program fund (173-00-2556-2550)..............................................No limit
State emergency fund (173-00-2581-2150)......................................No limit
Construction defects
recovery fund (173-00-2632-2615).............................................No limit
Property contingency fund (173-00-2640-2060)..............................No limit
Canceled warrants
payment fund (173-00-2645-2070).............................................No limit
Governor's council of economic advisers private
operations fund – (173-00-2761).................................................No limit
Bioscience development fund (173-00-2765-2703).........................No limit
Department of administration
audit services fund (173-00-2819-2819).....................................No limit
Flood control emergency –
federal fund (173-00-3024-3020)................................................No limit
Older Americans act title IIIB
long-term care ombudsman
federal fund (173-00-3287).........................................................No limit
Older Americans act title VII

HB 2082 57
long-term care ombudsman
federal fund (173-00-3358...........................................................No limit
Title XIX – office of the public advocates
medical assistance program
federal fund (173-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Title XX – ARPLTC
ombudsman fund (173-00-3680).................................................No limit
ARPA agency state fiscal
recovery fund (173-00-3756).......................................................No limit
Human resource information systems cost
recovery fund (173-00-6103-5700).............................................No limit
Accounting services
recovery fund (173-00-6105).......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the accounting services
recovery fund for the operating expenditures, including official hospitality,
of the department of administration: Provided further, That the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
services or sales provided by the department of administration that are not
specifically authorized by any other statute: And provided further, That all
fees received for such services or sales shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the accounting services
recovery fund.
Motor pool service fund (173-00-6109-4020)..................................No limit
Digital imaging program fund (173-00-6121-6121).........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the digital imaging
program fund for grants to state agencies for digital document imaging
projects.
State buildings
operating fund (173-00-6148-4100)............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of administration is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect a real estate property leasing services fee at a reasonable
rate per square foot of space leased by state agencies as approved by the
secretary of administration under K.S.A. 75-3765, and amendments
thereto, to recover the costs incurred by the department of administration
in providing services to state agencies relating to leases of real property:
Provided further, That each state agency that is party to a lease of real
property that is approved by the secretary of administration under K.S.A.
75-3765, and amendments thereto, shall remit to the secretary of
administration the real estate property leasing services fee upon receipt of
the billing therefor: And provided further, That all moneys received for real
estate property leasing services fees shall be deposited in the state treasury
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments

HB 2082 58
thereto, and shall be credited to the state buildings operating fund or the
building and ground fund (173-00-2028-2000), as determined and directed
by the secretary of administration: And provided further, That the net
proceeds from the sale of all or any part of the Topeka state hospital
property, as defined by K.S.A. 75-37,123(a), and amendments thereto,
shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state buildings
operating fund or the building and ground fund, as determined and
directed by the secretary of administration: And provided further, That the
secretary of administration is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect a
surcharge against all state agency leased square footage in Shawnee
county, including both state-owned and privately owned buildings: And
provided further, That all moneys received for such surcharge shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the state
buildings operating fund or the building and ground fund, as determined
and directed by the secretary of administration.
Surplus property program fund –
off budget (173-00-6150-6150)...................................................No limit
Architectural services
recovery fund (173-00-6151-5500).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the architectural services
recovery fund for operating expenditures for the division of facilities
management: Provided further, That the director of facilities management
is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for services provided to
other state agencies not directly related to the construction of a capital
improvement project: And provided further, That all fees received for all
such services shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the architectural services recovery fund.
Intragovernmental printing and central mail
service fund (173-00-6165).........................................................No limit
Intragovernmental printing service depreciation
reserve fund (173-00-6167-9810)................................................No limit
State workers compensation
self-insurance fund (173-00-6170-6170).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state workers compensation self-
insurance fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for salaries and
wages and other operating expenditures shall not exceed $5,354,839.
Dwight D. Eisenhower
statue fund (173-00-7243-7243)..................................................No limit
Kansas gold star families
memorial fund (173-00-7244-7244)............................................No limit
Kansas suffragist

HB 2082 59
memorial fund (173-00-7245-7245)............................................No limit
Long-term care ombudsman gift and
grant fund (173-00-7258-7280)...................................................No limit
Ad astra sculpture fund (173-00-7334).............................................No limit
1st Kansas (colored) voluntary infantry
regiment mural fund (173-00-7345)............................................No limit
Health insurance premium
reserve fund (173-00-7350-7350)................................................No limit
Bid and contract
deposit fund (173-00-7609-7060)................................................No limit
Federal withholding tax
clearing fund (173-00-7701-7080)..............................................No limit
Non-state employer group
benefit fund (173-00-7707-7710)................................................No limit
Cafeteria benefits fund (173-00-7720-7723)....................................No limit
State leave payment
reserve fund (173-00-7730-7350)................................................No limit
Dependent care assistance
program fund (173-00-7740-7799)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the dependent care assistance program
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for salaries and wages and
other operating expenditures shall not exceed $200,000.
Health benefits administration clearing fund –
remit admin service org (173-00-7746-7746)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health benefits administration
clearing fund – remit admin service org for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, for salaries and wages and other operating expenditures shall not
exceed $7,465,000.
Equipment lease purchase program administration
clearing fund (173-00-8701-8000)..............................................No limit
Facilities conservation
improvement fund (173-00-8745-4912)......................................No limit
State gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100)............................No limit
Suspense fund (173-00-9075-9220)..................................................No limit
Electronic funds transfer
suspense fund (173-00-9175-9490).............................................No limit
Friends of cedar crest endowment fund.....................................................$0
Provided, That on or before the 10th day of each month commencing on
July 1, 2025, during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer from the state general fund to the friends of cedar crest
endowment fund interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance
of moneys in the friends of cedar crest endowment fund for the preceding
month; and (2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment

HB 2082 60
portfolio for the preceding month.
Emil Joseph Kapaun memorial fund.................................................No limit
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, for the
secretary of administration, as part of the system of payroll accounting
formulated under K.S.A. 75-5501, and amendments thereto, to establish a
payroll deduction plan, for the purpose of allowing insurers, who are
authorized to do business in the state of Kansas, to offer to state employees
accident, disability, specified disease and hospital indemnity products,
which may be purchased by such employees: Provided, however, That any
such insurer and indemnity product shall be approved by the Kansas state
employees health care commission prior to the establishment of such
payroll deduction: Provided, That upon notification of an employing
agency's receipt of written authorization by any state employee, the
director of accounts and reports shall make periodic deductions of amounts
as specified in such authorization from the salary or wages of such state
employee for the purpose of purchasing such indemnity products:
Provided further, That, subject to the approval of the secretary of
administration, the director of accounts and reports may prescribe
procedures, limitations and conditions for making payroll deductions
pursuant to this section.
(e) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$210,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the state general fund for the purpose of
reimbursing the state general fund for the cost of providing purchasing
services to the department of transportation.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to approve refinancing of equipment
being financed by state agencies through the department's equipment
financing program. Such refinancing project is hereby approved for the
purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from moneys appropriated in any capital
improvement account of any special revenue fund or funds or in any
capital improvement account of the state general fund for the above
agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from any such capital improvement account of any special revenue

HB 2082 61
fund or funds or any such capital improvement account of the state general
fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of making emergency repairs to
any facility that is under the charge, care, management or control of the
department of administration as provided by law: Provided, That the
secretary of administration shall make a full report on such repairs and
expenditures to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(h) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the state economic
development initiatives fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the
state economic development initiatives fund in an amount certified by the
director of the budget that shall be equal to 75% of the amount estimated
by the director of the budget to be transferred and credited to the state
economic development initiatives fund during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, except that such amount shall be proportionally adjusted during
fiscal year 2026 with respect to any change in the moneys to be transferred
and credited to the state economic development initiatives fund during
fiscal year 2026. All moneys transferred and credited to the state economic
development initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the
amount debited and credited to the state economic development initiatives
fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall adjust
the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's receivables and to
the state economic development initiatives fund pursuant to this
subsection, to reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to the
state economic development initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state treasurer
of all amounts debited and credited to the state economic development
initiatives fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and
adjustments thereto made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer
shall enter all such amounts debited and credited and shall make
reductions and adjustments thereto on the books and records kept and
maintained for the state economic development initiatives fund by the state
treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(i) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the correctional
institutions building fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the
correctional institutions building fund in an amount certified by the
director of the budget that shall be equal to 80% of the amount estimated
by the director of the budget to be transferred and credited to the
correctional institutions building fund during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, except that such amount shall be proportionally adjusted during
fiscal year 2026 with respect to any change in the moneys to be transferred

HB 2082 62
and credited to the correctional institutions building fund during fiscal year
2026. All moneys transferred and credited to the correctional institutions
building fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the amount debited and
credited to the correctional institutions building fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall adjust
the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's receivables and to
the correctional institutions building fund pursuant to this subsection, to
reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to the correctional
institutions building fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state treasurer
of all amounts debited and credited to the correctional institutions building
fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and adjustments thereto
made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer shall enter all such
amounts debited and credited and shall make reductions and adjustments
thereto on the books and records kept and maintained for the correctional
institutions building fund by the state treasurer in accordance with the
notice thereof.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
administration, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the department of
administration to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from
the state general fund for the department of administration. The secretary
of administration shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(k) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
SIBF – state
building insurance (173-00-8100-8920)....................................$710,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b05, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the SIBF – state building insurance account of the state institutions
building fund for state building insurance premiums.
(l) There is appropriated for the above agency from the correctional
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
CIBF – state
building insurance (173-00-8600-8930)....................................$810,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b09, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the CIBF – state building insurance account of the correctional institutions

HB 2082 63
building fund for state building insurance premiums.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts from the
appropriate federal fund or funds of the Kansas department for aging and
disability services to the older Americans act title IIIB long-term care
ombudsman federal fund (173-00-3287) and the older Americans act title
VII long-term care ombudsman federal fund (173-00-3358) of the
department of administration to reimburse the agency for costs related to
administering federal programs:
(n) (1) (A) Prior to August 15, 2025, the state board of regents shall
determine and certify to the director of the budget each of the specific
amounts from the amounts appropriated from the state general fund or
from the moneys appropriated and available in the special revenue funds
for each of the regents agencies to be transferred to and debited to the 27th
payroll adjustment account of the state general fund by the director of
accounts and reports pursuant to this subsection: Provided, That the
aggregate of all such amounts certified to the director of the budget shall
be an amount that is equal to or more than $1,184,067. The certification by
the state board of regents shall specify the amount in each account of the
state general fund or in each special revenue fund, or account thereof, that
is designated by the state board of regents pursuant to this subsection for
each of the regents agencies to be transferred to and debited to the 27th
payroll adjustment account in the state general fund by the director of
accounts and reports pursuant to this subsection. At the same time as such
certification is transmitted to the director of the budget, the state board of
regents shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of
legislative research.
(B) The director of the budget shall review each such certification
from the state board of regents and shall certify a copy of each such
certification from the state board of regents to the director of accounts and
reports. At the same time as such certification is transmitted to the director
of accounts and reports, the director of the budget shall transmit a copy of
each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(C) On August 15, 2025, in accordance with the certification by the
director of the budget that is submitted to the director of accounts and
reports under this subsection, the appropriation for fiscal year 2026 for
each account of the state general fund, state economic development
initiatives fund, state water plan fund and children's initiatives fund that is
appropriated or reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature
is hereby respectively lapsed by the amount equal to the amount certified
under this subsection.
(2) In determining the amounts to be certified to the director of

HB 2082 64
accounts and reports in accordance with this subsection, the director of the
budget and the state board of regents shall consider any changed
circumstances and unanticipated reductions in expenditures or
unanticipated and required expenditures by the regents agencies for fiscal
year 2026.
(3) As used in this subsection, "regents agency" means the state board
of regents, Fort Hays state university, Kansas state university, Kansas state
university extension systems and agriculture research programs, Kansas
state university veterinary medical center, Emporia state university,
Pittsburg state university, the university of Kansas, the university of
Kansas medical center and Wichita state university.
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:
(A) Any money held in trust in a trust fund or held in trust in any
other special revenue fund or funds of any regents agency;
(B) any moneys received from any agency or authority of the federal
government or from any other federal source, other than any such federal
moneys that are credited to or may be received and credited to special
revenue funds of a regents agency and that are determined by the state
board of regents to be federal moneys that may be transferred to and
debited to the 27th payroll adjustment account of the state general fund by
the director of accounts and reports pursuant to this subsection;
(C) any account of the Kansas educational building fund; or
(D) any fund of any regents agency in the state treasury, as
determined by the director of the budget, that would experience financial
or administrative difficulties as a result of executing the provisions of this
subsection, including, but not limited to, cash-flow problems, the inability
to meet ordinary expenditure obligations, or any conflicts with prevailing
contracts, compacts or other provisions of law.
(5) Each amount transferred from any special revenue fund of any
regents agency to the state general fund pursuant to this subsection is
transferred to reimburse the state general fund for accounting, auditing,
budgeting, legal, payroll, personnel and purchasing services and any other
governmental services that are performed on behalf of the regents agency
involved by other state agencies that receive appropriations from the state
general fund to provide such services.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, for the
secretary of administration to fix, charge and collect fees for architectural,

HB 2082 65
engineering and management services provided for capital improvement
projects of the state board of regents or any state educational institution, as
defined by K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments thereto, for which the
department of administration provides such services and which are
financed in whole or in part by gifts, bequests or donations made by one or
more private individuals or other private entities: Provided, That such fees
for such services are hereby authorized to be fixed, charged and collected
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-1269, and amendments
thereto, notwithstanding any provisions of K.S.A. 75-1269, and
amendments thereto, to the contrary: Provided further, That all such fees
received shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the architectural services recovery fund.
(p) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the expanded lottery
act revenues fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the expanded
lottery act revenues fund in an amount certified by the director of the
budget that shall be equal to the amount estimated by the director of the
budget to be transferred and credited to the expanded lottery act revenues
fund during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except that such amount
shall be proportionally adjusted during fiscal year 2026 with respect to any
change in the moneys to be transferred and credited to the expanded
lottery act revenues fund during fiscal year 2026. All moneys transferred
and credited to the expanded lottery act revenues fund during fiscal year
2026 shall reduce the amount debited and credited to the expanded lottery
act revenues fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall adjust
the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's receivables and to
the expanded lottery act revenues fund pursuant to this subsection, to
reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to the expanded lottery
act revenues fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state treasurer
of all amounts debited and credited to the expanded lottery act revenues
fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and adjustments thereto
made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer shall enter all such
amounts debited and credited and shall make reductions and adjustments
thereto on the books and records kept and maintained for the expanded
lottery act revenues fund by the state treasurer in accordance with the
notice thereof.
(q) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the children's
initiatives fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the children's
initiatives fund in an amount certified by the director of the budget that

HB 2082 66
shall be equal to 50% of the amount estimated by the director of the
budget to be transferred and credited to the children's initiatives fund
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except that such amount shall
be proportionally adjusted during fiscal year 2026 with respect to any
change in the moneys to be transferred and credited to the children's
initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026. Among other appropriate factors,
the director of the budget shall take into consideration the estimated and
actual receipts and interest earnings of the Kansas endowment for youth
fund for fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026 in determining the amount to
be certified under this subsection. All moneys transferred and credited to
the children's initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the
amount debited and credited to the children's initiatives fund under this
subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall adjust
the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's receivables and to
the children's initiatives fund pursuant to this subsection to reflect all
moneys actually transferred and credited to the children's initiatives fund
during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state treasurer
of all amounts debited and credited to the children's initiatives fund
pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and adjustments thereto
made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer shall enter all such
amounts debited and credited and shall make reductions and adjustments
thereto on the books and records kept and maintained for the children's
initiatives fund by the state treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(4) The reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the
director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to this
subsection for the children's initiatives fund to account for moneys actually
received that are to be transferred and credited to the children's initiatives
fund shall be made after the reductions and adjustments prescribed to be
made by the director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer
pursuant to subsection (r) for the Kansas endowment for youth fund to
account for moneys actually received that are to be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the Kansas endowment for youth fund.
(r) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the Kansas endowment
for youth fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the Kansas
endowment for youth fund in an amount certified by the director of the
budget that shall be equal to 75% of the amount approved for expenditure
by the children's cabinet during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, as
certified by the director of the budget. All moneys received and credited to
the Kansas endowment for youth fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce
the amount debited and credited to the Kansas endowment for youth fund

HB 2082 67
under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall adjust
the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's receivables and to
the Kansas endowment for youth fund pursuant to this subsection to reflect
all moneys actually transferred and credited to the Kansas endowment for
youth fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state treasurer
of all amounts debited and credited to the Kansas endowment for youth
fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and adjustments thereto
made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer shall enter all such
amounts debited and credited and shall make reductions and adjustments
thereto on the books and records kept and maintained for the Kansas
endowment for youth fund by the state treasurer in accordance with the
notice thereof.
(4) The reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the
director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to this
subsection for the Kansas endowment for youth fund to account for
moneys actually received that are to be deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the Kansas endowment for youth fund shall be made before the
reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the director of
accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to subsection (q) for
the children's initiatives fund to account for moneys actually received that
are to be transferred and credited to the children's initiatives fund.
(s) On July 1, 2025, for fiscal year 2026, the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to receive gifts, grants, bequests or
donations of money for the benefit of cedar crest: Provided, That such
gifts, grants, bequests or donations of money shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the friends of cedar crest
endowment fund.
(t) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, to
review authorization for friends of cedar crest association to enter into an
agreement with a local community not-for-profit foundation and to
receive, administer and invest any moneys donated, bequeathed, granted,
awarded or contributed from any private or public source, including the
moneys in the friends of cedar crest endowment fund, outside the state
treasury for the general benefit of cedar crest: Provided, That

HB 2082 68
consideration shall be made for interest earned thereon, to be deposited,
administered and disbursed by such local community foundation to the
friends of cedar crest association for the general benefit of cedar crest.
(u) On July 1, 2025, the title XIX – long-term care ombudsman
medical assistance program federal fund (173-00-3414) of the department
of administration is hereby redesignated as the title XIX – office of the
public advocates medical assistance program federal fund of the
department of administration.
(v) On July 1, 2025, the CRRSA 2021 LTC ombudsman fund (173-
00-3680) of the department of administration is hereby redesignated as the
title XX – ARPLTC ombudsman fund of the department of administration.
(w) On July 1, 2025, the intragovernmental printing service fund
(173-00-6165) of the department of administration is hereby redesignated
as the intragovernmental printing and central mail service fund of the
department of administration.
Sec. 56.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair (335-00-1000-0050)............................$4,250,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and repair
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Vendor contract (335-00-1000-0070)...........................................$2,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vendor contract account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Agency IT emergency fund (335-00-1000)..................................$2,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the agency IT emergency
fund for unforeseen information technology costs for executive branch
agencies, including, but not limited to, cybersecurity, software licenses and
hardware costs: Provided further, That the chief information technology
officer of the office of information technology services or their designee,
in consultation with the director of the budget, may review applications
from executive branch agencies and determine if payment of unforeseen
information technology costs for executive branch agencies will be made
from the agency IT emergency fund: And provided further, That upon
approval of any payment for unforeseen information technology costs, the
chief information technology officer of the office of information
technology services shall certify the amount to the director of accounts and
reports and transmit a copy of such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research.

HB 2082 69
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Public safety broadband
services fund (335-00-2125-2125)..............................................No limit
GIS contracting
services fund (335-00-2163-2163)..............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (335-00-3753-3772)...................................No limit
State and local implementation grant –
federal fund (335-00-3576-3576)................................................No limit
KS SLCGP grant – federal fund.......................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (335-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
GIS contracting
services fund (335-00-6009-6009)..............................................No limit
Sec. 57.
KANSAS INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Kansas information security office (335-00-1000-0060).............$7,723,902
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas information
security office account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Information technology fund (335-00-6110-4030)...........................No limit
Provided, That any moneys collected from a fee increase for information
services recommended by the governor shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the information technology
fund.
Information technology reserve fund (335-00-6147-4080)..............No limit
Sec. 58.
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Administrative hearings

HB 2082 70
office fund (178-00-2582)...........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the administrative hearings office fund
for official hospitality shall not exceed $50.
Sec. 59.
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Office of the child advocate (114-00-1000-0300)...........................$750,576
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of the child
advocate account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures
from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Sec. 60.
STATE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (562-00-1000-0103)...............................$1,510,861
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
BOTA filing fee fund (562-00-2240-2240)..................................$1,103,069
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (562-00-3756).............................................No limit
Sec. 61.
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the division of vehicles operating fund (565-00-2089-2020) of
the department of revenue is hereby decreased from $56,505,635 to
$56,088,838.
Sec. 62.
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (565-00-1000-0303).............................$17,769,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025 is hereby reappropriated for

HB 2082 71
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,500.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Repossessed certificates of title
fee fund (565-00-2015-2070)......................................................No limit
Special training fund (565-00-2016-2000).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the special training fund
for operating expenditures, including official hospitality, incurred for
conferences, training seminars, workshops and examinations: Provided
further, That the secretary of revenue is hereby authorized to fix, charge
and collect fees for conferences, training seminars, workshops and
examinations sponsored or cosponsored by the department of revenue:
And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all
or part of the operating expenditures incurred for such conferences,
training seminars, workshops and examinations or for qualifying
applicants for such conferences, training seminars, workshops and
examinations: And provided further, That all fees received for conferences,
training seminars, workshops and examinations shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the special training fund.
Recovery fund for enforcement actions
and attorney fees (565-00-2021-2060)........................................No limit
Photo fee fund (565-00-2084-2140).................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-299, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made from
the photo fee fund for administration and operation of the driver license
program and related support operations in the division of administration of
the department of revenue, including costs of administering the provisions
of K.S.A. 8-240, 8-243, 8-267, 8-1324 and 8-1325, and amendments
thereto, relating to drivers licenses, instruction permits and identification
cards.
Sand royalty fund (565-00-2087-2010)............................................No limit
Division of vehicles
operating fund (565-00-2089-2020)......................................$58,520,965
Provided, That all receipts collected under authority of K.S.A. 74-2012,
and amendments thereto, shall be credited to the division of vehicles
operating fund: Provided further, That any expenditure from the division
of vehicles operating fund of the department of revenue to reimburse the
audit services fund (540-00-9204-9000) of the division of post audit for a

HB 2082 72
financial-compliance audit in an amount certified by the legislative post
auditor shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the
division of vehicles operating fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
68-416, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be
made from this fund for the administration and operation of the department
of revenue.
Commercial vehicle administrative
system fund (565-00-2098-2098)................................................No limit
Vehicle dealers and manufacturers
fee fund (565-00-2189-2030)......................................................No limit
Kansas qualified agricultural ethyl alcohol
producer incentive fund (565-00-2215).......................................No limit
Distinctive license plate fund (565-00-2232-2230)..........................No limit
VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund (565-00-2244-2170)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-2021, and
amendments thereto, or of any other statute, expenditures may be made
from the VIPS/CAMA technology hardware fund for the purposes of
upgrading the VIPS/CAMA computer hardware and software for the state
or for the counties and for administration and operation of the department
of revenue.
Automated tax systems fund (565-00-2265-2265)...........................No limit
MSA compliance fund (565-00-2274-2274).....................................No limit
Microfilming fund (565-00-2281-2270)...........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the microfilming fund to
operate and maintain a microfilming activity to sell microfilming services
to other state agencies: Provided further, That all moneys received for such
services shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the microfilming fund.
Dyed diesel fuel fee fund (565-00-2286-2280)................................No limit
Electronic databases fee fund (565-00-2287-2180)..........................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-2022, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made from
the electronic databases fee fund for the purposes of operating
expenditures, including expenditures for capital outlay; of operating,
maintaining or improving the vehicle information processing system
(VIPS), the Kansas computer assisted mass appraisal system (CAMA) and
other electronic database systems of the department of revenue, including
the costs incurred to provide access to or to furnish copies of public
records in such database systems and for the administration and operation
of the department of revenue.

HB 2082 73
Cigarette/tobacco products
regulation fund (565-00-2294-2190)...........................................No limit
Alcoholic beverage control
modernization fund (565-00-2299-2299)....................................No limit
Hazmat fee fund (565-00-2365-2300)..............................................No limit
State charitable gaming
regulation fund (565-00-2381-2385)...........................................No limit
Kansas retail dealer
incentive fund (565-00-2387-2380).............................................No limit
Division of vehicles
modernization fund (565-00-2390-2390)....................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (565-00-2417-2050)..........................................No limit
Forfeited property fee fund (565-00-2428-2200).............................No limit
Tax amnesty recovery fund (565-00-2462-2462).............................No limit
Setoff services revenue fund (565-00-2617-2080)...........................No limit
Publications fee fund (565-00-2663-2090).......................................No limit
Child support enforcement contractual
agreement fund (565-00-2683-2110)...........................................No limit
County treasurers' vehicle licensing
fee fund (565-00-2687-2120)......................................................No limit
Reappraisal
reimbursement fund (565-00-2693-2130)...................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for the costs incurred for conducting
appraisals for any county shall be deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the reappraisal reimbursement fund: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for the purpose of conducting
appraisals pursuant to orders of the state board of tax appeals under K.S.A.
79-1479, and amendments thereto.
Fleet rental vehicle
administration fund (565-00-2799-2799)....................................No limit
Commercial driver's license drive test
fee fund (565-00-2816-2816)......................................................No limit
Taxpayer notification costs fund (565-00-2852-2852).....................No limit
Kansas historic site fund (565-00-2872-2872).................................No limit
Gage park improvement authority
sales tax fund (565-00-2874-2874)..............................................No limit
Commercial driver
education fund (565-00-2876-2876)............................................No limit
Drivers license first responders indicator
federal fund (565-00-3179-3179)................................................No limit
Enforcing underage drinking
federal fund (565-00-3219-3219)................................................No limit

HB 2082 74
FDA tobacco program
federal fund (565-00-3330-3330)................................................No limit
Commercial vehicle information systems/network
federal fund (565-00-3244-3244)................................................No limit
Highway planning construction
federal fund (565-00-3333-3333)................................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (565-00-3756).............................................No limit
State and community highway
safety fund (565-00-3815-3815)..................................................No limit
Intra-governmental
service fund (565-00-6132-6101)................................................No limit
Miscellaneous trust
bonds fund (565-00-7556-5180)..................................................No limit
Motor carrier permits escrow
clearing fund (565-00-7581-5400)..............................................No limit
Liquor excise tax guarantee
bond fund (565-00-7604-5190)...................................................No limit
Non-resident contractors cash
bond fund (565-00-7605-5200)...................................................No limit
Bond guaranty fund (565-00-7606-5210).........................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel user cash
bond fund (565-00-7616-5220)...................................................No limit
Motor fuel distributor cash
bond fund (565-00-7617-5230)...................................................No limit
Special county mineral production
tax fund (565-00-7668-5280)......................................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax
administration fund (565-00-7675-5300)....................................No limit
County drug tax fund (565-00-7680-5310)......................................No limit
Escheat proceeds
suspense fund (565-00-7753-5290).............................................No limit
Charitable gaming
refund fund (565-00-9001-9001).................................................No limit
Native American veterans' income
tax refund fund (565-00-9019-9019)...........................................No limit
Privilege tax refund fund (565-00-9031-9300).................................No limit
Suspense fund (565-00-9032-9310)..................................................No limit
Cigarette tax refund fund (565-00-9033-9330)................................No limit
Motor-vehicle fuel tax
refund fund (565-00-9035-9350).................................................No limit
Cereal malt beverage tax
refund fund (565-00-9036-9360).................................................No limit

HB 2082 75
Income tax refund fund (565-00-9038-9370)...................................No limit
Sales tax refund fund (565-00-9039-9380).......................................No limit
Compensating tax
refund fund (565-00-9040-9390).................................................No limit
Alcoholic liquor tax
refund fund (565-00-9041-9400).................................................No limit
Motor carrier tax
refund fund (565-00-9042-9410).................................................No limit
Car company tax fund (565-00-9043-9420).....................................No limit
Protested motor carrier
taxes fund (565-00-9044-9430)...................................................No limit
Tobacco products
refund fund (565-00-9045-9440).................................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax
refund fund (565-00-9049-9455).................................................No limit
Transient guest tax refund fund (established by
K.S.A. 12-1694a) (565-00-9066-9450).......................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel taxes
refund fund (565-00-9069-9010).................................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel taxes
clearing fund (565-00-9070-9710)..............................................No limit
International fuel tax agreement
clearing fund (565-00-9072-9015)..............................................No limit
Transient guest tax refund fund (established by
K.S.A. 12-16,100) (565-00-9074-9480)......................................No limit
Estate tax abatement
refund fund (565-00-9082-9501).................................................No limit
Fleet rental vehicle clearing fund (565-00-9089-9089)....................No limit
Interfund clearing fund (565-00-9096-9510)....................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
clearing fund (565-00-9100-9700)..............................................No limit
International registration plan distribution
clearing fund (565-00-9103-9520)..............................................No limit
Rental motor vehicle excise tax
refund fund (565-00-9106-9730).................................................No limit
Mineral production tax
refund fund (565-00-9121-9540).................................................No limit
Special fuels tax refund fund (565-00-9122-9550)...........................No limit
LP-gas motor fuels
refund fund (565-00-9123-9560).................................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
refund fund (565-00-9124-9570).................................................No limit
Sales tax clearing fund (565-00-9148-9580)....................................No limit

HB 2082 76
Rental motor vehicle excise tax
clearing fund (565-00-9187-9640)..............................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax
clearing fund (565-00-9189-9655)..............................................No limit
County and city retailers sales tax clearing fund – county
and city sales tax (565-00-9190-9610)........................................No limit
City and county compensating use tax
clearing fund (565-00-9191-9620)..............................................No limit
County and city transient guest tax
clearing fund (565-00-9192-9630)..............................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025, January 1, 2026, and April 1,
2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $14,361,897 from
the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the division of vehicles operating fund (565-00-2089-
2020) of the department of revenue for the purpose of financing the cost of
operation and general expense of the division of vehicles and related
operations of the department of revenue.
(d) On August 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $77,250 from the accounting services recovery fund (173-00-
6105-4010) of the department of administration to the setoff services
revenue fund (565-00-2617-2080) of the department of revenue for
reimbursing costs of recovering amounts owed to state agencies under
K.S.A. 75-6201 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,000,000 from the state
general fund to the division of vehicles modernization fund (565-00-2390-
2390) of the department of revenue.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,200,000 from the Kansas
endowment for youth fund (365-00-7000-2000) to the MSA compliance
fund (565-00-2274-2274) of the department of revenue.
Sec. 63.
KANSAS LOTTERY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Sports wagering receipts fund (450-00-2946-2946).........................No limit
Privilege fee repayment fund (450-00-2947-2947)..........................No limit
Lottery operating fund (450-00-5123)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the lottery operating fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $5,000.

HB 2082 77
Expanded lottery act
revenues fund (450-00-5127-5120)......................................................$0
Expanded lottery receipts fund (450-00-5128).................................No limit
Lottery gaming facility
manager fund (450-00-5129-5150).............................................No limit
Lottery prize payment fund (450-00-7381)......................................No limit
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8711, and
amendments thereto, and subject to the provisions of this subsection: (1)
An amount of not less than $2,300,000 shall be certified by the executive
director of the Kansas lottery to the director of accounts and reports on or
before July 15, 2025; and (2) an amount of not less than $4,700,000 shall
be certified by the executive director of the Kansas lottery to the director
of accounts and reports on or before August 15, 2025, and on or before the
15th of each month thereafter through June 15, 2026: Provided, That, upon
receipt of each such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer the amount certified from the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-
5100) to the state gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100) and shall
credit such amount to the state gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100)
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: Provided, however, That, after the
date that an amount of $54,000,000 has been transferred from the lottery
operating fund to the state gaming revenues fund for fiscal year 2026
pursuant to this subsection, the executive director of the Kansas lottery
shall continue to certify amounts to the director of accounts and reports on
or before the 15th of each month through June 15, 2026, except that the
amounts certified after such date shall not be subject to the minimum
amount of $4,700,000: Provided further, That the amounts certified by the
executive director of the Kansas lottery to the director of accounts and
reports, after the date an amount of $54,000,000 has been transferred from
the lottery operating fund to the state gaming revenues fund for fiscal year
2026 pursuant to this subsection, shall be determined by the executive
director so that an aggregate of all amounts certified pursuant to this
subsection for fiscal year 2026 is equal to or more than $71,490,000: And
provided further, That the aggregate of all amounts transferred from the
lottery operating fund to the state gaming revenues fund for fiscal year
2026 pursuant to this subsection shall be equal to or more than
$71,490,000: And provided further, That the transfers prescribed by this
subsection shall be the maximum amount possible while maintaining an
adequate cash balance necessary to make expenditures for prize payments
and operating costs: And provided further, That the transfers prescribed in
this subsection shall include the total profit attributed to the special
veterans benefit game under K.S.A. 74-8724, and amendments thereto:
And provided further, That the transfers prescribed by this subsection shall
be made in lieu of transfers under K.S.A. 74-8711(d), and amendments

HB 2082 78
thereto, for fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the purposes for which expenditures of moneys in
the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) may be made, as authorized
by provisions of K.S.A. 74-8711, and amendments thereto, in fiscal year
2026, moneys in the lottery operating fund may be used for payment of all
costs incurred in the operation and administration of the Kansas lottery, the
Kansas lottery act and the Kansas expanded lottery act.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8724, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the
lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) to the state gaming revenues
fund (173-00-9011-9100) the amount of total profit attributed to the
veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8724, and amendments
thereto, during fiscal year 2026: Provided, That, the transfer to the
veterans benefit lottery game fund (694-00-2303-2303) of the Kansas
office of veterans services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
authorized by section 70(g) represents the total profits derived from the
veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8724, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That on or before August 1, 2026, the executive
director of the lottery shall report the amount of total profit attributed to
the veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8724, and amendments
thereto, during fiscal year 2026 to the director of the budget and the
director of legislative research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 74-8720, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to provide
the name and address of all persons who claim a Kansas lottery prize of
$10,000 or more to the office of inspector general established under
K.S.A. 75-7427, and amendments thereto: Provided, That the office of
inspector general shall use information received pursuant to this subsection
solely for the purposes of carrying out the powers, duties and functions
prescribed by K.S.A. 75-7427, and amendments thereto: Provided further,
That the office of inspector general shall not publicly disclose the identity
of any lottery prize winner, including recipients for whom such prize
affects such recipient's eligibility for or receipt of medical assistance.
Sec. 64.
KANSAS RACING AND
GAMING COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following

HB 2082 79
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Horse fair racing
benefit fund (553-00-2296-3000)................................................No limit
Tribal gaming fund (553-00-2320-3700)..........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the tribal gaming fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Education and training fund (553-00-2459-2450)............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the education and training
fund for operating expenditures, including official hospitality, incurred for
hosting or providing training, in-service workshops and conferences:
Provided further, That the Kansas racing and gaming commission is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for hosting or providing
training, in-service workshops and conferences: And provided further, That
such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating
expenditures incurred for hosting or providing such training, in-service
workshops and conferences: And provided further, That all fees received
for hosting or providing such training, in-service workshops and
conferences shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the education and training fund.
Kansas horse breeding
development fund (553-00-2516-2300).......................................No limit
Expanded lottery regulation fund (553-00-2535).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the expanded lottery regulation fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $1,500.
Live horse racing purse
supplement fund (553-00-2546-2800).........................................No limit
Live greyhound racing purse
supplement fund (553-00-2557-2900).........................................No limit
Greyhound promotion and
development fund (553-00-2561-3100).......................................No limit
Racing investigative
expense fund (553-00-2570-2400)..............................................No limit
Kansas greyhound breeding
development fund (553-00-2601-2500).......................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding K.S.A. 74-8831, and amendments thereto,
all moneys transferred into this fund pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8767(b), and
amendments thereto, shall be deposited to a separate account established
for the purpose described in this proviso and moneys in this account shall
be expended only to supplement special stake races and to enhance the

HB 2082 80
amount per point paid to owners of Kansas-whelped greyhounds that win
live races at Kansas greyhound tracks and pursuant to rules and regulations
adopted by the Kansas racing and gaming commission: Provided further,
That transfers from this account to the live greyhound racing purse
supplement fund may be made in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8767(b), and
amendments thereto.
Racing reimbursable
expense fund (553-00-2616-2600)..............................................No limit
Gaming background
investigation fund (553-00-2682-2680).......................................No limit
Illegal gambling
enforcement fund (553-00-2734-2690).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the illegal gambling
enforcement fund for direct or indirect operating expenditures incurred for
investigatory seizure and forfeiture activities, including, but not limited to:
(1) Conducting investigations of illegal gambling operations or activities;
(2) participating in illegal gaming in order to collect or purchase evidence
as part of an undercover investigation into illegal gambling operations; and
(3) acquiring information or making contacts leading to illegal gaming
activities: Provided, however, That all moneys that are expended for any
such evidence purchase, information acquisition or similar investigatory
purpose or activity from whatever funding source and that are recovered
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
illegal gambling enforcement fund: Provided further, That any moneys
received or awarded to the Kansas racing and gaming commission for such
enforcement activities shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the illegal gambling enforcement fund.
Gaming machine
examination fund (553-00-2998-2990).......................................No limit
State racing fund (553-00-5131-5000).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state racing fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Racing applicant
deposit fund (553-00-7383-7000)................................................No limit
(b) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$450,000 from the state general fund to the tribal gaming fund (553-00-
2320-3700) of the Kansas racing and gaming commission.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer one or more amounts certified by the
executive director of the state gaming agency from the tribal gaming fund
to the state general fund: Provided, That all such transfers shall be for the

HB 2082 81
purpose of reimbursing the state general fund for the amount equal to the
net amount obtained by subtracting (1) the aggregate of any costs incurred
by the state gaming agency during fiscal year 2026 for any arbitration or
litigation in connection with the administration and enforcement of tribal-
state gaming compacts or the provisions of the tribal gaming oversight act,
from (2) the aggregate of the amounts transferred to the tribal gaming fund
(553-00-2320-3700) of the Kansas racing and gaming commission during
fiscal year 2026 for the operating expenditures for the state gaming agency
and any other expenses incurred in connection with the administration and
enforcement of tribal-state gaming compacts or the provisions of the tribal
gaming oversight act.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all payments for
services provided by the Kansas bureau of investigation shall be paid by
the Kansas racing and gaming commission in accordance with K.S.A. 75-
5516(b), and amendments thereto, pursuant to bills that are presented in a
timely manner by the Kansas bureau of investigation for services rendered.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the moneys appropriated in the tribal gaming fund (553-00-
2320-3700) for fiscal year 2026 for the Kansas racing and gaming
commission by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures, which are hereby authorized, may be made
from the tribal gaming fund for fiscal year 2026 for the state gaming
agency regulatory oversight of class III gaming, including, but not limited
to, the regulatory oversight and law enforcement activities of monitoring
compliance with tribal-state gaming compacts and conducting
investigations of violations of tribal-state gaming compacts, investigations
of criminal violations of the laws of this state at tribal gaming facilities,
criminal violations of the tribal gaming oversight act, background
investigations of applicants and vendors and investigations of other
criminal activities related to tribal gaming.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8831, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall not make the transfer from the Kansas greyhound breeding
development fund (553-00-2601-2500) of the Kansas racing and gaming
commission to the greyhound tourism fund of the department of commerce
that is directed to be made on or before June 30, 2026, by K.S.A. 74-
8831(b)(1), and amendments thereto, and shall transfer on or before June
30, 2026, the amount equal to 15% of all moneys credited to the Kansas
greyhound breeding development fund during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, from the Kansas greyhound breeding development fund to the
greyhound promotion and development fund (553-00-2561-3100) of the
Kansas racing and gaming commission.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the

HB 2082 82
provisions of any other statute, the Kansas racing and gaming commission
is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect additional fees to recover all
or part of the direct and indirect costs or operating expenses incurred or
expected to be incurred by the Kansas racing and gaming commission for
the regulation of racing activities that are not otherwise recovered from a
parimutuel facility licensee under authority of any other statute: Provided,
That such fees shall be in addition to all taxes and other fees otherwise
authorized by law: Provided further, That such costs or operating expenses
shall include all or part of any auditing, drug testing, accounting, security
and law enforcement, licensing of any office or other facility for use by a
parimutuel facility licensee or projects to update and upgrade information
technology software or facilities of the commission and shall specifically
include any general operating expenses that are associated with regulatory
activities attributable to the entity upon which any such fee is imposed and
all expenses related to reopening any race track or other racing facility:
And provided further, That all moneys received for such fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the state racing
fund (553-00-5131-5000).
Sec. 65.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Bombardier SSA project (300-00-1000)......................................$5,750,000
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, the following:
Sunflower summer program (300-00-1900-1330).......................$3,000,000
Sec. 66.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Advantage Kansas (300-00-1000-0350).........................................$138,992
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the advantage Kansas account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Micro-internship expansion (300-00-1000-0380)...........................$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the micro-internship expansion account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made
from the micro-internship expansion account for department of commerce
to work with the state board of regents to connect students with Kansas
employers to showcase the types of opportunities available in the state and

HB 2082 83
establish connections between students and Kansas businesses through
micro-internship opportunities.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Kansas
semiquincentennial commission support; housing revolving loan program;
maintenance, repair and overhaul of airplanes; moderate income housing;
housing and workforce development; home-based child care providers
pilot project; sports hall of fame support; swope health project; industrial
park project; and statewide marketing campaign for high demand and high
wage career fields.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
Operating grant (including
official hospitality) (300-00-1900-1110).................................$9,699,069
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating grant
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the operating grant (including official
hospitality) account for certified development companies that have been
determined to be qualified for grants by the secretary of commerce, except
that expenditures for such grants shall not be made for grants to more than
10 certified development companies that have been determined to be
qualified for grants by the secretary of commerce.
Older Kansans
employment program (300-00-1900-1140)................................$508,958
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the older Kansans employment program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Rural opportunity
zones program (300-00-1900-1150)........................................$1,061,308
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the rural opportunity zones program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Senior community service
employment program (300-00-1900-1160)....................................$8,720
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the senior community service employment program account is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Strong military
bases program (300-00-1900-1170)...........................................$214,023
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the strong military bases program account is hereby

HB 2082 84
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Main street program (300-00-1900-1175).......................................$861,679
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the main street program account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Governor's council of
economic advisors (300-00-1900-1185)....................................$212,890
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the governor's council of economic advisors account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Creative arts industries
commission (300-00-1900-1188)............................................$1,037,493
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the creative arts industries commission account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Public broadcasting grants (300-00-1900-1190).............................$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the public broadcasting grants account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Build up Kansas (300-00-1900-1230)..........................................$2,625,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the build up Kansas account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Community development (300-00-1900-1240)..............................$685,252
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the community development account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
International trade (300-00-1900-1250).......................................$1,595,227
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the international trade account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Reemployment implementation (300-00-1900-1260).....................$101,818
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the reemployment implementation account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Office of broadband development (300-00-1900-1270)..............$1,091,249
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the office of broadband development account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
KIT/KIR programs (300-00-1900-1280).....................................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the KIT/KIR programs account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.

HB 2082 85
Registered apprenticeship (300-00-1900-1290)...........................$1,024,568
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the registered apprenticeship account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Small business R&D grants (300-00-1900-1300)........................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the small business R&D grants account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Work-based learning (300-00-1900-1310)......................................$714,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the work-based learning account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Rural champions (300-00-1900-1320)............................................$150,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the rural champions account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Sunflower summer program (300-00-1900-1330).......................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the sunflower summer program account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas workforce marketing (300-00-1900-1340)......................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the Kansas workforce marketing account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
HEAL grants (300-00-1900-1350)...............................................$1,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the HEAL grants account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Emergency HEAL grants (300-00-1900-1360)...............................$500,934
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the emergency HEAL grants account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Travel and tourism
operating expenditures (300-00-1900-1901)..........................$4,924,398
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the travel and tourism operating expenditures account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed $4,000.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:

HB 2082 86
Kansas creative arts industries commission
checkoff fund (300-00-2031-2031).............................................No limit
Publication and other sales fund (300-00-2048)...............................No limit
Conference registration and
disbursement fund (300-00-2049)...............................................No limit
IMPACT program services fund (300-00-2176)...............................No limit
AJLA special revenue fund (300-00-2190-2190).............................No limit
Reimbursement and recovery fund (300-00-2275)...........................No limit
General fees fund (300-00-2310)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
loans pursuant to loan agreements, which are hereby authorized to be
entered into by the secretary of commerce in accordance with repayment
provisions and other terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the
secretary therefor under programs of the department.
Indirect cost – federal fund (300-00-2340-2300).............................No limit
Enterprise facilitation fund (300-00-2378-2710)..............................No limit
Publication and other
sales fund (300-00-2399-2399)...................................................No limit
Provided, That in addition to other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made from such fund for the purpose of compensating federal aid program
expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with the requirements
established by the United States fish and wildlife service for utilization of
federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such expenditures shall be in
addition to any expenditures made from the publication and other sales
fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That the secretary of
commerce shall report all such expenditures to the governor and
legislature as appropriate.
Conversion of equipment and
materials fund (300-00-2411-2220).............................................No limit
Job creation program fund (300-00-2467-2467)..............................No limit
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KU (300-00-2494-2494)..............................................$3,500,000
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KSU (300-00-2494-2495)............................................$3,500,000
Kan-grow engineering
fund – WSU (300-00-2494-2496)...........................................$3,500,000
Athletic fee fund (300-00-2599-2500)..............................................No limit
Governor's council of economic advisers private
operations fund (300-00-2761-2701)...........................................No limit
Technology-enabled fiduciary financial
institutions development and

HB 2082 87
expansion fund (300-00-2839)....................................................No limit
Kansas educator registered apprenticeship grant
program fund (300-00-2856).......................................................No limit
Kansas nonprofit apprenticeship grant
program fund (300-00-2873).......................................................No limit
Existing horse racing facility remodel fund (300-00-2884).............No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the existing horse racing facility
remodel fund shall be made by the above agency for a grant to remodel an
existing horse racing facility in a Kansas county with a population between
6,000 and 6,100 as of the 2020 census.
Northwest Kansas housing economic development fund (300-00-2886).No
limit
Engineering graduate incentive fund (300-00-2930)........................No limit
Attracting professional sports to
Kansas fund (300-00-2942).........................................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion
payroll incentive fund (300-00-2943)..........................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion
new employee training and
education fund (300-00-2944).....................................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion Kansas
residency incentive fund (300-00-2945)......................................No limit
Child care/development block grant –
federal fund (300-00-3028-3028)................................................No limit
WIOA youth activities –
federal fund (300-00-3039).........................................................No limit
Senior community service employment program –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3510)................................................No limit
American job link alliance job corps –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3512)................................................No limit
American job link alliance –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3516)................................................No limit
Creative arts industries commission
gifts, grants and bequests –
federal fund (300-00-3210-3218)................................................No limit
Workforce data quality initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3237-3237)................................................No limit
WIOA adult – federal fund (300-00-3270).......................................No limit
Trade adjustment assistance –
federal fund (300-00-3273).........................................................No limit
Local veterans employment representative program –
federal fund (300-00-3274-3240)................................................No limit
Disabled veterans outreach program –

HB 2082 88
federal fund (300-00-3274-3242)................................................No limit
Wagner Peyser employment services –
federal fund (300-00-3275).........................................................No limit
Unemployment insurance –
federal fund (300-00-3335).........................................................No limit
H-1B technical skills training grant –
federal fund (300-00-3400).........................................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance fund (300-00-3415)......................No limit
WIOA dislocated workers –
federal fund (300-00-3428).........................................................No limit
Work opportunity tax credit –
federal fund (300-00-3447-3447)................................................No limit
Temporary labor certification foreign workers –
federal fund (300-00-3448).........................................................No limit
Transition assistance program grant –
federal fund (300-00-3451-3451)................................................No limit
State small business credit initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3567).........................................................No limit
SBA STEP grant –
federal fund (300-00-3573-3573)................................................No limit
Workforce innovation –
federal fund (300-00-3581).........................................................No limit
Reemployment connections initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3585).........................................................No limit
Community development block grant –
federal fund (300-00-3669).........................................................No limit
Pathway home 2 – federal fund (300-00-3734)................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (300-00-3753).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief –
federal fund (300-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Northwest Kansas retail economic
development ARPA fund (300-00-3756).....................................No limit
World cup ARPA fund (300-00-3756)..............................................No limit
ARPA capital projects-
infrastructure – federal fund (300-00-3761)................................No limit
ARPA capital projects-digital technology
connectivity – federal fund (300-00-3761)..................................No limit
RETAIN extension –
federal fund (300-00-3770).........................................................No limit
State broadband data development grant –
federal fund (300-00-3782-3700)................................................No limit
Second chance grant –

HB 2082 89
federal fund (300-00-3895).........................................................No limit
State digital equity planning grant
program fund (300-00-3927-2927)..............................................No limit
Broadband equity access and deployment
program fund (300-00-3928-3928)..............................................No limit
Apprenticeship USA state –
federal fund (300-00-3949).........................................................No limit
Kansas health profession opportunity project –
federal fund (300-00-3951).........................................................No limit
Kansas creative arts industries commission special
gifts fund (300-00-7004-7004)....................................................No limit
Kansas commission for the United States
semiquincentennial gifts and
donations fund (300-00-7019).....................................................No limit
National main street
center fund (300-00-7325-7000).................................................No limit
IMPACT program repayment fund (300-00-7388)...........................No limit
Kansas partnership fund (300-00-7525-7020)..................................No limit
Broadband technical assistance fund (300-00-3807)........................No limit
Middle mile broadband grant fund (300-00-3932).......................... No limit
Rural community development
initiatives federal fund (300-00-3674).........................................No limit
(d) The secretary of commerce is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for: (1) The
provision and administration of conferences held for the purposes of
programs and activities of the department of commerce and for which fees
are not specifically prescribed by statute; (2) sale of publications of the
department of commerce and for sale of educational and other promotional
items and for which fees are not specifically prescribed by statute; and (3)
promotional and other advertising and related economic development
activities and services provided under economic development programs
and activities of the department of commerce: Provided, That such fees
shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses
incurred in providing such services, conferences, publications and items,
advertising and other economic development activities and services
provided under economic development programs and activities of the
department of commerce for which fees are not specifically prescribed by
statute: Provided further, That all such fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to one or more special revenue
fund or funds of the department of commerce as specified by the secretary
of commerce: And provided further, That expenditures may be made from
such special revenue fund or funds of the department of commerce for

HB 2082 90
fiscal year 2026, in accordance with the provisions of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, for
operating expenses incurred in providing such services, conferences,
publications and items, advertising, programs and activities and for
operating expenses incurred in providing similar economic development
activities and services provided under economic development programs
and activities of the department of commerce.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of commerce from moneys appropriated in any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the department of
commerce as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, notwithstanding the provisions of any
other statute, expenditures may be made by the department of commerce
from moneys appropriated in any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 for official hospitality.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
commerce, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, from the state economic development initiatives fund for the
department of commerce to another item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the state economic development initiatives fund for the
department of commerce. The secretary of commerce shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 12-17,169, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made from such
moneys for the secretary of commerce to approve a city or county to
finance a rural redevelopment project, as defined in K.S.A. 12-17,162, and
amendments thereto, without the issuance of special obligation bonds up to
an amount of not to exceed $25,000,000 for each such project: Provided,
That such rural redevelopment project costs shall be made payable, both as
to principal and interest, from any source as provided in K.S.A. 12-
17,169(a)(1)(A) through (I), and amendments thereto.
(h) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act, K.S.A. 12-17,160 through
12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the
above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or

HB 2082 91
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures may be made from such moneys for the secretary
of commerce to approve a STAR bond project for a major amusement park
or historic theater: Provided, That such approval shall be upon adoption of
a STAR bond project plan and establishment of a STAR bond project
district by a city or county for such major amusement park project or
historic theater in accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,164 through 12-17,166,
and amendments thereto: Provided further, That such major amusement
park project or historic theater shall be eligible for financing by special
obligation bonds payable from revenues described by K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)
(1), and amendments thereto: And provided further, That such city or
county is authorized to issue such special obligation bonds in one or more
series to finance the undertaking of such major amusement park project or
historic theater in accordance with the provisions of the STAR bonds
financing act: And provided further, That the secretary shall review the
STAR bond project plan and determine whether to approve such plan in
accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,167, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That any special obligation bonds issued to finance the major
amusement park project or historic theater shall be subject to the
provisions of the STAR bonds financing act: And provided further, That
such major amusement park and historic theater costs shall be considered
project costs for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That a major amusement park area shall be
considered an eligible area for purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That all such property included
in, added to or removed from the STAR bond project district established
pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR
bonds financing act: And provided further, That if such major amusement
park project or historic theater uses state sales tax financing pursuant to
K.S.A. 12-17,169, and amendments thereto, such project shall be subject
to the requirements of K.S.A. 12-17,176, and amendments thereto: And
provided further, That in the event that the city or county shall default in
the payment of any STAR bonds payable from revenues described in
K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto, no public funds shall be
used to pay the holders thereof except as specifically authorized by the
STAR bonds financing act: And provided further, That copies of all
retailers' sales, use and transient guest tax returns filed with the secretary
of revenue in connection with such major amusement park project shall be
subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 12-17,174, and amendments thereto.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Amusement rides" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 44-
1601, and amendments thereto, and includes such amusement rides and

HB 2082 92
further include buildings necessary to house and operate such amusement
park rides, buildings immediately adjacent and attached to such
amusement park rides and a building necessary to house a conference
center within the major amusement park area.
(B) "Major amusement park" means a project with amusement rides
and related attractions and upon which the secretary has made a finding
that capital improvements of not less than $100,000,000 will be built in the
state to construct the major amusement park.
(C) "Major amusement park area" means an area containing a major
amusement park.
(i) On July 1, 2025, the ARPA capital projects broadband
infrastructure – federal fund of the department of commerce is hereby
redesignated as the ARPA capital projects infrastructure – federal fund of
the department of commerce.
(j) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$7,000,000 from the state general fund to the attracting powerful economic
expansion payroll incentive fund (300-00-2943) established by K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 74-50,316, and amendments thereto.
(k) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$3,000,000 from the state general fund to the attracting powerful economic
expansion new employee training and education fund (300-00-2944)
established by K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,318, and amendments thereto.
(l) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$800,000 from the state general fund to the attracting powerful economic
expansion residency incentive fund (300-00-2945) established by K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 74-50,323, and amendments thereto.
(m) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $6,697,638 from the state general fund to the state economic
development initiatives fund (300-00-1900-1100).
Sec. 67.
KANSAS HOUSING RESOURCES CORPORATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
State housing trust fund (175-00-7370-7000)...................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the state housing trust fund shall be
made by the Kansas housing resources corporation for the purposes of
administering and supporting housing programs of the Kansas housing
resources corporation as authorized by K.S.A. 74-8959, and amendments
thereto, and this section: Provided further, That of the moneys
appropriated in the state housing trust fund and identified as moneys for

HB 2082 93
the rural housing revolving loan program, as authorized by section 28 of
chapter 81 of the 2022 Session Laws of Kansas, or identified as moneys
for the housing revolving loan program, as authorized by section 77 of
chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from such identified moneys in such fund for
fiscal year 2026 for loans to a local unit of government, political
subdivision of the state, not-for-profit organizations focused on housing
development, for-profit or not-for-profit builder or developer for moderate
and low-income housing development, including infrastructure necessary
to support such development: And provided further, That at least 50% of
such expenditures shall be used in rural communities: And provided
further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of any statute to the contrary,
a local government or political subdivision of the state is hereby
authorized to enter into loan agreements under this program: And provided
further, That the provisions and restrictions of the cash basis and budget
laws of this state shall not apply to any loan received by a local
government or political subdivision under this program: And provided
further, That notwithstanding the provisions of any statute, the interest rate
for a loan to any not-for-profit organization focused on housing
development shall be equal to the average interest rate of certificates of
deposit in Kansas financial institutions in June 2025, as determined by the
state treasurer.
Sec. 68.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 73(b) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the workmen's
compensation fee fund (296-00-2124) of the department of labor is hereby
increased from $13,158,378 to $13,326,791.
Sec. 69.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (296-00-1000-0503)...............................$4,232,799
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That in addition to the other purposes
for which expenditures may be made by the above agency from this
account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, expenditures may be
made from this account for the costs incurred for court reporting under
K.S.A. 72-2218 et seq. and 75-4321 et seq., and amendments thereto: And
provided further, That expenditures from this account for official
hospitality by the secretary of labor shall not exceed $5,000.

HB 2082 94
Amusement ride safety (296-00-1000-0513)..................................$286,519
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the amusement ride safety
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Unemployment insurance modernization (296-00-1000-0520)...$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the unemployment insurance
modernization account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Department of labor special
projects fund (296-00-2041-2105)...............................................No limit
Special employment
security fund (296-00-2120-2000)...............................................No limit
Workmen's compensation
fee fund (296-00-2124).........................................................$12,908,874
Wage claims assignment
fee fund (296-00-2204-2240)......................................................No limit
Amusement ride safety fund (296-00-2224-2250)...........................No limit
Federal indirect cost
offset fund (296-00-2302-2280)..................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 44‐716a, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute during fiscal year 2026, the
secretary of labor, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer from the special employment security fund of the department of
labor to the department of labor federal indirect cost offset fund the portion
of such amount that is determined necessary to be in compliance with the
employment security law: Provided further, That, upon approval of any
such transfer by the director of the budget, notification shall be provided to
the director of legislative research department.
Dispute resolution fund (296-00-2587-2270)...................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the secretary of labor for
reimbursement of expenditures for the costs incurred for mediation under
K.S.A. 72-2232, and amendments thereto, and for fact-finding under
K.S.A. 72-2233, and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the dispute resolution fund: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund to pay the costs incurred for
mediation under K.S.A. 72-2232, and amendments thereto, and for fact-
finding under K.S.A. 72-2233, and amendments thereto, subject to full
reimbursement therefor by the board of education and the professional

HB 2082 95
employees' organization involved in such mediation and fact-finding
procedures.
Indirect cost fund (296-00-2781-2781).............................................No limit
Kansas sheltered workshop transition fund (296-00-2895-2895).....No limit
Employment services Wagner-Peyser funded
activities federal fund (296-00-3275-3275).................................No limit
Employment security
administration fund (296-00-3335).............................................No limit
Occupational health and safety –
federal fund (296-00-3339-3210)................................................No limit
Labor force statistics
federal fund (296-00-3742-3742)................................................No limit
Compensation and working conditions
federal fund (296-00-3743-3743)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (296-00-3753).............................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (296-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
KDOL off-budget fund (296-00-6112-6100)....................................No limit
Employment security fund
benefit account (296-00-7054-7000)...........................................No limit
Employment security fund
clearing account (296-00-7055-7100).........................................No limit
Employment security fund (296-00-7056).......................................No limit
Employment security fund
trust account (296-00-7056-7200)...............................................No limit
Employment security fund – special
suspense account (296-00-7057-7300)........................................No limit
Special wage payment clearing
trust fund (296-00-7362-7500)....................................................No limit
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5748, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, on July 1, 2025, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $1,000,000 from the state general fund to the Kansas
sheltered workshop transition fund (296-00-2895-2895) of the department
of labor.
Sec. 70.
KANSAS OFFICE OF VETERANS SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures –
administration (694-00-1000-0103)........................................$1,438,667
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures –
administration account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

HB 2082 96
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures –
veteran services (694-00-1000-0203).....................................$1,831,756
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures –
veteran services account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures
from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
Operating expenditures – Kansas
soldiers' home (694-00-1000-0403)........................................$4,736,348
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures –
Kansas soldiers' home account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures – Kansas
veterans' home (694-00-1000-0503).......................................$5,208,455
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures –
Kansas veterans' home account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operations – state
veterans cemeteries (694-00-1000-0703)................................$1,046,822
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations – state
veterans cemeteries account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,500.
Veterans claim assistance program –
service grants (694-00-1000-0903).........................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterans claim assistance
program – service grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from the veterans claim assistance program – service grants
account shall be made only for the purpose of awarding service grants to
veterans service organizations for the purpose of aiding veterans in
obtaining federal benefits: Provided, however, That no expenditures shall
be made by the Kansas office of veterans services from the veterans claim
assistance program – service grants account for operating expenditures or
overhead for administering the grants in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 73-1234, and amendments thereto.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Veterans' home fee fund (694-00-2236-2200)..................................No limit

HB 2082 97
Soldiers' home fee fund (694-00-2241-2100)...................................No limit
Veterans benefit lottery
game fund (694-00-2303)............................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the veterans benefit lottery game fund
shall be in an amount equal to 50% for operating expenditures and capital
improvements of the above agency, or for the use and benefit of the
Kansas veterans' home, the Kansas soldiers' home and the state veterans
cemetery system; and 50% for the veterans enhanced service delivery
program.
State veterans cemeteries
fee fund (694-00-2332-2600)......................................................No limit
Soldiers' home
medicaid fund (694-00-2464-2464).............................................No limit
Veterans' home
medicaid fund (694-00-2469-2469).............................................No limit
Construction state home
facilities fund (694-00-3018-3000).............................................No limit
State cemetery grants fund (694-00-3048).......................................No limit
Kansas soldier home construction
grant fund (694-00-3075)............................................................No limit
Soldiers' home
medicare fund (694-00-3168-3100).............................................No limit
VA burial reimbursement
fund – federal (694-00-3212-3310).............................................No limit
Federal domiciliary per diem fund (694-00-3220)...........................No limit
Federal long term care
per diem fund (694-00-3232)......................................................No limit
Commission on veterans affairs
federal fund (694-00-3241).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (694-00-3753).............................................No limit
CARES provider relief fund (694-00-3754).....................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (694-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Veterans' home
medicare fund (694-00-3893-3893).............................................No limit
Kansas hometown
heroes fund (694-00-7003-7001).................................................No limit
Vietnam war era veterans' recognition
award fund (694-00-7017-7000).................................................No limit
State veterans cemeteries donations and
contributions fund (694-00-7308-5200)......................................No limit
(c) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 73-1231, 73-1233, 75-3728g, 76-1906 or 76-

HB 2082 98
1953, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer moneys that are credited to a special revenue fund of
the Kansas office of veterans services to another special revenue fund of
the Kansas office of veterans services. The director of the Kansas office of
veterans services shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(2) As used in this subsection, "special revenue fund" means the
soldiers' home fee fund (694-00-2241-2100), veterans' home fee fund
(694-00-2236-2200), soldiers' home outpatient clinic fund (694-00-2258-
2300), soldiers' home benefit fund (694-00-7903-5400), soldiers' home
work therapy fund (694-00-7951-5600), veterans' home canteen fund (694-
00-7809-5300), veterans' home benefit fund (694-00-7904-5500), Persian
Gulf war veterans health initiative fund (694-00-2304-2500), state veterans
cemeteries fee fund (694-00-2332-2600), state veterans cemeteries
donations and contributions fund (694-00-7308-5200) and Kansas veterans
memorials fund (694-00-7332-5210).
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the Kansas
office of veterans services or any institution or facility under the general
supervision and management of the Kansas office of veterans services to
another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general
fund for the Kansas office of veterans services or any institution or facility
under the general supervision and management of the Kansas office of
veterans services. The director of the Kansas office of veterans services
shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the Kansas
office of veterans services to the Vietnam war era veterans' recognition
award fund (694-00-7017-7000). The director of the Kansas office of
veterans services shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal

HB 2082 99
year ending June 30, 2026, from the state institutions building fund for the
Kansas office of veterans services or any institution or facility under the
general supervision and management of the Kansas office of veterans
services to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
institutions building fund for the Kansas office of veterans services or any
institution or facility under the general supervision and management of the
Kansas office of veterans services. The director of the Kansas office of
veterans services shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,260,000 from the lottery
operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) of the Kansas lottery to the veterans
benefit lottery game fund (694-00-2303-2303) of the Kansas office of
veterans services.
Sec. 71.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
HIV testing (264-00-1000-1552).......................................................$51,500
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Falls prev fund (264-00-3704-3704).................................................No limit
Self-mngmt ed fund (264-00-3705-3705).........................................No limit
Sec. 72.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) (264-00-1000-0202).............................................$6,103,147
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) – health (264-00-1000-0270).............................$12,152,080
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) – health account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 100
Laboratory (264-00-1000-0290)..................................................$3,028,982
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the laboratory account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Aid to local units (264-00-1000-0350).........................................$8,249,202
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That, except as provided in subsection (l), all
expenditures from this account for state financial assistance to local health
departments shall be in accordance with the formula prescribed by K.S.A.
65-241 through 65-246, and amendments thereto.
Aid to local units – primary
health projects (264-00-1000-0460)......................................$18,750,690
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units –
primary health projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
prescription support expenditures shall be made from the aid to local units
– primary health projects account for: (1) Purchasing drug inventory under
section 340B of the federal public health service act for community health
center grantees and federally qualified health center look-alikes who
qualify; (2) increasing access to prescription drugs by subsidizing a
portion of the costs for the benefit of patients at section 340B participating
clinics on a sliding fee scale; and (3) expanding access to prescription
medication assistance programs by making expenditures to support
operating costs of assistance programs: And provided further, That funded
clinics shall be not-for-profit or publicly funded primary care clinics or
dental clinics, including federally qualified community health centers and
federally qualified community health center look-alikes, as defined by 42
U.S.C. § 330, that provide comprehensive primary health care or dental
services, offer sliding fee discounts based upon household income and
serve any person regardless of ability to pay and have a unique patient
panel that, at a minimum, represents the income-based disparities of the
community: And provided further, That policies determining patient
eligibility due to income or insurance status may be determined by each
community but must be clearly documented and posted: And provided
further, That of the moneys appropriated in the aid to local units – primary
health projects account, not less than $18,750,690 shall be distributed for
community-based primary care grants and services provided by the
community care network of Kansas.
Infant and toddler program (264-00-1000-0570).........................$9,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the infant and toddler
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That during the fiscal

HB 2082 101
year ending June 30, 2026, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the infant and toddler program account in the amount of
$8,000,000 for the purposes of aid to local units and other assistance: And
provided further, That such moneys shall not be expended for
administrative costs incurred by the above agency: And provided further,
That expenditures of at least $1,500,000 shall be made from such account
to provide early childhood vision services for children served by the
Kansas state school for the blind.
Aid to local units –
women's wellness (264-00-1000-0610).....................................$444,296
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units –
women's wellness account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the aid to local units – women's wellness account shall be in
accordance with grant agreements entered into by the secretary of health
and environment and grant recipients.
Teen pregnancy
prevention activities (264-00-1000-0650).................................$338,846
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the teen pregnancy
prevention activities account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Lyme disease prevention and research (264-00-1000-0670)..........$140,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the lyme disease prevention
and research account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Tobacco cessation program (264-00-1000-0680)............................$938,756
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the tobacco cessation
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Lab equipment replacement (264-00-1000-0800)...........................$280,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the lab equipment
replacement account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Vaccine purchases (264-00-1000-0900)..........................................$329,607
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vaccine purchases
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Pregnancy maintenance
initiative (264-00-1000-1100)....................................................$677,692
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the pregnancy maintenance
initiative account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Breast cancer

HB 2082 102
screening program (264-00-1000-1300).................................$1,219,336
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the breast cancer screening
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Immunization programs (264-00-1000-1400).................................$397,418
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the immunization programs
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Cerebral palsy
posture seating (264-00-1000-1500)..........................................$303,537
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cerebral palsy posture
seating account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the cerebral palsy posture seating
account for posture seating for adults.
Child abuse review
and evaluation (264-00-1000-1550)...........................................$875,970
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child abuse review and
evaluation account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
shall be made from the child abuse review and evaluation program account
to train healthcare providers to recognize signs of child abuse and
reimburse reviews and examinations conducted by such trained healthcare
providers: And provided further, That on or before January 12, 2026, the
above agency shall submit a report to the house of representatives
committee on appropriations and the senate committee on ways and means
on services provided and the location of services provided by the program.
PKU treatment (264-00-1000-1710)...............................................$199,274
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the PKU treatment account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
State trauma fund (264-00-1000-1720)...........................................$300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state trauma fund
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Child care health and safety grants (264-00-1000)......................$1,300,000
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Laboratory move (264-00-1000-0280); childcare pilot (264-00-1000-
0580); rural hospital bridge funding (264-00-1000-0710); specialty health
care access programs (264-00-1000-1450); adult inpatient behavioral
health services (264-00-1000-1551); and HIV testing (264-00-1000-1552).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following

HB 2082 103
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Kansas newborn
screening fund (264-00-2027-2027)............................................No limit
Power generating facility
fee fund (264-00-2131-2130)......................................................No limit
Health and environment training
fee fund – health (264-00-2183-2160).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the health and
environment training fee fund – health for acquisition and distribution of
division of public health program literature and films and for participation
in or conducting training seminars for training employees of the division
of public health of the department of health and environment, for training
recipients of state aid from the division of public health of the department
of health and environment and for training representatives of industries
affected by rules and regulations of the department of health and
environment relating to the division of public health: Provided further,
That the secretary of health and environment is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees in order to recover costs incurred for such
acquisition and distribution of literature and films and for the operation of
such seminars: And provided further, That such fees may be fixed in order
to recover all or part of such costs: And provided further, That all moneys
received from such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the health and environment training fee
fund – health: And provided further, That, in addition to the other purposes
for which expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment for the division of public health from moneys appropriated
from the health and environment training fee fund – health for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment from the health and environment training fee fund – health
for fiscal year 2026 for agency operations for the division of public health.
Insurance statistical
plan fund (264-00-2243-2840)....................................................No limit
SSA fee fund (264-00-2269-2030)...................................................No limit
Civil registration and health statistics
fee fund (264-00-2291-2295)......................................................No limit
Child care criminal background and
fingerprint fund (264-00-2313-2313)..........................................No limit
Right-to-know
fee fund (264-00-2325-2325)......................................................No limit

HB 2082 104
Conversion of materials and equipment
fund – health (264-00-2410-2240)..............................................No limit
Nuclear safety emergency preparedness special
revenue fund (264-00-2415-2280)...............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the department of health and
environment – division of public health from the nuclear safety emergency
management fee fund (034-00-2081-2200) of the adjutant general shall be
credited to the nuclear safety emergency preparedness special revenue
fund of the department of health and environment – division of public
health: Provided further, That expenditures from the nuclear safety
emergency preparedness special revenue fund for official hospitality shall
not exceed $2,500.
Health facilities review fund (264-00-2505-2250)...........................No limit
Trauma fund (264-00-2513-2230)....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment for fiscal year 2026 from the trauma fund of the department
of health and environment – division of public health for the stroke
prevention project: Provided further, That expenditures from the trauma
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $3,000.
Radiation control operations
fee fund (264-00-2531-2530)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the radiation control operations fee fund
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Health and environment publication
fee fund – health (264-00-2541-2190).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health and environment publication
fee fund – health shall be made only for the purpose of paying the
expenses of publishing documents as required by K.S.A. 75-5662, and
amendments thereto.
Bicycle helmet revolving fund (264-00-2575-2630)........................No limit
District coroners fund (264-00-2653-2320)......................................No limit
Maternity centers and child care facilities licensing
fee fund (264-00-2731-2731)......................................................No limit
Rural hospital innovation
grant fund (264-00-2871-2871)...................................................No limit
Sponsored project overhead
fund – health (264-00-2912-2710)..............................................No limit
Cancer registry federal fund (264-00-3008-3040)............................No limit
Child care and development block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3028-3450)................................................No limit
Office of rural health –
federal fund (264-00-3031-3640)................................................No limit
Hospital preparedness and response program for Ebola –

HB 2082 105
federal fund (264-00-3033-3033)................................................No limit
Campus sexual assault prevention grant –
federal fund (264-00-3035-3035)................................................No limit
Medicare – federal fund (264-00-3064-3062)..................................No limit
Provided, That transfers of moneys from the medicare – federal fund to the
state fire marshal may be made during fiscal year 2026 pursuant to a
contract, which is hereby authorized to be entered into by the secretary of
health and environment and the state fire marshal to provide fire and safety
inspections for hospitals.
Migrant health program –
federal fund (264-00-3069-3070)................................................No limit
Comprehensive STD prevention systems –
federal fund (264-00-3070-3080)................................................No limit
Tuberculosis prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3071-4610)................................................No limit
Women, infants and children health program –
federal fund (264-00-3077-3103)................................................No limit
State implementation projects for prevention
of secondary conditions –
federal fund (264-00-3087-4405)................................................No limit
Hospital preparedness Ebola –
federal fund (264-00-3093-3093)................................................No limit
Kansas public health approaches for
ensuring quitline capacity –
federal fund (264-00-3097-3097)................................................No limit
Kansas vital records for quality improvement –
federal fund (264-00-3098-3098)................................................No limit
Kansas early detection works breast & cervical
cancer screening services –
federal fund (264-00-3099-3099)................................................No limit
Kansas survivor care quality initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3101-3610)................................................No limit
Zika birth defects surveillance & referral –
federal fund (264-00-3102-3620)................................................No limit
Disease control and prevention investigations
and technical assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3150).........................................................No limit
Children's mercy hospital lead program –
federal fund (264-00-3152-3154)................................................No limit
Homeland security grant-KHP –
federal fund (264-00-3199-3199)................................................No limit
Make a difference information network –
federal fund (264-00-3234-3234)................................................No limit

HB 2082 106
CDC multipurpose grant
federal fund (264-00-3243-3243)................................................No limit
IDEA infant toddler-part C-ARRA –
federal fund (264-00-3282-3282)................................................No limit
SAMHSA project launch intv. –
federal fund (264-00-3284-3284)................................................No limit
Expanding public health
workforce fund (264-00-3287-3287)...........................................No limit
Emergency medical services for children –
federal fund (264-00-3292-3292)................................................No limit
Primary care offices –
federal fund (264-00-3293-3293)................................................No limit
Injury intervention –
federal fund (264-00-3294-3294)................................................No limit
Childhood lead poisoning prevention program –
federal fund (264-00-3296-3296)................................................No limit
Oral health workforce activities –
federal fund (264-00-3297-3297)................................................No limit
Rural hospital flex program –
federal fund (264-00-3298-3298)................................................No limit
Title IV-E – federal fund (264-00-3326-3900).................................No limit
Ryan White title II –
federal fund (264-00-3328-3310)................................................No limit
HIV care formula grant
federal fund (264-00-3328-3311)................................................No limit
Homeland security –
federal fund (264-00-3329-3319)................................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (264-00-3360-3539).................................................No limit
HRSA small hospital improvement grant program –
federal fund (264-00-3371-3371)...............................................No limit
Immunization grant –
federal fund (264-00-3372-3150)................................................No limit
Refugee assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3378-3345)................................................No limit
Small hospital improvement program –
federal fund (264-00-3392-3392)................................................No limit
Refugee health – federal fund (264-00-3393-3393).........................No limit
ARRA – migrant –
federal fund (264-00-3396-3396)................................................No limit
Hospital bioterrorism preparedness –
federal fund (264-00-3398-3398)................................................No limit
HIV/AIDS surveillance –

HB 2082 107
federal fund (264-00-3399-3399)................................................No limit
Cardiovascular health program –
federal fund (264-00-3401-3407)................................................No limit
Kansas senior farmers market nutrition program –
federal fund (264-00-3406-3406)................................................No limit
Universal newborn hearing screening –
federal fund (264-00-3459-3459)................................................No limit
ARRA – transfer from SRS –
federal fund (264-00-3471-3471)................................................No limit
ARRA ambulatory surgical center ASC/HAI medicare –
federal fund (264-00-3486-3486)................................................No limit
Health information exchange –
federal fund (264-00-3493-3493)................................................No limit
Personal responsibility education program –
federal fund (264-00-3494-3494)................................................No limit
Adult lead surveillance data –
federal fund (264-00-3496-3496)................................................No limit
Medical reserve corps contract –
federal fund (264-00-3502-3502)................................................No limit
Home visiting grant –
federal fund (264-00-3503-3503)................................................No limit
Carbon monoxide detector/fire injury prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3508-3508)................................................No limit
Diagnostic x-ray program –
federal fund (264-00-3511-3160)................................................No limit
Infants & toddlers Prt C –
federal fund (264-00-3516-3171)................................................No limit
Affordable care act – federal fund (264-00-3546-3546)...................No limit
Strengthening public health infrastructure –
federal fund (264-00-3547-3547)................................................No limit
Improving minority health –
federal fund (264-00-3548-3548)................................................No limit
Abstinence education –
federal fund (264-00-3549-3549)................................................No limit
Tuberculosis elimination and laboratory –
federal fund (264-00-3559-3559)................................................No limit
Strengthen public health immunization infrastructure –
federal fund (264-00-3568-3568)................................................No limit
Healthy homes and lead poisoning prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3572-3572)................................................No limit
Federal supplemental funding for tobacco prevention
and control – federal fund (264-00-3574-3574)..........................No limit
Coordinated chronic disease prevention

HB 2082 108
and health promotion program –
federal fund (264-00-3575-3575)................................................No limit
Kansas tobacco control program –
federal fund (264-00-3598-3598)................................................No limit
Colorectal cancer screening –
federal fund (264-00-3599-3599)................................................No limit
Public health crisis response –
federal fund (264-00-3602-3602)................................................No limit
Diabetes & heart disease &
stroke prevention programs –
federal fund (264-00-3603-3603)................................................No limit
Innovative state & local public health
strategies to prevent & manage
diabetes and heart disease and stroke –
federal fund (264-00-3604-3604)................................................No limit
Alzheimer's association inclusion –
federal fund (264-00-3607-3607)................................................No limit
ESSA preschool development grants birth through
five – federal fund (264-00-3608-3608)......................................No limit
Kansas newborn screening information system
maintenance and enhancement
federal fund (264-00-3612-3612)................................................No limit
Preventive health block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3614-3200)................................................No limit
Maternal and child health block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3616-3210)................................................No limit
National center for health statistics –
federal fund (264-00-3617-3220)................................................No limit
Title X family planning services program –
federal fund (264-00-3622-3271)................................................No limit
Lead poisoning preventive health –
federal fund (264-00-3626-4132)................................................No limit
Lifting young families toward excellence
federal fund (264-00-3627-3627)................................................No limit
Adult viral hepatitis prevention and
control fund (264-00-3641-3641)................................................No limit
SHIP COVID testing and
mitigation fund (264-00-3651-3651)...........................................No limit
Drug endangered children in
Kansas fund (264-00-3657-3657)................................................No limit
Solid waste infrastructure for
recycling fund (264-00-3659-3659)............................................No limit
Kansas environmental health capacity

HB 2082 109
program fund (264-00-3660-3660)..............................................No limit
COVID 19 health
disparities fund (264-00-3683-3683)...........................................No limit
Falls prev fund (264-00-3704-3704).................................................No limit
Self-mngmt ed fund (264-00-3705-3705).........................................No limit
Child care
capacity fund (264-00-3713-3713)..............................................No limit
Maternal deaths due to
violence fund (264-00-3724-3724)..............................................No limit
HIV prevention projects –
federal fund (264-00-3740-3521)................................................No limit
Immunization capacity building assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3744-3744)................................................No limit
ARRA – survey, licensure and epidemiology –
federal fund (264-00-3746-3746)................................................No limit
Immunization and vaccines for children grants –
federal fund (264-00-3747-3741)................................................No limit
Actions to prevent and control diabetes,
heart disease, and obesity –
federal fund (264-00-3749-3742)................................................No limit
ARRA – WIC grants to states –
federal fund (264-00-3750-3750)................................................No limit
Healthy start initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3751-3751)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (264-00-3753-3753)...................................No limit
Arthritis evidence based interventions –
federal fund (264-00-3755-3756)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (264-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
State loan repayment program –
federal fund (264-00-3760-3755)................................................No limit
Census of trauma occp fatal. –
federal fund (264-00-3797-3670)................................................No limit
Opt-out testing initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3801-3801)................................................No limit
Bicycle helmet distribution –
federal fund (264-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
Community health workers for
COVID response and resilient
communities fund (264-00-3832-3832).......................................No limit
State indoor radon grant –
federal fund (264-00-3884-3930)................................................No limit
Climate pollution reduction

HB 2082 110
grants fund (264-00-3897-3897).................................................No limit
ARRA collaborative component I –
federal fund (264-00-3890-3891)................................................No limit
ARRA collaborative component III –
federal fund (264-00-3890-3892)................................................No limit
Preventing maternal deaths –
federal fund (264-00-3896-3896)................................................No limit
Adv. health equity for
diabetes fund (264-00-3901-3901)..............................................No limit
Kansas coalition against sexual and domestic violence –
federal fund (264-00-3907-3907)................................................No limit
Kansas actions to improve oral health outcomes –
federal fund (264-00-3921-3921)................................................No limit
Strengthening U.S. public
health fund (264-00-3926-3926).................................................No limit
Expanding COVID-19
vaccination fund (264-00-3931-3931).........................................No limit
WISEWOMAN fund (264-00-3933-3933).......................................No limit
KS CCR state permitting
program fund (264-00-3934-3934)..............................................No limit
School based
services fund (264-00-3935-3935)..............................................No limit
School based data
collection fund (264-00-3936-3936)...........................................No limit
Gifts, grants and donations
fund – health (264-00-7311-7090)...............................................No limit
Special bequest fund – health (264-00-7366-7050)..........................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, and on other occasions during fiscal year 2026,
when necessary as determined by the secretary of health and environment,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the
secretary of health and environment that constitute reimbursements, credits
and other amounts received by the department of health and environment
for activities related to federal programs from specified special revenue
funds of the department of health and environment – division of public
health or of the department of health and environment – division of
environment to the sponsored project overhead fund – health (264-00-
2912-2715) of the department of health and environment – division of
public health.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by the
secretary of health and environment from any one or more special revenue
funds of the department of health and environment – division of public
health that have available moneys to the sponsored project overhead fund

HB 2082 111
– health (264-00-2912-2710) of the department of health and environment
– division of public health for expenditures, as the case may be, for
administrative expenses.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amounts
transferred by the director of accounts and reports from each of the special
revenue funds of the department of health and environment – division of
public health to the sponsored project overhead fund – health (264-00-
2912-2710) of the department of health and environment – division of
public health pursuant to this section may include amounts not to exceed
25% of the expenditures from such special revenue fund or funds,
excepting expenditures for contractual services.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the department of health and environment –
division of public health or the department of health and environment –
division of environment to another item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the state general fund for the department of health and
environment – division of public health or the department of health and
environment – division of environment. The secretary of health and
environment shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of health and environment – division of public
health from moneys appropriated from the district coroners fund (264-00-
2653-2320) for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, and
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 22a-245, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by the department
of health and environment – division of public health from such moneys
appropriated from the district coroners fund of the department of health
and environment – division of public health for fiscal year 2026 pursuant
to K.S.A. 22a-242, and amendments thereto.
(h) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$200,000 from the health care stabilization fund (270-00-7404-2100) of
the health care stabilization fund board of governors to the health facilities
review fund (264-00-2505-2250) of the department of health and
environment – division of public health for the purpose of financing a
review of records of licensed medical care facilities and an analysis of
quality of health care services provided to assist in correcting substandard
services and to reduce the incidence of liability resulting from the
rendering of health care services and implementing the risk management

HB 2082 112
provisions of K.S.A. 65-4922 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(i) There is appropriated for the above agency from the children's
initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Healthy start (264-00-2000-2105)................................................$1,660,924
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the healthy start account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Infants and toddlers program (264-00-2000-2107)......................$5,800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the infants and toddlers
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Smoking prevention (264-00-2000-2109)....................................$1,001,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the smoking prevention
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
SIDS network grant (264-00-2000-2115).......................................$122,106
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the SIDS network grant
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the child care health and safety grants
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(j) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state water plan
project or projects specified as follows:
Water quality (264-00-1800).............................................................$32,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the contamination
remediation (264-00-1800-1802) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated to the water quality account for fiscal year
2026.
(k) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of health and environment – division of public
health during fiscal year 2026 from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or any special revenue fund or funds by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made from such moneys to contract for the services
of one or more persons to survey and certify dialysis treatment facilities
located in the state of Kansas: Provided, That, if the above agency has not
surveyed a newly constructed dialysis treatment facility within one year
after the operator of the facility notifies the above agency that the facility
is operational, then the above agency may charge the cost of any survey
performed on the facility to the operator of such facility: Provided further,
That any expenditure of moneys and any survey conducted pursuant to this

HB 2082 113
subsection shall comply with requirements imposed by federal law.
(l) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-242, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such moneys to distribute to each local health department an amount of not
less than $12,000 upon application therefor in accordance with K.S.A. 65-
242, and amendments thereto: Provided, That any remaining moneys
appropriated for such purpose, if any, after making distributions in
accordance with this subsection shall be distributed in accordance with
K.S.A. 65-242, and amendments thereto: Provided, however, That, if
sufficient funds are not available to make a minimum distribution of
$12,000, then the provisions of K.S.A. 65-242, and amendments thereto,
shall control.
(m) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the moneys that are identified as moneys
from the federal government for coronavirus relief aid to the state of
Kansas and appropriated in any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from such moneys appropriated from such special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 to reimburse for testing certified testing
laboratories that have entered into an agreement with the above agency
and are providing community COVID-19 testing to the general public.
Sec. 73.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF HEALTH CARE FINANCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (264-00-1000-0010)...............................$5,578,222
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $51,836,512 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
79(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the children's health insurance program account (264-00-
1000-0060), the sum of $19,653,311 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $728,305,486 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
79(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the other medical assistance account (264-00-1000-3026),
the sum of $28,060,632 is hereby lapsed.

HB 2082 114
(d) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 79(b) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the medical programs
fee fund (264-00-2395-0110) of the department of health and environment
– division of health care finance is hereby decreased from $126,123,554 to
$110,153,554.
(e) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $8,696,232
from the health care access improvement fund (264-00-2443-2215) of the
department of health and environment – division of health care finance to
the state general fund.
Sec. 74.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF HEALTH CARE FINANCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (264-00-1000-0010).............................$49,759,178
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made from
the operating expenditures account of the above agency for the drug
utilization review board to perform an annual review of the approved
exemptions to the current single source limit by program.
Children's health
insurance program (264-00-1000-0060)...............................$51,836,512
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's health
insurance program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Special enhanced FMAP (264-00-1000-0449).............................$4,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the special enhanced FMAP
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Other medical assistance (264-00-1000-3026)........................$719,137,992
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the other medical assistance
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from
the other medical assistance account by the above agency for the purpose
of implementing or expanding any prior authorization project: And
provided further, That an evaluation of the automated implementation,
savings obtained from implementation, and other outcomes of the
implementation or expansion shall be submitted to the Robert G. (Bob)
Bethell joint committee on home and community based services and
KanCare oversight prior to the start of the regular session of the legislature

HB 2082 115
in 2026.
Wichita center for graduate
medical education (264-00-1000-3027)..................................$2,950,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Wichita center for
graduate medical education account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Graduated medical education (264-00-1000-3028).....................$1,300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the graduated medical
education account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
MMIS and data analysis fund (264-00-2002-2002).........................No limit
Medical assistance fee fund (264-00-2185-2185)............................No limit
Division of health care finance special
revenue fund (264-00-2360-2350)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the division of health care finance
special revenue fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Association assistance
plan fund (264-00-2391-2391)....................................................No limit
Medical programs fee fund (264-00-2395-0110).....................$112,314,323
Other state fees fund (264-00-2440-0100)........................................No limit
Health care access
improvement fund (264-00-2443-2215)......................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6217, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the interest earnings transferred from the state general fund
to the health care access improvement fund pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(d),
and amendments thereto, shall not include any amount attributable to the
credit received pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)(1), and amendments thereto:
Provided further, That the amount credited pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)
(1), and amendments thereto, shall be limited to the amount estimated by
the department of health and environment that is necessary to maintain a
positive cash balance in the health care access improvement fund: And
provided further, That such credit shall not exceed 80% of the moneys
estimated by the director of the budget to be received from the assessment
imposed on hospital providers pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6208, and
amendments thereto, and credited to the health care access improvement
fund during such fiscal year.

HB 2082 116
Health committee
insurance fund (264-00-2569-2500)............................................No limit
Health care database
fee fund (264-00-2578-2570)......................................................No limit
Quality based community
assessment fund (264-00-2760-2760).........................................No limit
Energy assistance
block grant (264-00-3305-3305).................................................No limit
Temporary assistance for
needy families (264-00-3323-3530)............................................No limit
Ryan White title II –
federal fund (264-00-3328-3310)................................................No limit
HIV care formula grant
federal fund (264-00-3328-3311)................................................No limit
Title IV-E – adoption
assistance (264-00-3357-3357)....................................................No limit
Medical assistance program
federal fund (264-00-3414-0440)................................................No limit
Children's health insurance program
federal fund (264-00-3424-0540)................................................No limit
State planning – health care –
uninsured fund (264-00-3483-3483)...........................................No limit
KEES interagency
transfer fund (264-00-6001-6001)...............................................No limit
Transforming maternal health fund..................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, any moneys donated
or granted to the division of health care finance of the department of health
and environment and any federal funds received as match to such
donations or grants by the division of health care finance of the department
of health and environment for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall
only be expended by the division of health care finance of the department
of health and environment to assist the clearinghouse in reducing any
backlogs or waiting lists, unless otherwise specified by the donor or
grantor: Provided, That any donated or granted moneys, and the matching
moneys received therefor from the federal centers for medicare and
medicaid services, shall not be used to supplant or replace funds already
budgeted for the clearinghouse or to restore any other reductions in
funding to the clearinghouse or the agency, unless otherwise specified by
the donor or grantor.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department of
health and environment – division of health care finance from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund

HB 2082 117
or funds for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys to set the monthly protected income level
for purposes of determining the person's client obligation at an amount
equal to 300% of federal supplemental security income for any person in
Kansas receiving home and community-based services administered under
section 1915(c) of the federal social security act and any person in Kansas
receiving services from a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly
administered by the Kansas department for aging and disability services.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department of
health and environment – division of health care finance from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund
or funds for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys to implement analytical and publicly
available reporting that is compliant with the privacy rule of the
administrative simplification subtitle of the health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191), and any federal
regulations adopted thereunder, to measure outcomes and effectiveness of
the health homes program known as onecare Kansas and to assist
providers with the provisions of the health homes program.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department of
health and environment – division of health care finance from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund
or funds for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys to submit to the United States centers for
medicare and medicaid services a waiver request to allow for medicaid
reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric acute care.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 38-2001, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency
to provide coverage under the state children's health insurance program for
children residing in a household that has a gross household income not to
exceed 250% of the federal poverty guidelines.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency

HB 2082 118
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year 2026 by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made from such moneys to work with hospice
stakeholders to identify and submit to the centers for medicare and
medicaid services any required state plan amendments needed to
implement new payment and systems for hospice providers for fiscal year
2026.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to study the
required billing codes and costs of providing remote non-stress tests and
ultrasound procedures to pregnant women through the medicaid program:
Provided, That the results of such study shall be submitted to the senate
committee on public health and welfare and house of representatives
committee on health and human services on or before January 12, 2026.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the department of health and environment –
division of health care finance from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by such
agency from such moneys during fiscal year 2026 to submit to the United
States centers for medicare and medicaid services an approval request to
increase the hospital provider assessment rate to an amount not less than
5% and not greater than 6%, to include hospital inpatient and outpatient
net operating revenue in the hospital provider assessment and to base such
assessment on each hospital's fiscal year 2022: Provided, That the
department of health and environment shall cause notice of such approval
by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services to be
published in the Kansas register: And provided further, That the changes to
the hospital provider assessment described in this subsection shall take
effect on and after January 1 or July 1 immediately following such
publication: And provided further, That, after such date, no additional
moneys appropriated from the state general fund shall be expended to
support rate enhancements under the hospital provider assessment.
(k) On July 1, 2025, the director of the budget shall calculate and
certify to the director of accounts and reports the amount of interest

HB 2082 119
deposited to the health care access improvement fund attributable to the
credit received pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)(1), and amendments thereto,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025: Provided, That upon receipt of
such certification, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer such certified amount from
the health care access improvement fund to the state general fund:
Provided further, That when the director of the budget transmits such
certification to the director of accounts and reports, the director of the
budget shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of
legislative research.
Sec. 75.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF ENVIRONMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) (264-00-1000-0300)................................................$350,000
Sec. 76.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF ENVIRONMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) (264-00-1000-0300).............................................$3,399,345
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the small town infrastructure account (264-
00-1000-1730) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Air quality fee fund (264-00-2020-2830).........................................No limit
Laboratory medicaid cost recovery fund –
environment (264-00-2092-2060)...............................................No limit
Hazardous waste
collection fund (264-00-2099-2010)...........................................No limit
Driving under the
influence fund (264-00-2101-2020)............................................No limit
Office of laboratory services

HB 2082 120
operating fund (264-00-2161-2161)............................................No limit
Health and environment training fee fund –
environment (264-00-2175-2170)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the health and
environment training fee fund – environment for acquisition and
distribution of division of environment program literature and films and
for participation in or conducting training seminars for training employees
of the division of environment of the department of health and
environment, for training recipients of state aid from the division of
environment of the department of health and environment and for training
representatives of industries affected by rules and regulations of the
department of health and environment relating to the division of
environment: Provided further, That the secretary of health and
environment is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in order to
recover costs incurred for such acquisition and distribution of literature
and films and for the operation of such seminars: And provided further,
That such fees may be fixed in order to recover all or part of such costs:
And provided further, That all moneys received from such fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the health and
environment training fee fund – environment: And provided further, That,
in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by
the department of health and environment for the division of environment
from moneys appropriated from the health and environment training fee
fund – environment for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
department of health and environment from the health and environment
training fee fund – environment for fiscal year 2026 for agency operations
for the division of environment.
Chemical control fee fund (264-00-2212-2360)...............................No limit
Subsurface hydrocarbon
storage fund (264-00-2228-2380)................................................No limit
Mined-land conservation and reclamation
fee fund (264-00-2233-2220)......................................................No limit
Salt solution mining well
plugging fund (264-00-2247-2390).............................................No limit
Solid waste management fund (264-00-2271-2075)........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the solid waste
management fund during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official
hospitality: Provided further, That such expenditures for official hospitality
shall not exceed $2,500.
Public water supply fee fund (264-00-2284-2085)...........................No limit
Voluntary cleanup fund (264-00-2288-2120)...................................No limit
Lead-based paint hazard

HB 2082 121
fee fund (264-00-2289-2140)......................................................No limit
Environmental use
control fund (264-00-2292-2310)................................................No limit
Storage tank fee fund (264-00-2293-2090)......................................No limit
Small employer cafeteria plan
development program (264-00-2386-2382)................................No limit
QuantiFERON TB
laboratory fund (264-00-2458-2460)...........................................No limit
Hazardous waste
management fund (264-00-2519-2290).......................................No limit
Health and environment publication fee fund –
environment (264-00-2544-2195)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health and environment publication
fee fund – environment shall be made only for the purpose of paying the
expenses of publishing documents as required by K.S.A. 75-5662, and
amendments thereto.
Waste tire management fund (264-00-2635-2820)...........................No limit
Local air quality control authority regulation
services fund (264-00-2657-2330)..............................................No limit
Environmental response fund (264-00-2662-2400)..........................No limit
Mined-land reclamation fund (264-00-2685-2560)..........................No limit
Water program
management fund (264-00-2798-2798).......................................No limit
Sponsored project overhead
fund – environment (264-00-2911-2720)....................................No limit
Environmental response RMDL act –
federal fund (264-00-3005-3010)................................................No limit
USDA conservation partnership –
federal fund (264-00-3022-3022)................................................No limit
EPA – core support –
federal fund (264-00-3040-3000)................................................No limit
Environmental response remedial activity specific
sites – federal fund (264-00-3040-3003).....................................No limit
Environmental response –
federal fund (264-00-3066-3010)................................................No limit
Emergency environmental response – nonspecific
sites federal fund (264-00-3067-3030)........................................No limit
Department of defense and state cooperative
agreement – federal fund (264-00-3067-3031)............................No limit
Air quality program –
federal fund (264-00-3072-3090)................................................No limit
Increasing technical assistance for
regenerative agriculture peer mentoring

HB 2082 122
programs fund (264-00-3083-3083)............................................No limit
EPA water monitoring –
federal fund (264-00-3086-4200)................................................No limit
Intoxilyzer replacement –
federal fund (264-00-3092-3092)................................................No limit
Other federal grants –
federal fund (264-00-3095-5450)................................................No limit
Medicare program – environment –
federal fund (264-00-3096-3050)................................................No limit
EPA multi-purpose grant –
federal fund (264-00-3103-3630)................................................No limit
Alcohol impaired driving
countermeasures incentive grants –
federal fund (264-00-3247-3247)................................................No limit
Air quality section 103 –
federal fund (264-00-3248-3246)................................................No limit
Air quality section 105 –
federal fund (264-00-3249-3249)................................................No limit
Kansas clean diesel grant –
federal fund (264-00-3249-3250)................................................No limit
Air quality program –
federal fund (264-00-3253-3253)................................................No limit
Water related grants –
federal fund (264-00-3254-3260)................................................No limit
Operator outreach training program –
federal fund (264-00-3259-3259)................................................No limit
Water protection state grants –
federal fund (264-00-3264-3264)................................................No limit
Network exchange grant –
federal fund (264-00-3267-3267)................................................No limit
Multi-media capacity building –
federal fund (264-00-3277-3277)................................................No limit
Brownfields revolving loan program –
federal fund (264-00-3278-3278)................................................No limit
Expanding public health
workforce fund (264-00-3287-3287)...........................................No limit
Water supply – federal fund (264-00-3295-3130)............................No limit
EPA underground injection control –
federal fund (264-00-3295-3288)................................................No limit
Public water supply loan
operations fund (264-00-3295-3295)...........................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (264-00-3360-3539).................................................No limit

HB 2082 123
EPA state response program –
federal fund (264-00-3370-3915)................................................No limit
Ticket to work grant –
federal fund (264-00-3417-4367)................................................No limit
Demo to maintenance-indep. employer –
federal fund (264-00-3419-3419)................................................No limit
Health watershed initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3558-3558)................................................No limit
Resource conservation and recovery act –
federal fund (264-00-3586-3190)................................................No limit
EPA underground injection control –
federal fund (264-00-3618-3230)................................................No limit
Sec. 106 monitoring initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3619-3240)................................................No limit
EPA pollution prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3619-3240)................................................No limit
Assistance for small and disadvantaged
communities drinking water grant
program fund (264-00-3655-3655)..............................................No limit
Solid waste infrastructure for
recycling fund (264-00-3659-3659)............................................No limit
Drinking water lead testing in school and
child care programs –
federal fund (264-00-3670-3601)................................................No limit
Gulf of Mexico
program fund (264-00-3703-3703)..............................................No limit
Environmental
justice fund (264-00-3706-3706).................................................No limit
Sewer overflow municipal grants
program fund (264-00-3707-3707)..............................................No limit
104G outreach training program –
federal fund (264-00-3722-3500)................................................No limit
Underground storage tank –
federal fund (264-00-3732-3510)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (264-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Leaking underground storage tank trust –
federal fund (264-00-3812-3700)................................................No limit
Surface mining control and reclamation act –
federal fund (264-00-3820-3760)................................................No limit
Abandoned mined-land –
federal fund (264-00-3821-3770)................................................No limit
Climate pollution reduction

HB 2082 124
grants fund (264-00-3897-3897).................................................No limit
EPA non-point source –
federal fund (264-00-3889-3940)................................................No limit
Adv. health equity for
diabetes fund (264-00-3901-3901)..............................................No limit
Pollution prevention program –
federal fund (264-00-3908-3990)................................................No limit
Inspections Kansas infrastructure projects –
federal fund (264-00-3910-3950)................................................No limit
EPA nonpoint source implementation –
federal fund (264-00-3915-3915)................................................No limit
Strengthening U.S. public
health fund (264-00-3926-3926).................................................No limit
Expanding COVID-19
vaccination fund (264-00-3931-3931).........................................No limit
WISEWOMAN fund (264-00-3933-3933).......................................No limit
KS CCR state permitting
program fund (264-00-3934-3934)..............................................No limit
Natural resources damages
trust fund (264-00-7265-7265)....................................................No limit
Volkswagen environmental fund (264-00-7269-7269).....................No limit
Gifts, grants and donations
fund – environment (264-00-7314-7095)....................................No limit
Asbestos remediation fund (264-00-7342-7342)..............................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-5309, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, all fees or other moneys
collected by the above agency during fiscal year 2026 related to asbestos
remediation, as certified by the secretary of health and environment, shall
be credited to the asbestos remediation fund.
Special bequest fund –
environment (264-00-7367-7040)...............................................No limit
Environmental
stewardship fund (264-00-7396-7096)........................................No limit
UST redevelopment fund (264-00-7397-7080)................................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes authorized by K.S.A. 65-
34,132, and amendments thereto, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
65-34,139(a)(3), and amendments thereto, expenditures shall be made
from the UST redevelopment fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of
reimbursing eligible owners of underground storage tanks, if, pursuant to
K.S.A. 65-34,139, and amendments thereto, the owner replaces all
components of a single-wall storage tank system with a secondary
containment system that complies with K.S.A. 65-34,138, and
amendments thereto, after August 8, 2005.

HB 2082 125
Aboveground petroleum storage tank release
trust fund (264-00-7398-7070)....................................................No limit
Underground petroleum storage tank release
trust fund (264-00-7399-7060)....................................................No limit
Risk management fund (264-00-7402-7402)....................................No limit
Drycleaning facility release
trust fund (264-00-7407-7250)....................................................No limit
Brownfields revolving loan
program fund (264-00-7526-7103)..............................................No limit
Certification of environmental
liability fund (264-00-7527-7230)...............................................No limit
Kansas water pollution control
revolving fund (264-00-7530-7400)............................................No limit
Provided, That the proceeds from revenue bonds issued by the Kansas
development finance authority to provide matching grant payments under
the federal clean water act of 1987 (P.L. 92-500) shall be credited to the
Kansas water pollution control revolving fund: Provided further, That
expenditures from this fund shall be made to provide for the payment of
such matching grants.
Cost of issuance fund for Kansas water
pollution control revolving fund
revenue bonds (264-00-7531-7600)............................................No limit
Surcharge operations fund for Kansas
water pollution control revolving
fund revenue bonds (264-00-7531-7620)....................................No limit
Public water supply
loan fund (264-00-7539-7800)....................................................No limit
Surcharge fund for Kansas water
pollution control revolving fund
revenue bonds (264-00-7539-7805)............................................No limit
P/C safety net clinic loan
guarantee fund (264-00-7551-7595)............................................No limit
Kansas water pollution control
operations fund (264-00-7960-8300)...........................................No limit
KWPC surcharge
services fees (264-00-7961-8400)...............................................No limit
KPWS revolving fund (264-00-7968-8500).....................................No limit
KPWS surcharge service fees (264-00-7969-8600).........................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state water plan
project or projects specified as follows:
Water quality (264-00-1800)........................................................$8,033,309
Resiliency (264-00-1800).............................................................$1,075,000

HB 2082 126
Any unencumbered balance of the state water plan fund in the following
accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Contamination remediation (264-00-1800-1802);
local environmental protection program (264-00-1800-1803); nonpoint
source program (264-00-1800-1804); TMDL initiatives and use
attainability analysis (264-00-1800-1805); drinking water protection (264-
00-1800-1806); watershed restoration and protection plan (264-00-1800-
1808); aquifer recharge basin (264-00-1800-1809); Milford and Marion
reservoirs harmful algae bloom pilot (264-00-1800-1810); stream trash
removal (264-00-1800-1816); and small town infrastructure (264-00-1800-
1817).
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state water plan fund for the department of health and
environment – division of environment to another item of appropriation
for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the department of
health and environment – division of environment: Provided, That the
director of the Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the department of health and environment –
division of environment to any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state water plan fund for the Kansas water office, university of
Kansas, Kansas department of wildlife and parks or the Kansas department
of agriculture: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water office shall
certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 65-3024, and amendments thereto, the director of
accounts and reports shall not make the transfers of amounts of interest
earnings from the state general fund to the air quality fee fund (264-00-
2020-2830) of the department of health and environment, which are
directed to be made on or before the 10th day of each month by K.S.A. 65-
3024, and amendments thereto.
(g) On July 1, 2025, and on other occasions during fiscal year 2026
when necessary, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts
specified by the secretary of health and environment that constitute
reimbursements, credits and other amounts received by the department of

HB 2082 127
health and environment for activities related to federal programs, from
specified special revenue fund or funds of the department of health and
environment – division of public health or of the department of health and
environment – division of environment, to the sponsored project overhead
fund – environment (264-00-2911-2720) of the department of health and
environment – division of environment.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by the
secretary of health and environment from any one or more special revenue
fund or funds of the department of health and environment – division of
environment that have available moneys to the sponsored project overhead
fund – environment (264-00-2911-2720) of the department of health and
environment – division of environment or to the sponsored project
overhead fund – health (264-00-2912-2710) of the department of health
and environment – division of public health, as the case may be, for
expenditures for administrative expenses.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state general fund for the department of health and environment – division
of public health or the department of health and environment – division of
environment to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state general fund for the department of health and environment – division
of public health or the department of health and environment – division of
environment. The secretary of health and environment shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amounts
transferred by the director of accounts and reports from each of the special
revenue funds of the department of health and environment – division of
environment to the sponsored project overhead fund – environment (264-
00-2911-2720) of the department of health and environment – division of
environment pursuant to this section may include amounts equal to not
more than 25% of the expenditures from such special revenue fund,
excepting expenditures for contractual services.
Sec. 77.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
KanCare caseloads (039-00-1000-0610)......................................$8,501,496
Larned state hospital – operating
expenditures (410-00-1000-0103).........................................$32,925,958

HB 2082 128
Osawatomie state hospital – operating
expenditures (494-00-1000-0100)...........................................$3,250,000
Osawatomie state hospital – certified
care expenditures (494-00-1000-0101)...................................$7,750,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $67,188,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the non-KanCare caseloads account (039-00-1000-0611),
the sum of $6,068,257 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $470,843,123 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the KanCare non-caseloads account (039-00-1000-0612),
the sum of $144,523,782 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the $41,501,607 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state
finance council by section 145(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws
of Kansas from the state general fund in the state operations account (039-
00-1000-0801), the sum of $1,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
(e) On the effective date of this act, of the $54,184,328 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the community mental health
centers support account (039-00-1000-3001), the sum of $2,200,441 is
hereby lapsed.
(f) On the effective date of this act, of the $29,883,075 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the behavioral health services account (039-00-1000-
3004), the sum of $435,000 is hereby lapsed.
(g) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
appropriated and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session
Laws of Kansas from the state general fund in the counties and hospitals
reimbursement account (039-00-1000-3005), the sum of $6,584,188 is
hereby lapsed.
(h) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the problem gambling and addictions grant fund (039-00-2371-
2371) of the Kansas department for aging and disability services is hereby
increased from $8,420,470 to $8,970,470.
(i) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation

HB 2082 129
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the Larned state hospital fee fund (410-00-2073-2100) of the
Kansas department for aging and disability services is hereby increased
from $3,759,367 to $5,937,094.
Sec. 78.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Mental health intervention team pilot (039-00-1000-0160).......$18,034,722
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the mental health
intervention team pilot account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Administration
official hospitality (039-00-1000-0204).........................................$1,748
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the administration official
hospitality account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Senior care act (039-00-1000-0260)............................................$5,515,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the senior care act account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That all people receiving or applying for services
that are funded, either partially or entirely, through expenditures from this
account shall be placed in appropriate services that are determined to be
the most economical services available with regard to state general fund
expenditures.
Any unencumbered balance in the program for all-inclusive care for the
elderly account (039-00-1000-0270) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Program grants – nutrition –
state match (039-00-1000-0280).............................................$8,045,725
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the program grants –
nutrition – state match account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the
secretary for aging and disability services shall submit to the senate
committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee
on appropriations at the beginning of the 2026 regular session of the
legislature a report of the information contained in such reports from the
area agencies on aging on expenditures for federal fiscal year 2025: And
provided further, That all people receiving or applying for services that are
funded, either partially or entirely, through expenditures from this account
shall be placed in appropriate services that are determined to be the most

HB 2082 130
economical services available with regard to state general fund
expenditures.
LTSS services (039-00-1000-0520)...........................................$26,464,860
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the LTSS services account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
KanCare caseloads (039-00-1000-0610)..................................$648,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KanCare caseloads
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Non-KanCare caseloads (039-00-1000-0611)............................$69,967,030
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the non-KanCare caseloads
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all people receiving or applying
for services that are funded, either partially or entirely, from the non-
KanCare caseloads account shall be placed in appropriate services that are
determined to be the most economical services available with regard to
state general fund expenditures.
KanCare non-caseloads (039-00-1000-0612)..........................$480,535,116
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KanCare non-caseloads
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
State operations (039-00-1000-0801).........................................$26,344,371
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state operations account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from this
account for the purchase of professional liability insurance for physicians
and dentists at any institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-12a01, and
amendments thereto.
Alcohol and drug abuse
services grants (039-00-1000-1010).......................................$8,918,139
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the alcohol and drug abuse
services grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Community mental health
centers support (039-00-1000-3001).....................................$54,184,328
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community mental health
centers support account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional beds (039-00-1000-3003)...........................................$14,650,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional beds account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.

HB 2082 131
Behavioral health services (039-00-1000-3004)........................$14,433,075
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the behavioral health
services account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Counties and hospitals
reimbursement (039-00-1000-3005).......................................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the counties and hospitals
reimbursement account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Aging services grants (039-00-1000-3006)..................................$5,344,597
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aging services grants
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
CDDO support (039-00-1000-4001)..........................................$11,474,857
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CDDO support account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Wichita hospital (039-00-1000).................................................$15,000,000
Crisis funding (039-00-1000).....................................................$26,461,100
Kansas neurological institute – operating
expenditures (363-00-1000-0303).........................................$19,398,088
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas neurological
institute – operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Kansas neurological institute – operating
expenditures account for official hospitality by the superintendent shall not
exceed $150: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made from this
account to assist residents of the institution to take personally used items
that are constructed for use by such residents and which are hereby
authorized to be transferred to such residents from the institution to
communities when such residents leave the institution to reside in the
communities.
Larned state hospital – operating
expenditures (410-00-1000-0103).........................................$83,799,365
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned state hospital –
operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the Larned state hospital – operating expenditures
account for official hospitality by the superintendent shall not exceed
$150: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from this account
for educational services contracts, which are hereby authorized to be
negotiated and entered into by Larned state hospital with unified school
districts or other public educational services providers: And provided

HB 2082 132
further, That such educational services contracts shall not be subject to the
competitive bidding requirements of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments
thereto.
Larned state hospital – sexual predator treatment
program (410-00-1000-0200)...............................................$26,847,730
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned state hospital –
sexual predator treatment program account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Osawatomie state hospital – operating
expenditures (494-00-1000-0100).........................................$43,003,873
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Osawatomie state hospital – operating
expenditures account for official hospitality by the superintendent shall not
exceed $150.
Osawatomie state hospital – certified
care expenditures (494-00-1000-0101).................................$16,548,795
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – certified care expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Osawatomie state hospital –
SPTP MiCo (494-00-1000-0200)............................................$2,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – SPTP MiCo account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Parsons state hospital and training center –
operating expenditures (507-00-1000-0100)........................$21,889,653
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Parsons state hospital
and training center – operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the Parsons state hospital and training
center – operating expenditures account for official hospitality by the
superintendent shall not exceed $150: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account for educational services
contracts, which are hereby authorized to be negotiated and entered into by
Parsons state hospital and training center with unified school districts or
other public educational services providers: And provided further, That
such educational services contracts shall not be subject to the competitive
bidding requirements of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto: And
provided further, That expenditures shall be made from this account to
assist residents of the institution to take personally used items that are
constructed for use by such residents and which are hereby authorized to

HB 2082 133
be transferred to such residents from the institution to communities when
such residents leave the institution to reside in the communities.
Parsons state hospital and
training center – sexual predator
treatment program (507-00-1000-0200).................................$2,595,207
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Parsons state hospital
and training center – sexual predator treatment program account in excess
of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Other
medical assistance (039-00-1000-3002); and indigent support (039-00-
1000-3007).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
DADS social welfare fund (039-00-2141-2195)..............................No limit
Indirect cost fund (039-00-2193-2193).............................................No limit
Health occupations credentialing
fee fund (039-00-2315-2315)......................................................No limit
Community mental health center
improvement fund (039-00-2336-2336)......................................No limit
Community crisis stabilization
centers fund (039-00-2337-2337)................................................No limit
Clubhouse model
program fund (039-00-2338-2338)..............................................No limit
Medical resources and
collection fund (039-00-2363-2100)...........................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received or collected by the secretary for aging
and disability services due to medicaid overpayments shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the medical resources and
collection fund: Provided further, That expenditures from such fund shall
be made for medicaid program-related expenses and used to reduce state
general fund outlays for the medicaid program: And provided further, That
all moneys received or collected by the secretary for aging and disability
services due to civil monetary penalty assessments against adult care
homes shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the medical resources and collection fund: And provided
further, That expenditures from such fund shall be made to protect the
health or property of adult care home residents as required by federal law.
Problem gambling and addictions

HB 2082 134
grant fund (039-00-2371-2371)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
problem gambling and addictions grant fund, not to exceed $5,000,000, to
provide reimbursement to organizations that provide substance use
disorder treatment for uninsured individuals.
State licensure fee fund (039-00-2373-2370)...................................No limit
General fees fund (039-00-2524-2500)............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to collect: (1) Fees from the sale of surplus property; (2) fees
charged for searching, copying and transmitting copies of public records;
(3) fees paid by employees for personal long distance calls, postage, faxed
messages, copies and other authorized uses of state property; and (4) other
miscellaneous fees: Provided further, That such fees shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund: And
provided further, That expenditures shall be made from this fund to meet
the obligations of the Kansas department for aging and disability services
or to benefit and meet the mission of the Kansas department for aging and
disability services.
Title XIX fund (039-00-2595-4130).................................................No limit
Provided, That all receipts resulting from payments under title XIX of the
federal social security act to any of the institutions under mental health and
intellectual disabilities may be credited to the title XIX fund: Provided
further, That moneys in the title XIX fund may be used for expenditures
for contractual services to provide for collecting additional payments
under title XVIII and title XIX of the federal social security act and for
expenditures for premiums and surcharges required to be paid for
physicians' malpractice insurance.
Senior citizen nutrition
check-off fund (039-00-2660-2610)............................................No limit
Other state fees fund – community
alcohol treatment (039-00-2661-0000)........................................No limit
County competency
expense fund (039-00-2893-2893)..............................................No limit
988 suicide prevention and mental health crisis
hotline fund (039-00-2913-2913)..........................................$10,000,000
Quality care services fund (039-00-2999-2902)...............................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services, acting as the
agent of the secretary of health and environment, is hereby authorized to
collect the quality care assessment under K.S.A. 75-7435, and
amendments thereto, and notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-
7435, and amendments thereto, all moneys received for such quality care
assessments shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the

HB 2082 135
quality care services fund: Provided further, That all moneys in the quality
care services fund shall be used to finance initiatives to maintain or
improve the quantity and quality of skilled nursing care in skilled nursing
care facilities in Kansas in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7435, and
amendments thereto.
Opioid abuse treatment & prevention –
federal fund (039-00-3023-3024)................................................No limit
Kansas national background check program –
federal fund (039-00-3032-3132)................................................No limit
Money follows the person grant –
federal fund (039-00-3054-4000)................................................No limit
Survey & certification –
federal fund (039-00-3064-3064)................................................No limit
Provided, That transfers of moneys from the survey & certification –
federal fund to the state fire marshal may be made during fiscal year 2026
pursuant to a contract, which is hereby authorized to be entered into by the
secretary for aging and disability services with the state fire marshal to
provide fire and safety inspections for adult care homes and hospitals.
Improve local 988 capacity –
federal fund (039-00-3284-1333)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IIID –
federal fund (039-00-3286-3285)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IV & II –
federal fund (039-00-3288-3297)................................................No limit
National family caregiver support program IIIE –
federal fund (039-00-3289-3201)................................................No limit
Nutrition services incentives –
federal fund (039-00-3291-3305)................................................No limit
Prevention/treatment substance abuse –
federal fund (039-00-3301-0310)................................................No limit
Social service block
grant fund (039-00-3307-3371)...................................................No limit
Community mental health block grant –
federal fund (039-00-3310-0460)................................................No limit
PATH – federal fund (039-00-3347-4316)........................................No limit
TBI partnership
program fund (039-00-3376-3376)..............................................No limit
Special program for aging VII-3 –
federal fund (039-00-3402-3000)................................................No limit
Medicare fund – SHICK (039-00-3408-3400).................................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (039-00-3414-0442)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IIIC –

HB 2082 136
federal fund (039-00-3425-3423)................................................No limit
Medicare enrollment assistance program
fund – federal (039-00-3468-3450).............................................No limit
KS assisted outpatient treatment –
federal fund (039-00-3733-3101)................................................No limit
American rescue plan
state relief fund (039-00-3756-3536)..........................................No limit
BHSIS –
federal fund (039-00-3887-3891)................................................No limit
KS ccbhc planning grant –
federal fund (039-00-3930-3930)................................................No limit
Long-term care loan and
grant fund (039-00-5110-5100)...................................................No limit
KDFA refunding revenue bond
2013B fund (039-00-7111)..........................................................No limit
Trust fund (039-00-7299).................................................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (039-00-7309-7000).................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to receive gifts and donations of money for services to senior
citizens or purposes related thereto: Provided further, That such gifts and
donations of money shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the gifts and donations fund.
Larned state security hospital
KDFA 02N-1 fund (039-00-8703)...............................................No limit
SRS state of Kansas KDFA 04A-1
project fund (039-00-8704).........................................................No limit
State of Kansas projects
KDFA 2010E-F fund (039-00-8705)...........................................No limit
Parking deduction clearing fund (039-00-9233-9200).....................No limit
Medical assistance recovery
clearing fund (039-00-9300)........................................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (039-00-9400)..........................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute
fee fund (363-00-2059-2000)......................................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute title XIX
reimbursements fund (363-00-2060-2200)..................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute –
foster grandparents program –
federal fund (363-00-3115-3200)................................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – FGP gifts, grants,
donations fund (363-00-7125-7400)............................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – patient

HB 2082 137
benefit fund (363-00-7910-7100)................................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – work therapy patient
benefit fund (363-00-7940-7200)............................................... No limit
Larned state hospital
fee fund (410-00-2073-2100)......................................................No limit
Larned state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (410-00-2074-2200)..................................No limit
Larned state hospital – work therapy patient
benefit fund (410-00-7938-7200)................................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital
fee fund (494-00-2079-4200)......................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for the use of video
teleconferencing equipment at Osawatomie state hospital shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the video
teleconferencing fee account of the Osawatomie state hospital fee fund:
Provided further, That all moneys credited to the video teleconferencing
fee account shall be used solely for the servicing, technical and program
support, maintenance and replacement of associated equipment at
Osawatomie state hospital: And provided further, That any expenditures
from the video teleconferencing fee account shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the Osawatomie state hospital fee fund.
Osawatomie state hospital certified
care fund (494-00-2079-4201).....................................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (494-00-2080-4300)..................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital certified care title XIX
reimbursements fund (494-00-2080-4301)..................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital – cottage revenue and
expenditures fund (494-00-2159-2159).......................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital – training fee
revolving fund (494-00-2602-2000)............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for training activities for
Osawatomie state hospital shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the Osawatomie state hospital – training
fee revolving fund: Provided further, That the superintendent of
Osawatomie state hospital is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect
fees for training activities at Osawatomie state hospital: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the
expenses of such training activities for Osawatomie state hospital.
Osawatomie state hospital – motor pool
revolving fund (494-00-6164-5200)............................................No limit

HB 2082 138
Osawatomie state hospital –
canteen fund (494-00-7807-5600)...............................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital – work therapy patient
benefit fund (494-00-7939-5800)................................................No limit
Parsons state hospital and training center
fee fund (507-00-2082-2200)......................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for the use of video
teleconferencing equipment at Parsons state hospital and training center
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
video teleconferencing fee account of the Parsons state hospital and
training center fee fund: Provided further, That all moneys credited to the
video teleconferencing fee account shall be used solely for the servicing,
maintenance and replacement of video teleconferencing equipment at
Parsons state hospital and training center: And provided further, That any
expenditures from the video teleconferencing fee account shall be in
addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the Parsons state
hospital and training center fee fund.
Parsons state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (507-00-2083-2300)..................................No limit
Parsons state hospital and training center –
canteen fund (507-00-7808-5500)...............................................No limit
Parsons state hospital and training center – patient
benefit fund (507-00-7916-5600)................................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, and at other times during fiscal year 2026, when
necessary as determined by the secretary for aging and disability services,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the
secretary for aging and disability services, which amounts constitute
reimbursements, credits and other amounts received by the Kansas
department for aging and disability services for activities related to federal
programs from specified special revenue funds of the Kansas department
for aging and disability services to the indirect cost fund of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services.
(d) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Osawatomie state hospital,
upon the approval of the director of accounts and reports, shall transfer an
amount specified by the superintendent from the Osawatomie state
hospital – canteen fund (494-00-7807-5600) to the Osawatomie state
hospital – patient benefit fund (494-00-7914-5700).
(e) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Parsons state hospital,
upon approval from the director of accounts and reports, shall transfer an
amount specified by the superintendent from the Parsons state hospital and
training center – canteen fund (507-00-7808-5500) to the Parsons state
hospital and training center – patient benefit fund (507-00-7916-5600).

HB 2082 139
(f) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Larned state hospital, upon
approval of the director of accounts and reports, shall transfer an amount
specified by the superintendent from the Larned state hospital – canteen
fund (410-00-7806-7000) to the Larned state hospital – patient benefit
fund (410-00-7912-7100).
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, no moneys paid by
the Kansas department for aging and disability services from the CDDO
support account (039-00-1000-4001) of the state general fund shall be
expended by the entity receiving such moneys to pay membership dues
and fees to any entity that does not provide the Kansas department for
aging and disability services, the legislative division of post audit or
another state agency, access to its financial records upon request for such
access.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the state general fund for the Kansas department for aging and
disability services or any institution or facility under the general
supervision and management of the secretary for aging and disability
services to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
general fund for the Kansas department for aging and disability services or
any institution or facility under the general supervision and management
of the secretary for aging and disability services. The secretary for aging
and disability services shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of legislative research.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the state institutions building fund for the Kansas department
for aging and disability services or any institution or facility under the
general supervision and management of the secretary for aging and
disability services to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state institutions building fund for the Kansas department for
aging and disability services or any institution or facility under the general
supervision and management of the secretary for aging and disability
services. The secretary for aging and disability services shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(j) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the Kansas department for children and families from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 for the Kansas department for children and

HB 2082 140
families and in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of health and environment – division of public
health from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the department of
health and environment – division of public health, as authorized by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the secretary for children and families and
the secretary of health and environment for fiscal year 2026 to enter into a
contract with the secretary for aging and disability services, which is
hereby authorized and directed to be entered into by such secretaries, to
provide for the secretary for aging and disability services to perform the
powers, duties, functions and responsibilities prescribed by and to conduct
investigations pursuant to K.S.A. 39-1404, and amendments thereto, in
conjunction with the performance of such powers, duties, functions,
responsibilities and investigations by the secretary for children and
families and the secretary of health and environment under such statute,
with respect to reports of abuse, neglect or exploitation of residents or
reports of residents in need of protective services on behalf of the secretary
for children and families or the secretary of health and environment, as the
case may be, in accordance with and pursuant to K.S.A. 39-1404, and
amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026: Provided, That, in addition
to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the Kansas
department for aging and disability services from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 for the Kansas department for aging and disability services, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the secretary for aging and
disability services for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the performance of
such powers, duties, functions and responsibilities and to conduct such
investigations: Provided further, That, the words and phrases used in this
subsection shall have the meanings respectively ascribed thereto by K.S.A.
39-1401, and amendments thereto.
(k) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the title XIX fund (039-00-2595-4130) of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services to any institution or facility
under the general supervision and management of the secretary for aging
and disability services. The secretary for aging and disability services shall
certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(l) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5958, and

HB 2082 141
amendments thereto, or any other statute, and subject to appropriations, the
secretary for aging and disability services may provide rate increases for
nursing facilities for fiscal year 2026.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to operate,
or contract for the operation of, eight acute inpatient psychiatric care beds
for children in the city of Hays, Kansas, or the surrounding area: Provided,
however, That expenditures for such purposes during fiscal year 2026 shall
not exceed $4,000,000.
(n) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds as authorized by this or any other appropriation act
of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made
by such agency from such moneys to submit a report on a quarterly basis,
in collaboration with the Kansas department of health and environment, to
the Robert G. (Bob) Bethell joint committee on home and community
based services regarding the home and community-based services brain
injury waiver, including the:
(1) Number of members enrolled in such waiver at the end of the
month prior to the committee meeting;
(2) unduplicated number of such members over the course of the
calendar year;
(3) number of such members receiving services for a period longer
than 2 years and longer than 4 years;
(4) number of such members who did not receive services within a
period of 60, 90 or 120 or more days after being enrolled;
(5) number of such members who did not receive a specific waiver
service within a period of 30, 60, 90 or 120 or more days prior to the date
such member was officially unenrolled from such waiver;
(6) amount of the per-member, per-month enhanced dollar rate
provided to a managed care organization for each member enrolled in such
waiver;
(7) total number of members enrolled in the waiver disaggregated by
county and the per capita enrollment in such waiver disaggregated by
county; and
(8) agency's progress toward new policy implementation.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures from

HB 2082 142
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or in any special revenue
fund or funds as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, the above agency shall make
expenditures from such moneys to establish guidelines for nursing
facilities, as defined in K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments thereto, to request
a waiver from staffing requirements and to study establishing similar
guidelines for other adult care homes, as defined in K.S.A. 39-923, and
amendments thereto: Provided, That any such guidelines shall be
compatible with rules established by the United States centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
(p) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or in any special revenue
fund or funds as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, the above agency shall make
expenditures from such moneys to enter into agreements with community
mental health centers for the purpose of establishing rates for conducting
mobile competency evaluations.
(q) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 39-2019, and amendments thereto, in addition to the
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, the
above agency shall make expenditures from such moneys for the purpose
of certifying community behavioral health clinics when such clinics are
ready and meet the requirements for certification in advance of the
deadlines established in K.S.A. 39-2019, and amendments thereto.
(r) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys during
fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of submitting to the United States centers
for medicare and medicaid services an approval request to develop a home
and community-based services community supports waiver to provide
services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disability:
Provided, That the waiver application for such program shall reflect the
recommendations of the 2022 Special Committee on Intellectual and
Developmental Disability Waiver Modernization, including a per-person
maximum of $20,000 and offering services for transportation, supported
employment, individual-directed goods and services, personal care,

HB 2082 143
respite, therapy, assistive technology, independent living, family or
caregiver support and training, financial management services and support
brokers and benefits counseling.
(s) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to require
all assisted living facilities, residential healthcare facilities, home plus and
boarding care homes, as such terms are defined in K.S.A. 39-923, and
amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026 to submit a report to the
secretary for aging and disability services upon the completion of every
involuntary transfer or discharge of a resident pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-
102(d) and (f): Provided, however, That such reports shall include no
personally identifiable information: Provided further, That such report
shall include: (1) The date when notice of transfer or discharge was
provided; (2) the date when the resident left the facility; (3) the type of
facility where the resident was transferred or discharged; (4) the reason
that required the transfer or discharge of the resident pursuant to K.A.R.
26-39-102(d); (5) if the resident was transferred or discharged pursuant to
K.A.R. 26-39-102(f), the reason that required such transfer or discharge;
(6) if the resident filed a complaint regarding the notice of transfer or
discharge; and (7) any other relevant information required by the secretary:
And provided further, That any facility that fails to submit a report within
60 days of the completion of the transfer or discharge or resolution of a
formal complaint shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided in K.S.A.
39-946, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the secretary
shall establish a system and collect data from the long term care
ombudsman and such assisted living facilities, residential healthcare
facilities, home plus and boarding care homes on any involuntary transfers
or discharges pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-102(d) and (f): And provided
further, That the secretary shall compile all such information and submit a
report to the house of representatives committees on social services
budget, health and human services and judiciary and the senate committees
on public health and welfare and ways and means on the first day of the
2026 regular session of the legislature.
Sec. 79.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $256,483,476 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
86(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state

HB 2082 144
general fund in the youth services aid and assistance (629-00-1000-7020),
the sum of $4,009,818 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 80.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State operations (including
official hospitality) (629-00-1000-0013)............................$163,740,555
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state operations
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Hope ranch program for women (629-00-1000-0600)....................$300,000
Provided, That on or before January 12, 2026, the hope ranch program for
women shall report to the Kansas legislature on performance measures
evaluating the program's effectiveness for fiscal year 2026.
WeKanDrive (629-00-1000-0700)...............................................$1,056,982
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the WeKanDrive account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made from the
WeKanDrive account to expand the WeKanDrive program statewide to
support older youth in foster care and young adults in obtaining their
driver's license in Kansas.
Cash assistance (629-00-1000-2010).........................................$15,554,895
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cash assistance account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Vocational rehabilitation aid
and assistance (629-00-1000-5010)........................................$7,789,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vocational rehabilitation
aid and assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this account for the acquisition of durable medical
equipment and assistive technology devices: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account by the secretary for children
and families for the purchase of workers compensation insurance for
consumers of vocational rehabilitation services and assessments at work
sites and job tryout sites throughout the state.
Youth services aid
and assistance (629-00-1000-7020)....................................$292,918,938
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the youth services aid and
assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 145
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Social welfare fund (629-00-2195-0110)..........................................No limit
Project maintenance
reserve fund (629-00-2214-0150)................................................No limit
Other state fees fund (629-00-2220).................................................No limit
Disaster relief – federal fund (629-00-3005-7344)...........................No limit
Child care discretionary –
federal fund (629-00-3028-0522)................................................No limit
Title IV-B promoting safe/stable families –
federal fund (629-00-3302).........................................................No limit
Low-income home energy assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3305-0350)................................................No limit
Child welfare services state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3306-0341)................................................No limit
Social services block grant –
federal fund (629-00-3307-0370)................................................No limit
Commodity supp food program –
federal fund (629-00-3308-3215)................................................No limit
Social security – disability insurance –
federal fund (629-00-3309-0390)................................................No limit
Supplemental nutrition assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3311)..........................................................No limit
Emergency food assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3313-2310)................................................No limit
Rehabilitation services – vocational rehabilitation –
federal fund (629-00-3315).........................................................No limit
Child support enforcement –
federal fund (629-00-3316).........................................................No limit
Child care and development
mandatory and matching –
federal fund (629-00-3318-0523)................................................No limit
Temporary assistance to needy families –
federal fund (629-00-3323-0530)................................................No limit
SNAP technology project for success –
federal fund (629-00-3327-3327)................................................No limit
Title IV-E foster care –
federal fund (629-00-3337-0419)................................................No limit
Chafee education and
training vouchers program –
federal fund (629-00-3338-0425)................................................No limit

HB 2082 146
Adoption incentive payments –
federal fund (629-00-3343-0426)................................................No limit
Adoption assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3357-0418)................................................No limit
Chafee foster care independence program –
federal fund (629-00-3365-0417)................................................No limit
Headstart – federal fund (629-00-3379-6323)..................................No limit
Developmental disabilities basic support –
federal fund (629-00-3380-4360)................................................No limit
Children's justice grants to states –
federal fund (629-00-3381-7320)................................................No limit
Child abuse and neglect state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3382-7210)................................................No limit
Independent living state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3387).........................................................No limit
Independent living services for older blind –
federal fund (629-00-3388-5313)................................................No limit
Supported employment for
individuals with severe disabilities –
federal fund (629-00-3389).........................................................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Children's health insurance program –
federal fund (629-00-3424-0541)................................................No limit
SNAP employment and training exchange –
federal fund (629-00-3452-3452)................................................No limit
Child-care disaster – federal fund (629-00-3597-3597)...................No limit
Randolph sheppard FRRP –
federal fund (629-00-3647-3647)................................................No limit
Low income water assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3653-3653)................................................No limit
Adult prtctve srvcs eia –
federal fund (629-00-3658-3658)................................................No limit
SNAP pandemic ebt admin-21 –
federal fund (629-00-3661-0431)................................................No limit
SNAP summer ebt admin –
federal fund (629-00-3664-3664)................................................No limit
SNAP data grant –
federal fund (629-00-3674-3674)................................................No limit
Adult protective services crrsa21 –
federal fund (629-00-3680-3680)................................................No limit
Title IV-E kinship navigator –
federal fund (629-00-3712-0429)................................................No limit

HB 2082 147
CSFP ccc–federal fund (629-00-3730).............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (629-00-3753).............................................No limit
Prevention services grant fund (629-00-3813-0428)........................No limit
SRS enterprise fund (629-00-5105)..................................................No limit
Receipt suspense
clearing fund (629-00-9212-0910)..............................................No limit
Client assistance payment
clearing fund (629-00-9214-0930)..............................................No limit
Child support collections
clearing fund (629-00-9218-0970)..............................................No limit
EBT settlement fund (629-00-9219-0980)........................................No limit
CAP settlement fund (629-00-9219-0990).......................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (629-00-9405-9400).................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
children and families, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the Kansas department for
children and families to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the Kansas department for children and
families. The secretary for children and families shall certify each such
transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of
each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
children and families, with the approval of the director of the budget and
subject to the provisions of federal grant agreements, may transfer moneys
received under a federal grant that are credited to a federal fund of the
Kansas department for children and families to another federal fund of the
Kansas department for children and families. The secretary for children
and families shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
(e) There is appropriated for the above agency from the children's
initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Child care (629-00-2000-2406)....................................................$5,033,679
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child care account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Sec. 81.
KANSAS GUARDIANSHIP PROGRAM
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Kansas guardianship
program (261-00-1000-0300).................................................$1,471,827

HB 2082 148
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas guardianship
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 82.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 the following:
KPERS – school employer contributions – non-USDs (652-00-1000-0100)
.................................................................................................$1,379,498
KPERS – school employer contributions – USDs (652-00-1000-0110)
...............................................................................................$10,325,891
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $2,825,725,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025
by section 3(a) of chapter 98 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas from the
state general fund in the state foundation aid account (652-00-1000-0820),
the sum of $130,628,717 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $590,000,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 by section
3(a) of chapter 98 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the supplemental general state aid account (652-00-1000-
0840), the sum of $12,706,178 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the $3,027,848,697
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026
by section 3(a) of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the state foundation aid account (652-00-1000-
0820), the sum of $156,085,651 is hereby lapsed.
(e) On the effective date of this act, of the $625,000,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 by section
3(a) of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the supplemental general state aid account (652-00-1000-
0840), the sum of $4,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 83.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (652-00-1000-0053)..............................$15,862,797
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Center for READing (652-00-1000-0080)........................................$80,000
Provided, That the above agency shall expend moneys in such account to
provide a project manager grant to the center for reading at Pittsburg state

HB 2082 149
university to: (1) Assist in the development and support of a science of
reading curricula for the state educational institutions and colleges based
on the knowledge and practice standards that have been adopted by the
state department of education; (2) develop and support a recommended
dyslexia textbook list for in-class learning for school districts to use; (3)
develop and support a recommended dyslexia resources list for in-class
learning for school districts to use; (4) provide knowledge and support for
a train the trainer program and professional development curriculum for
school districts to use; and (5) provide knowledge and support for
developing a list of qualified trainers for school districts to hire.
KPERS – school employer
contributions – non-USDs (652-00-1000-0100)...................$33,881,520
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KPERS-school employer
contributions – non-USDs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
KPERS – school employer
contributions – USDs (652-00-1000-0110).........................$527,622,580
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KPERS-school employer
contributions – USDs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
ACT and workkeys assessments
program (652-00-1000-0140).................................................$2,800,000
Career and technical education transportation
state aid (652-00-1000-0190)..................................................$1,482,338
Education commission of
the states (652-00-1000-0220).....................................................$67,700
School safety and
security grants (652-00-1000-0235)........................................$5,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the school safety and
security grants account for fiscal year 2026 for disbursements of grant
moneys approved by the state board of education for the: Acquisition and
installation of security cameras and any other systems, equipment and
services necessary for security monitoring of facilities operated by a
school district and for securing doors, windows and any entrances to such
facilities; acquisition of communication devices and equipment necessary
for the effective communication between law enforcement, security
services and school; acquisition of naloxone hydrochloride products for
use by approved professionals; and salaries and wages, and associated
fringe benefits, for school resource officers and the costs associated with
any school resource officers provided by the city or county of such school
district: Provided further, That all moneys expended for school safety and
security grants for fiscal year 2026 shall be matched by the receiving
school district on a $1-for-$1 basis from other moneys of the district that

HB 2082 150
may be used for such purpose.
School district juvenile detention
facilities and Flint Hills job corps
center grants (652-00-1000-0290)..........................................$5,060,528
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the school district juvenile
detention facilities and Flint Hills job corps center grants account in excess
of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That expenditures shall be made from the school district
juvenile detention facilities and Flint Hills job corps center grants account
for grants to school districts in amounts determined pursuant to and in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 72-1173, and amendments
thereto.
School food assistance (652-00-1000-0320)................................$8,010,486
Virtual math education
program (652-00-1000-0330).................................................$2,000,000
Provided, That expenditures from the virtual math education program
account shall be used by the above agency for the purpose of
implementing a virtual math program to be used by school districts:
Provided further, That the above agency is hereby authorized to select and
implement a virtual math program that shall be customized to Kansas
curriculum standards, be evidence-based, not impose any fee or cost upon
students, provide tutoring in multiple languages, provide professional
development for the implementation of the program and have been
implemented in other states during the preceding eight fiscal years: And
provided further, That any school district shall be authorized to use such
program: And provided further, That the above agency shall recommend
that all school districts use such program: And provided further, That all
school districts shall track and report to the above agency twice during
school year 2025-2026, as determined by the above agency, on the number
of attendance centers and students who are and who are not using such
program or other virtual math program, the number of teachers
participating in the professional development provided by such program or
other virtual math program and the effect of any such virtual math program
on student academic proficiency: And provided further, That the above
agency shall compile such reports and submit a summary report to the
house of representatives standing committee on K-12 education budget
and the senate standing committee on education during the 2026 regular
session of the legislature: And provided further, That such report shall
include all available information reported to the above agency for school
year 2025-2026.
Mentor teacher (652-00-1000-0440)............................................$1,300,000
Educable deaf-blind and severely handicapped
children's programs aid (652-00-1000-0630).............................$110,000

HB 2082 151
Special education services aid (652-00-1000-0700)................$673,651,684
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the special education
services aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Governor's teaching excellence scholarships
and awards (652-00-1000-0770)................................................$360,693
Professional development
state aid (652-00-1000-0860)..................................................$1,770,000
Computer science education
advancement grant (652-00-1000-0920).................................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
computer science education advancement grant account for fiscal year
2026 to provide grants to high-quality professional learning providers to
develop and implement teacher professional development programs for the
computer science courses as established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-3258,
and amendments thereto.
AP tests low income students (652-00-1000)..................................$500,000
Childcare accelerator grants (652-00-1000)...............................$10,000,000
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law and
transfers to other state agencies shall not exceed the following:
School district capital improvement fund.........................................No limit
School district capital outlay state aid fund......................................No limit
Educational technology
coordinator fund (652-00-2157)..................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the educational technology
coordinator fund of the department of education to provide data on the
number of school districts served and cost savings for those districts in
fiscal year 2026 in order to assess the cost effectiveness of the position of
educational technology coordinator.
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (652-00-2230)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences: Provided
further, That the state board of education is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for inservice workshops and conferences: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of such operating expenditures incurred for inservice workshops and
conferences: And provided further, That all fees received for inservice

HB 2082 152
workshops and conferences shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the inservice education workshop fee fund.
Federal indirect cost
reimbursement fund (652-00-2312).............................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (652-00-2420)....................................................No limit
School bus safety fund (652-00-2532)..............................................No limit
State safety fund (652-00-2538).......................................................No limit
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-272, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, funds shall be distributed during
fiscal year 2026 as soon as moneys are available.
Motorcycle safety fund (652-00-2633).............................................No limit
Teacher and administrator
fee fund (652-00-2723)................................................................No limit
Service clearing fund (652-00-2869)................................................No limit
NAEP fee fund (652-00-2888)..........................................................No limit
SparkWheel program fund (652-00-2877).......................................No limit
ARPA supplemental (652-00-3028)..................................................No limit
Reimbursement for
services fund (652-00-3056)........................................................No limit
ESSA – student support academic enrichment –
federal fund (652-00-3113)..........................................................No limit
Educationally deprived
children – state operations –
federal fund (652-00-3131).........................................................No limit
Food assistance –
federal fund (652-00-3230).........................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund (652-00-3233).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped children
fund – federal (652-00-3234)......................................................No limit
Community-based
child abuse prevention –
federal fund (652-00-3319).........................................................No limit
TANF children's programs –
federal fund (652-00-3323).........................................................No limit
21st century community learning centers –
federal fund (652-00-3519).........................................................No limit
State assessments –
federal fund (652-00-3520).........................................................No limit
Rural and low-income schools program –
federal fund (652-00-3521).........................................................No limit

HB 2082 153
Language assistance state grants –
federal fund (652-00-3522).........................................................No limit
State grants for improving teacher quality –
federal fund (652-00-3526).........................................................No limit
State grants for improving
teacher quality – federal fund –
state operations (652-00-3527)....................................................No limit
Food assistance – school
breakfast program –
federal fund (652-00-3529).........................................................No limit
Food assistance – national
school lunch program –
federal fund (652-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Food assistance – child
and adult care food program –
federal fund (652-00-3531).........................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund – local education
agency fund (652-00-3532).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – state operations –
federal fund (652-00-3534).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – preschool –
federal fund (652-00-3535).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – preschool state
operations – federal (652-00-3536).............................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school
aid – federal fund – migrant
education fund (652-00-3537).....................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund – migrant education –
state operations (652-00-3538)....................................................No limit
Vocational education title II –
federal fund (652-00-3539).........................................................No limit
Vocational education title II – federal fund –
state operations (652-00-3540)....................................................No limit
Educational research grants and
projects fund (652-00-3592)........................................................No limit
ARPA agency state fiscal
recovery fund (652-00-3756).......................................................No limit
ARPA capital projects fund (652-00-3761)......................................No limit

HB 2082 154
Local school district contribution program
checkoff fund (652-00-7005).......................................................No limit
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 79-3221n, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, any moneys in such fund where a taxpayer fails to
designate a unified school district on such taxpayer's individual income tax
return may be expended by the above agency to distribute to unified
school districts.
Governor's teaching excellence
scholarships program
repayment fund (652-00-7221)....................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the governor's teaching excellence
scholarships program repayment fund shall be made in accordance with
K.S.A. 72-2166, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That each
such grant shall be required to be matched on a $1-for-$1 basis from
nonstate sources: And provided further, That award of each such grant shall
be conditioned upon the recipient entering into an agreement requiring the
grant to be repaid if the recipient fails to complete the course of training
under the national board for professional teaching standards certification
program: And provided further, That all moneys received by the
department of education for repayment of grants made under the
governor's teaching excellence scholarships program shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the governor's teaching
excellence scholarships program repayment fund.
Private donations, gifts, grants and
bequests fund (652-00-7307).......................................................No limit
Family and children
investment fund (652-00-7375)...................................................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the children's
initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Children's cabinet
accountability fund (652-00-2000-2402)...................................$375,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's cabinet
accountability fund account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
CIF grants (652-00-2000-2408).................................................$23,720,493
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CIF grants account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Parent education program (652-00-2000-2510)...........................$9,437,635
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the parent education
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

HB 2082 155
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
from the parent education program account for each such grant shall be
matched by the school district in an amount that is equal to not less than
50% of the grant.
Pre-K pilot (652-00-2000-2535)..................................................$4,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the pre-K pilot account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Early childhood infrastructure (652-00-2000-2555)....................$1,419,196
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the early childhood
infrastructure account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Imagination library (652-00-2000-2560).....................................$1,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the imagination library
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the children's cabinet shall operate
the nonprofit corporation organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986, according to the corporation's articles of
incorporation, to receive gifts, donations, grants and other moneys and
engage in fundraising projects for the benefit of the Dolly Parton's
imagination library book gifting program to develop, implement, promote
and sustain reading by the children of Kansas.
(d) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,148 or 38-1808, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $50,000 from the family and children trust account of
the family and children investment fund (652-00-7375-7900) of the
department of education to the SparkWheel program fund (652-00-2877-
2877) of the department of education.
(e) On March 30, 2026, and June 30, 2026, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-267 or
8-272, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer $550,000 from the state safety fund
(652-00-2538-2030) to the state general fund: Provided, That the transfer
of such amount shall be in addition to any other transfer from the state
safety fund to the state general fund as prescribed by law: Provided
further, That the amount transferred from the state safety fund to the state
general fund pursuant to this subsection is to reimburse the state general
fund for accounting, auditing, budgeting, legal, payroll, personnel and
purchasing services and any other governmental services that are
performed on behalf of the department of education by other state agencies
that receive appropriations from the state general fund to provide such
services.

HB 2082 156
(f) On July 1, 2025, and quarterly thereafter, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer $93,750 from the state highway fund (276-00-
4100-4100) of the department of transportation to the school bus safety
fund (652-00-2532-2300) of the department of education.
(g) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
an amount certified by the commissioner of education from the motorcycle
safety fund (652-00-2633-2050) of the department of education to the
motorcycle safety fund (561-00-2366-2360) of the state board of regents:
Provided, That the amount to be transferred shall be determined by the
commissioner of education based on the amounts required to be paid
pursuant to K.S.A. 8-272(b)(2), and amendments thereto.
(h) There is appropriated for the above agency from the Kansas
endowment for youth fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
Children's cabinet administration (652-00-7000-7001)..................$285,059
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's cabinet
administration account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the commissioner of
education, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer any
part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general
fund for the department of education to another item of appropriation for
fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the department of
education. The commissioner of education shall certify each such transfer
to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each
such certification to the director of legislative research.
(j) There is appropriated for the above agency from the expanded
lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
KPERS – school employer
contribution (652-00-1700-1700).........................................$41,427,779
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amount
appropriated from the expanded lottery act revenues fund in the KPERS –
school employer contribution account (652- 00-1700-1700) for the
department of education shall be for the purpose of reducing the unfunded
actuarial liability of the Kansas public employees retirement system
attributable to the state of Kansas and participating employers under
K.S.A. 74-4931, and amendments thereto, in accordance with K.S.A. 74-
8768, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 84.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the following:

HB 2082 157
State foundation aid (652-00-1000-0820).............................$2,921,724,116
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state foundation aid
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2027.
Supplemental state aid (652-00-1000-0840)............................$637,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the supplemental state aid
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2027.
Special education services aid (652-00-1000-0700)................$746,284,550
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the special education
services aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That expenditures
shall not be made from the special education services aid account for the
provision of instruction for any homebound or hospitalized child, unless
the categorization of such child as exceptional is conjoined with the
categorization of the child within one or more of the other categories of
exceptionality: And provided further, That expenditures shall be made from
this account for grants to school districts in amounts determined pursuant
to and in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 72-3425, and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That expenditures shall be
made from the amount remaining in this account, after deduction of the
expenditures specified in the foregoing provisos, for payments to school
districts in amounts determined pursuant to and in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 72-3422, and amendments thereto.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law and
transfers to other state agencies shall not exceed the following:
State school district finance fund (652-00-7393).............................No limit
Mineral production
education fund (652-00-7669-7669)............................................No limit
Sec. 85.
STATE LIBRARY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (434-00-1000-0300)...............................$1,564,477
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $755.
Grants to libraries and library systems – grants
in aid (434-00-1000-0410)......................................................$2,555,366

HB 2082 158
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – grants in aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-2555, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
grants to libraries and library systems – grants in aid account to distribute
$2,000 to each eligible local public library: And provided further, That any
remaining moneys in such account after making distributions in
accordance with this subsection shall be distributed in accordance with the
formula in K.S.A. 75-2555, and amendments thereto.
Grants to libraries and library systems – interlibrary
loan development (434-00-1000-0420)..................................$1,133,729
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – interlibrary loan development account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Grants to libraries and library systems – talking
book services (434-00-1000-0430)............................................$493,438
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – talking book services account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Blind information
access program (434-00-1000-0500)...........................................$95,399
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the blind information access
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
State library fund (434-00-2076-2500).............................................No limit
Federal library services and technology
act – fund (434-00-3257-3000)....................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (434-00-3753).............................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (434-00-3756).............................................No limit
Grants and gifts fund (434-00-7304-7000).......................................No limit
Sec. 86.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Extended school year program (604-00-1000-0400)........................$41,738

HB 2082 159
Sec. 87.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (604-00-1000-0303)...............................$7,620,575
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Extended school
year program (604-00-1000-0400).............................................$550,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Arts for the handicapped (604-00-1000-0502)................................$133,847
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Local services
reimbursement fund (604-00-2088).............................................No limit
Provided, That the Kansas state school for the blind is hereby authorized to
assess and collect a fee of 20% of the total cost of services provided to
local school districts: Provided further, That all moneys received from
such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the local services reimbursement fund.
General fees fund (604-00-2093)......................................................No limit
Student activity
fees fund (604-00-2146)..............................................................No limit
Chapter I handicapped FDF –
federal fund (604-00-3039).........................................................No limit
Special education state grants –
federal fund (604-00-3234).........................................................No limit
School breakfast program –
federal fund (604-00-3529).........................................................No limit
Federal school lunch –
federal fund (604-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Deaf-blind project –
federal fund (604-00-3583).........................................................No limit
Summer food service program –
federal fund (604-00-3591).........................................................No limit

HB 2082 160
COVID-19 federal relief fund (604-00-3649)..................................No limit
Education improvement –
federal fund (604-00-3898).........................................................No limit
Gift fund (604-00-7329-5100)..........................................................No limit
Special bequest fund (604-00-7333).................................................No limit
Sec. 88.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (610-00-1000-0303).............................$11,951,017
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Language assessment program........................................................$399,652
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the language assessment
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Local services
reimbursement fund (610-00-2091).............................................No limit
Provided, That the Kansas state school for the deaf is hereby authorized to
assess and collect a fee of 20% of the total cost of services provided to
local school districts: Provided further, That all moneys received from
such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the local services reimbursement fund.
General fees fund (610-00-2094)......................................................No limit
Student activity fees fund (610-00-2147).........................................No limit
Language assessment fee fund (610-00-2891).................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the language assessment
fee fund for operating expenditures to implement a fee-for-service model
to fund the implementation of a language assessment program for children
ages three through eight: Provided further, That the above agency is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees from unified school
districts, special education cooperatives and interlocals to fund the
operations of the language assessment program authorized pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-5397e, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That all
fees received for such programs shall be deposited in the state treasury in

HB 2082 161
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the language assessment fee fund: And
provided further, That all expenditures from the language assessment fee
fund shall be only for the operations of the language assessment program.
Special education state grants –
federal fund (610-00-3234).........................................................No limit
Universal newborn screening –
federal fund (610-00-3459).........................................................No limit
School breakfast program –
federal fund (610-00-3529).........................................................No limit
School lunch program –
federal fund (610-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Special education preschool grants –
federal fund (610-00-3535).........................................................No limit
Summer food service program –
federal fund (610-00-3591).........................................................No limit
COVID-19 federal relief fund –
federal fund (610-00-3649).........................................................No limit
Special bequest fund (610-00-7321).................................................No limit
Gift fund (610-00-7330)...................................................................No limit
Special workshop fund (610-00-7504).............................................No limit
Sec. 89.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Museum of history rehabilitation and repair (288-00-1000)...........$905,000
Operating expenditures (288-00-1000-0083)..................................$101,137
Sec. 90.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (288-00-1000-0083)...............................$5,297,207
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Humanities Kansas (288-00-1000-0600)..........................................$50,501
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
General fees fund (288-00-2047-2300)............................................No limit

HB 2082 162
Records center fee fund (288-00-2132-2100)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the records center fee fund
for operating expenses for state records and for the trusted digital
repository for electronic government records.
Museum and historic sites visitor
donation fund (288-00-2142-2250).............................................No limit
Historic properties fund (288-00-2144-2400)...................................No limit
Historic properties fee fund (288-00-2164-2310).............................No limit
Insurance collection replacement/
reimbursement fund (288-00-2182-2320)...................................No limit
State historical society
facilities fund (288-00-2192-2420).............................................No limit
Land survey fee fund (288-00-2234-2330).......................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 58-2011, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the land survey fee fund for the fiscal year 2026 for operating expenditures
that are not related to administering the land survey program.
Microfilm fees fund (288-00-2246-2370).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the microfilm fees fund
for operating expenses for providing imaging services: Provided further,
That the state historical society is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for the sale of such services: And provided further, That such
fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses
incurred in providing imaging services: And provided further, That all fees
received for such services shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the microfilm fees fund.
Property sale proceeds fund (288-00-2414-2500)............................No limit
Provided, That proceeds from the sale of property pursuant to K.S.A. 75-
2701, and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the property sale proceeds fund.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (288-00-2436-2700)..........................................No limit
Archeology fee fund (288-00-2638-2350)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the archeology fee fund
for operating expenses for providing archeological services by contract:
Provided further, That the state historical society is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees for the sale of such services: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the
operating expenses incurred in providing archeological services by
contract: And provided further, That all fees received for such services
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the

HB 2082 163
archeology fee fund.
Historic preservation overhead
fees fund (288-00-2916-2380).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the historic preservation overhead fees
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Archeology federal fund (288-00-3083-3110)..................................No limit
National historic preservation act
fund – local (288-00-3089-3000)................................................No limit
Highway planning/
construction fund (288-00-3333-3333).......................................No limit
National trails fund (288-00-3553-3353)..........................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (288-00-3756).............................................No limit
National archives and records fund (288-00)...................................No limit
Native American graves protection and
repatriation fund (288-00-3903-3903).........................................No limit
Save America's
treasures fund (288-00-3923-4000).............................................No limit
National endowment for the
humanities fund (288-00-3925-3925)..........................................No limit
Private gifts, grants and
bequests fund (288-00-7302-7000).............................................No limit
Law enforcement
memorial fund (288-00-7344-7300)............................................No limit
Heritage trust fund (288-00-7379-7600)...........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the heritage trust fund for state
operations shall not exceed $120,354.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-2721, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the state general fund or from any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to fix
admission fees at constitution hall in Lecompton, Kansas, at $3 per adult
single admission, $1 per student single admission, $2 per student for
guided tours and $3 per adult for guided tours: Provided, however, That
such admission fees may be increased by the above agency during fiscal
year 2026 if all moneys from such admission fees are invested in
constitution hall and the total amount of such admission fees exceeds the
amount of the Lecompton historical society's constitution hall promotional
expenses as determined by the average of such promotional expenses for

HB 2082 164
the preceding three calendar years: Provided further, That the state
historical society may request annual financial statements from the
Lecompton historical society for the purpose of calculating such three-year
average of promotional expenses.
Sec. 91.
FORT HAYS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (246-00-1000-0013)..............................$41,646,637
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional stabilization (246-00-1000-0400).................................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Master's-level
nursing capacity (246-00-1000-0100)........................................$147,668
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the master's-level nursing
capacity account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas wetlands education center at
Cheyenne bottoms (246-00-1000-0200)....................................$275,928
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas wetlands
education center at Cheyenne bottoms account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas academy of math
and science (246-00-1000-0300)...............................................$785,253
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas academy of math
and science account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (246-00-1000-0350).....................$3,537,490
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Western Kansas nursing workforce
development instruction (246-00-1000-0700)...........................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the western Kansas nursing
workforce development instruction account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Telehealth certification for mental
health providers (246-00-1000-0600)........................................$250,000

HB 2082 165
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the telehealth certification
for mental health providers account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the Fort Hays state university professional
workforce development account (246-00-1000-0340) in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (246-00-2035-2000)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Oil and gas royalties fund (246-00-2036-2010)...............................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (246-00-2471-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (246-00-2510-2040).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Special events; technology equipment; Gross coliseum services;
capital improvements; performing arts center services; farm income;
choral music clinic; yearbook; off-campus tours; memorial union
activities; student activity (unallocated); tiger media; conferences, clinics
and workshops – noncredit; summer laboratory school; little theater;
library services; student affairs; speech and debate; student government;
counseling center services; interest on local funds; student identification
cards; nurse education programs; athletics; placement fees; Fort Hays state
university classes; speech and hearing; child care services for dependent
students; computer services; interactive television contributions;
midwestern student exchange; departmental receipts for all sales, refunds
and other collections not specifically enumerated above: Provided,
however, That the state board of regents, with the approval of the state
finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a
matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in
K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this
list of restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate
account of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific
purpose or purposes for which collected: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund to purchase insurance for
equipment purchased through research and training grants only if such
grants include money for and authorize the purchase of such insurance:

HB 2082 166
And provided further, That all amounts of tuition received from students
participating in the midwestern student exchange program shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the midwestern
student exchange account of the restricted fees fund: And provided further,
That expenditures may be made from the restricted fees fund for official
hospitality.
Commencement fees fund (246-00-2511-2050)...............................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (246-00-2548-2060)..............................................No limit
Institutional overhead fund (246-00-2900-2070).............................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (246-00-2914-2080).............................................No limit
Economic opportunity act –
federal fund (246-00-3034-3000)................................................No limit
University federal fund (246-00-3141-3140)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made by the above agency from this fund to procure
a policy of accident, personal liability and excess automobile liability
insurance insuring volunteers participating in the senior companion
program against loss in accordance with specifications of federal grant
guidelines as provided in K.S.A. 75-4101, and amendments thereto.
Education opportunity act –
federal fund (246-00-3394-3500)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (246-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (246-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (246-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Health fees fund (246-00-5101-5000)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health fees fund may be made for the
purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for individuals
employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and physical
therapists, at the student health center.
Student union fees fund (246-00-5102-5010)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the student union fees
fund for official hospitality.
Housing system
revenue fund (246-00-5103-5020)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the housing system

HB 2082 167
revenue fund for official hospitality.
Parking fees fund (246-00-5185-5050).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund for a
capital improvement project for parking lot improvements.
Housing system
suspense fund (246-00-5707-5090).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (246-00-6000)................................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Computer services, storeroom for official supplies
including office supplies, paper products, janitorial supplies, printing and
duplicating, car pool, postage, copy center, and telecommunications and
such other internal service activities as are authorized by the state board of
regents under K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Kansas distinguished
scholarship fund (246-00-7204-7000).........................................No limit
Federal Perkins student
loan fund (246-00-7501-7050)....................................................No limit
Nine month payroll clearing
account fund (246-00-7709-7060)...............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (246-00-9013-9400)..................................No limit
Suspense fund (246-00-9134-9420)..................................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (246-00-9136-9430)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (246-00-9163-9440)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (246-00-9197-9450)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (246-00-9220-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (246-00-9800).............................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount specified by the
president of Fort Hays state university of not to exceed $125,000 from the
general fees fund (246-00-2035-2000) to the federal Perkins student loan
fund (246-00-7501-7050).
Sec. 92.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Kansas state university (367-00).................................................No limit

HB 2082 168
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (367-00-3260).........................................................No limit
(b) On the effective date of this act, the $3,100,000 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
100(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the pure imagination facility (Kansas advanced immersive
research for emerging systems center) account (367-00-1000-0240) is
hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $2,200,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
100(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the biosecurity research account (367-00-1000-0220), the
sum of $3,900 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 93.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (367-00-1000-0003)............................$117,412,263
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas state university Salina (including
official hospitality) (367-00-1000-0150)................................$9,465,238
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas state university
Salina (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Midwest institute for comparative stem
cell biology (367-00-1000-0170)...............................................$127,178
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest institute for
comparative stem cell biology account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Global food systems (367-00-1000-0190)...................................$5,144,062
Provided, That unencumbered balance in the global food systems account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That all moneys in the global food systems
account expended for fiscal year 2026 shall be matched by Kansas state
university on a $1-for-$1 basis from other moneys of Kansas state
university: And provided further, That Kansas state university shall submit
a plan to the house committee on appropriations, the senate committee on
ways and means and the governor as to how the global food systems-
related activities create additional jobs in the state and other economic
value, particularly for and with the private sector, for fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 169
Biomanufacturing institute (367-00-1000-0200).........................$5,011,678
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the biomanufacturing
institute account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026; Provided further, That all expenditures
for the biomanufacturing institute shall require a match of local nonstate or
private moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis.
Water wide institute (367-00-1000-0230)....................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water wide institute
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026. Provided further, That expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such account to submit a plan and report on the goals,
accomplishments and return on investment regarding the state's vital
interests in water quality and quantity to the house of representatives
committee on appropriations, the senate committee on ways and means
and the governor on or before January 12, 2026.
Kansas state university
college of aviation jet (367-00-1000-0360)............................$1,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas state university
college of aviation jet account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from this account for fiscal year 2026 for the
shared lease or ownership, insurance, maintenance and operations of a jet-
type aircraft for student training purposes.
Student aid for financial need (367-00-1000-0350).....................$3,949,980
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the central immersive training hub account
(367-00-1000-0370) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, That all expenditures shall
be made by the above agency from the central immersive training hub
account for the central immersive training hub at the Kansas state
university Salina campus.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Animal health
research fund (367-00-2053-2053)..............................................No limit
National bio agro-defense
facility fund (367-00-2058-2058)................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the national bio agro-defense facility
fund shall be approved by the president of Kansas state university.

HB 2082 170
General fees fund (367-00-2062-2000)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KSU (367-00-2154-2154)................................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (367-00-2472-2500)............................................No limit
State emergency fund –
building repair (367-00-2451-2451)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (367-00-2520-2080).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Technology equipment; flight services; communications and
marketing; computer services; copy centers; standardized test fees;
placement center; recreational services; Kansas state university Salina;
motor pool; music; professorships; student activities fees; college and
department sales and services; field camps; college and department
storeroom fees; sponsored research, sponsored instruction, sponsored
public service, equipment and facility grants; contract-post office; library
collections; sponsored construction or improvement projects; attorney,
educational and personal development, human capital services; student
financial assistance; application for undergraduate and graduate programs;
speech and hearing; gifts; human development and family research and
training; college of education – publications and services; guaranteed
student loan application processing; auditorium receipts; catalog sales;
interagency consulting; sales and services of educational programs;
transcript fees; facility use fees; art exhibit fees; college of education –
Kansas careers; foreign student application fee; student union repair and
replacement reserve; departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and other
collections; institutional support fee; miscellaneous renovations –
construction; speech receipts; art museum; exchange program; flight
training lab fees; administrative reimbursements; parking fees; printing;
short courses and conferences; student government association receipts;
late registration fee; college equipment fees; biotechnology facility;
English language program; international programs; Bramlage coliseum;
planning and analysis; telecommunications; comparative medicine;
Marlatt memorial park; departmental student organization receipts; other
specifically designated receipts not available for general operations of the
university: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the
approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided further, That all

HB 2082 171
restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be
used solely for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And
provided further, That expenditures from the restricted fees fund may be
made for the purchase of insurance for operation and testing of completed
project aircraft and for operation of aircraft used in professional pilot
training, including coverage for public liability, physical damage, medical
payments and voluntary settlement coverages: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Kansas career work study
program fund (367-00-2540-2090)..............................................No limit
Interest bearing grants fund (367-00-2630-2630).............................No limit
Provided, That, on or before the 10th day of each month commencing
during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state general fund to the interest bearing grants fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance in the interest bearing
grants fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net earnings rate for the
pooled money investment portfolio for the preceding month.
Sponsored research
overhead fund (367-00-2901-2160).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the sponsored research
overhead fund for official hospitality.
University federal fund (367-00-3142).............................................No limit
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (367-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (367-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (367-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (367-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Kansas state university (367-00).................................................No limit
Federal award advance payment –
U.S. department of education
awards fund (367-00-3855-3350)................................................No limit
Student health fees fund (367-00-5109-4410)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the student health fees fund may be
made for the purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for
individuals employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and
physical therapists, at the student health center.
Salina student life center
revenue fund (367-00-5111-5120)...............................................No limit

HB 2082 172
Salina – student union
fees fund (367-00-5114-4420).....................................................No limit
Salina – housing system
revenue fund (367-00-5117-4430)...............................................No limit
Child care facility
revenue fund (367-00-5125-5101)...............................................No limit
Housing system operations fund (367-00-5163)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the housing system
operations fund for official hospitality.
Parking fees fund (367-00-5181)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund for
capital improvement projects for parking improvements.
Student union renovation expansion
revenue fund (367-00-5191-4650)...............................................No limit
Housing system repair, equipment and
improvement fund (367-00-5641-4740)......................................No limit
Coliseum system repair, equipment and
improvement fund (367-00-5642-4750)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (367-00-5708-4830).............................................No limit
Salina – housing system
suspense fund (367-00-5724-4890).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (367-00-6003-7000).......................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Supplies stores; telecommunications services;
photographic services; K-State printing services; postage; facilities
services; facilities carpool; public safety services; facility planning
services; facilities storeroom; computing services; and such other internal
service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under
K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Interest on endowment fund (367-00-7100-7200)............................No limit
Scholarship funds fund (367-00-7201-7210)....................................No limit
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (367-00-7223-7300)...................................................No limit
Perkins student loan fund (367-00-7506-7260)................................No limit
State agricultural
university fund (367-00-7400-7250)...........................................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (367-00-7710-7270)..............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (367-00-9020-9300)..................................No limit
Temp dep fund
external source (367-00-9065-9305)...........................................No limit
Business procurement card

HB 2082 173
clearing fund (367-00-9102-9400)..............................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (367-00-9137-9310)..............................................No limit
Suspense fund (367-00-9146-9320)..................................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (367-00-9164-9330)..............................................No limit
Fed ext emp clearing fund –
employee deduct (367-00-9182-9340)........................................No limit
Fed ext emp clearing fund –
employer deduct (367-00-9183-9350).........................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (367-00-9186-9360)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (367-00-9221-9200)..............................................No limit
Payroll clearing fund (367-00-9801-9000).......................................No limit
Sec. 94.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SYSTEMS
AND AGRICULTURE RESEARCH PROGRAMS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Cooperative extension service (including
official hospitality) (369-00-1000-1020)..............................$26,863,222
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cooperative extension
service (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further,
That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, expenditures shall be
made by the above agency from such moneys available in such account in
an amount of not less than $5,000,000 for the KSU 105 project.
Agricultural experiment stations (including
official hospitality) (369-00-1000-1030)..............................$35,013,049
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the agricultural experiment
stations (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Wildfire suppression/state forest service (369-00-1000-1040).......$699,973
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the wildfire suppression/state
forest service account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Restricted fees fund (369-00-2697-1100).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following

HB 2082 174
accounts: Plant pathology; Kansas artificial breeding service unit;
technology equipment; professorships; agricultural experiment station,
director's office; agronomy – Ashland farm; KSU agricultural research
center – Hays; KSU southeast agricultural research center; KSU southwest
research extension center; agronomy – general; agronomy – experimental
field crop sales; entomology sales; grain science and industry – Kansas
state university; food and nutrition research; extension services and
publication; sponsored construction or improvement projects; gifts;
comparative medicine; sales and services of educational programs; animal
sciences and industry livestock and product sales; horticulture greenhouse
and farm products sales; Konza prairie operations; departmental receipts
for all sales, refunds and other collections; institutional support fee; KSU
northwest research extension center operations; sponsored research, public
service, equipment and facility grants; statistical laboratory;
equipment/pesticide storage building; miscellaneous renovation –
construction; other specifically designated receipts not available for
general operations of the university: Provided, however, That the state
board of regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting on
this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c),
and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees:
Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the
restricted fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or
purposes for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the Kansas agricultural mediation service account of the
restricted fees fund during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Fertilizer research fund (369-00-2263-1150)....................................No limit
Agricultural land
use-value fund (369-00-2364-1180)............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (369-00-2479-1190).............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (369-00-2921-1200).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the sponsored research
overhead fund for official hospitality.
University federal fund (369-00-3144).............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (369-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (369-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Federal awards – advance

HB 2082 175
payment fund (369-00-3872-1360).............................................No limit
Any unencumbered balance in the agricultural experiment stations account
(369-00-1900-1900) of the state economic development initiatives fund in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Sec. 95.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
VETERINARY MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (368-00-1000-5003)..............................$12,114,469
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Veterinary training program for
rural Kansas (368-00-1000-5013)..............................................$650,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterinary training
program for rural Kansas account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating enhancement (368-00-1000-5023)..............................$5,544,539
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating enhancement
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures from the operating
enhancement account shall be expended in accordance with the plan
submitted by the board of regents for improving the rankings of the
Kansas state university veterinary medical center and shall be approved by
the president of Kansas state university.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (368-00-2129-5500)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (368-00-2478-5220)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (368-00-2590-5530).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Sponsored research, instruction, public service, equipment and
facility grants; sponsored construction or improvement projects;
technology equipment; pathology fees; laboratory test fees; miscellaneous

HB 2082 176
renovations or construction; dean of veterinary medicine receipts; gifts;
application for postbaccalaureate programs; professorship; embryo transfer
unit; swine serology; rapid focal fluorescent inhibition test; comparative
medicine; storerooms; departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and
other collections; departmental student organization receipts; other
specifically designated receipts not available for general operation of the
Kansas state university veterinary medical center: Provided, however, That
the state board of regents, with the approval of the state finance council
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of
restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited
in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account
of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose
or purposes for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
University federal fund (368-00-3143-5140)...................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (368-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (368-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (368-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Vet health center revenue fund (including
official hospitality) (368-00-5160-5300).....................................No limit
Health professions student
loan fund (368-00-7521-5710)....................................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount specified by the
president of Kansas state university of not to exceed a total of $15,000
from the general fees fund (368-00-2129-5500) to the health professions
student loan fund (368-00-7521-5710).
Sec. 96.
EMPORIA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (379-00-1000-0083)..............................$39,121,546
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional stabilization (379-00-1000-270)...................................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization

HB 2082 177
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Nat'l board cert/future
teacher academy (379-00-1000-0200).......................................$327,844
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nat'l board cert/future
teacher academy account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the nat'l board cert/future teacher academy account for
official hospitality.
Student aid for financial need (379-00-1000-0350).....................$1,227,910
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
SMaRT Kansas 21 (379-00-1000-0500).........................................$513,051
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the SMaRT Kansas 21
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Cybersecurity academic programming center (379-00-1000-0600)
.................................................................................................$1,107,612
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cybersecurity academic
programming center account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the Emporia state model investment
account (379-00-1000-0400) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (379-00-2069-2010)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (379-00-2473-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (379-00-2526-2040).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Computer services, student activity; technology equipment;
student union; sponsored research; computer services; extension classes;
gifts and grants (for teaching, research and capital improvements); capital
improvements; business school contributions; state department of
education (vocational); library services; library collections; interest on
local funds; receipts from conferences, clinics, and workshops held on

HB 2082 178
campus for which no college credit is given; physical plant
reimbursements from auxiliary enterprises; midwestern student exchange;
departmental receipts – for all sales, refunds and other collections or
receipts not specifically enumerated above: Provided, however, That the
state board of regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting
on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c),
and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees:
Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the
restricted fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or
purposes for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may
be made from this fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance: And provided further, That
all amounts of tuition received from students participating in the
midwestern student exchange program shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the midwestern student
exchange account of the restricted fees fund: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the restricted fees fund for official
hospitality.
Commencement fees fund (379-00-2527-2050)...............................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (379-00-2549-2060)..............................................No limit
Kansas distinguished
scholarship fund (379-00-2762-2700).........................................No limit
Research and institutional
overhead fund (379-00-2902-2070).............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (385-00-2903-2903).............................................No limit
Economic opportunity act – work study –
federal fund (379-00-3128-3000)................................................No limit
Educational opportunity grants –
federal fund (379-00-3129-3010)................................................No limit
Basic opportunity grant program –
federal fund (379-00-3130-3020)................................................No limit
University federal fund (379-00-3145).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance.

HB 2082 179
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (379-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (379-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (379-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Student health fees fund (379-00-5115-5010)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the student health fees fund may be
made for the purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for
individuals employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and
physical therapists, at the student health center.
Bureau of educational
measurements fund (379-00-5118-5020).....................................No limit
Twin towers project
revenue fund (379-00-5120-5030)...............................................No limit
Student union refurbishing fund (379-00-5161-5040)......................No limit
Housing system
operations fund (379-00-5169-5050)...........................................No limit
Parking fees fund (379-00-5186)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund for a
capital improvement project for parking lot improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and
improvement fund (379-00-5650-5120)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (379-00-5701-5130).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (379-00-6004)................................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Telecommunications services; state car operation; ESU
press including duplicating and reproducing; postage; physical plant
storeroom including motor fuel inventory; and such other internal service
activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under K.S.A. 76-
755, and amendments thereto.
Interest on state normal
school fund (379-00-7101-7000).................................................No limit
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (379-00-7224-7060)...................................................No limit
National direct student
loan fund (379-00-7507-7040)....................................................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (379-00-7712-7050)..............................................No limit
Suspense fund (379-00-9021)...........................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (379-00-9022-9510)..................................No limit
Federal receipts
suspense fund (379-00-9085-9520).............................................No limit

HB 2082 180
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (379-00-9138-9530)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (379-00-9165-9540)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (379-00-9196-9550)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (379-00-9222-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (379-00-9802).............................................No limit
Sec. 97.
PITTSBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Pittsburg state university (385-00)...............................................No limit
Sec. 98.
PITTSBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (385-00-1000-0063)..............................$42,134,641
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional stabilization (385-00-1000-0270).................................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
School of construction (385-00-1000-0200)...................................$802,086
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the school of construction
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Global center for STEM (385-00-1000-0260).............................$2,001,084
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the global center for STEM
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Center for emerging technologies (385-00-1000-0280)...............$2,002,510
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the center for emerging
technologies account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Polymer science program (385-00-1000-0300)...........................$1,064,189

HB 2082 181
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the polymer science program
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (385-00-1000-0350).....................$1,818,970
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the institute for emerging technologies
center for graphene account (385-00-1000-0310) in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (385-00-2070-2010)............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for tuition received from students
participating in the gorilla advantage program or the midwestern student
exchange program shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the general fees fund: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from the general fees fund to match federal grant moneys: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (385-00-2474-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (385-00-2529-2040).........................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Computer services; capital improvements; student access and
success fee; instructional technology fee; technology equipment; student
activity fee accounts; commencement fees; ROTC activities; continuing
education receipts; vocational auto parts and service fees; receipts from
camps, workshops, conferences and meetings held on campus; library
service collections and fines; grants from other state agencies; Midwest
Quarterly; chamber music series; contract – post office; gifts and grants;
intensive English program; business and technology institute; public sector
radio station activities; economic opportunity – state match; Kansas career
work study; regents supplemental grants; departmental receipts, and other
specifically designated receipts not available for general operations of the
university: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the
approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided further, That all
restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with

HB 2082 182
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be
used solely for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from this fund to
purchase insurance for equipment purchased through research and training
grants only if such grants include money for and authorize the purchase of
such insurance: And provided further, That surplus restricted fees moneys
generated by the music department may be transferred to the Pittsburg
state university foundation, inc., for the express purpose of awarding
music scholarships: And provided further, That expenditures may be made
from this fund for official hospitality.
Kansas career work study
program fund (385-00-2552-2060)..............................................No limit
Overman student center
renovation fund (385-00-2820-2820)..........................................No limit
Student health center
revenue fund (385-00-2828-2851)...............................................No limit
Horace Mann building
renovation fund (385-00-2833)...................................................No limit
University federal fund (385-00-3146).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance.
College work study
federal fund (385-00-3498-3030)................................................No limit
Nurse faculty loan program federal fund (385-00-3596-3596)........No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (385-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (385-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (385-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Revenue 2014A fund (385-00-5106-5105).......................................No limit
Hospital and student health
fees fund (385-00-5126-5010).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from this fund for capital
improvement projects for hospital and student health center improvements.
Housing system
operations fund (385-00-5165-5050)...........................................No limit
Parking fees fund (385-00-5187-5060).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund for
capital improvement projects for parking lot improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and

HB 2082 183
improvement fund (385-00-5646-5160)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (385-00-5703-5170).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (385-00-6005)................................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Duplicating and printing services; instructional media
division; office stationery and supplies; motor carpool; postage services;
photo services; telephone services; information technology infrastructure
services; and such other internal service activities as are authorized by the
state board of regents under K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (385-00-7227-7200)...................................................No limit
Nursing student loan fund (385-00-7508-7010)...............................No limit
Perkins student loan fund (385-00-7509-7020)................................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (385-00-7713-7030)..............................................No limit
Payroll clearing fund (385-00-9023-9500).......................................No limit
Suspense fund (385-00-9024-9510)..................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (385-00-9025-9520)..................................No limit
Federal receipts
suspense fund (385-00-9104-9530).............................................No limit
BPC clearing fund (385-00-9109-9570)...........................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Pittsburg state university (385-00)...............................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (385-00-9139-9540)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (385-00-9166-9550)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (385-00-9195-9560)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (385-00-9223-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (385-00-9803).............................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the president of
Pittsburg state university of not to exceed a total of $145,000 for all such
amounts, from the general fees fund (385-00-2070-2010) to the following
specified funds and accounts of funds: Perkins student loan fund (385-00-
7509-7020); nursing student loan fund (385-00-7508-7010); and nurse
faculty loan program federal fund (385-00-3596-3596).
Sec. 99.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following

HB 2082 184
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Engineer graduate
incentive fund – university of Kansas (682-00)..........................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (682-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Sec. 100.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (682-00-1000-0023)............................$162,312,449
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Geological survey (682-00-1000-0170).....................................$10,167,566
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the geological survey
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That in addition to the other purposes
for which expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
geological survey account of the state general fund for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such fund for fiscal
year 2026 for seismic surveys in an amount of not less than $100,000.
Umbilical cord
matrix project (682-00-1000-0370)...........................................$153,734
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the umbilical cord matrix
project account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (682-00-1000-0350).....................$4,099,160
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas law enforcement training center
operating expenditures (682-00-1000-0380)........................$12,073,048
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas law enforcement
training center operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (682-00-2107-2000)............................................No limit

HB 2082 185
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys.
Fire service training fund (682-00-2123-2170)................................No limit
Law enforcement training center fund (682-00-2133-2020)............No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the law enforcement
training center fund to cover the costs of tuition for students enrolled in the
law enforcement training program in addition to the costs of salaries and
wages and other operating expenditures for the program: Provided further,
That expenditures may be made from the law enforcement training center
fund for the acquisition of tracts of land.
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
university of Kansas (682-00).....................................................No limit
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KU (682-00-2153-2153)..................................................No limit
Child care facility revenue
bond fund (682-00-2372).............................................................No limit
Johnson county education research
triangle fund (682-00-2393-2390)...............................................No limit
Standard water data
repository fund (682-00-2463-2463)...........................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (682-00-2475-2500)............................................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (682-00-2534-2050)..............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (682-00-2545)..................................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Institute for policy and social research; technology equipment;
capital improvements; concert course; speech, language and hearing clinic;
perceptual motor clinic; application for admission fees; named
professorships; summer institutes and workshops; dramatics; economic
opportunity act; executive management; continuing education programs;
geology field trips; gifts and grants; extension services; counseling center;
investment income from bequests; reimbursable salaries; music and art
camp; child development lab preschools; orientation center; educational
placement; press publications; Rice estate educational project; sponsored
research; student activities; sale of surplus books and art objects; building
use charges; Kansas applied remote sensing program; executive master's
degree in business administration; applied English center; cartographic
services; economic education; study abroad programs; computer services;
recreational activities; animal care activities; geological survey;
midwestern student exchange; department commercial receipts for all
sales, refunds, and all other collections or receipts not specifically
enumerated above: Provided, however, That the state board of regents,

HB 2082 186
with the approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which
is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided further, That all
restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be
used solely for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And
provided further, That moneys received for student fees in any account of
the restricted fees fund may be transferred to one or more other accounts
of the restricted fees fund.
Law enforcement training center
fees fund (682-00-2763-2700).....................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for tuition from students enrolling in
the basic law enforcement training program for undergraduate or graduate
credit shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the law
enforcement training center fees fund.
Student recreation fitness center
KDFA fund (682-00-2864-2860).................................................No limit
University of Kansas and
Wichita state university health
collaboration fund (682-00-2878-2878)......................................No limit
Multicultural rescr center
construction fund (682-00-2890-2890).......................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (682-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (682-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (682-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (682-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
University of Kansas ARPA health
collaboration fund (682-00-3756)...............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (682-00-2905-2160).............................................No limit
University federal fund (682-00-3147).............................................No limit
Educational opportunity act –
federal fund (682-00-3842-3020)................................................No limit
Health service fund (682-00-5136-5030).........................................No limit
Student union fund (682-00-5137-5040)..........................................No limit
Housing system
operations fund (682-00-5142-5050)...........................................No limit
Student union renovation

HB 2082 187
revenue fund (682-00-5171-5060)...............................................No limit
Parking facility KDFA 1993G
revenue fund (682-00-5175-5070)...............................................No limit
Parking facilities
revenue fund (682-00-5175-5070)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking facilities
revenue fund for capital improvement projects for parking improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and
improvement fund (682-00-5621-5110)......................................No limit
Student health facility
maintenance, repair and equipment
fee fund (682-00-5640-5120)......................................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (682-00-5704-5150).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (682-00-6006)................................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Residence hall food stores; university motor pool;
military uniforms; telecommunications service; and such other internal
service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under
K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Interest fund (682-00-7103-7000)....................................................No limit
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (682-00-7226-7110)...................................................No limit
Loans for disadvantaged
students fund (682-00-7510-7100)..............................................No limit
Federal Perkins loan fund (682-00-7512-7040)................................No limit
Health professions student
loan fund (682-00-7513-7050)....................................................No limit
Prepaid tuition fees
clearing fund (682-00-7765)........................................................No limit
Suspense fund (682-00-9060-9010)..................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (682-00-9061-9020)..................................No limit
GTA/GRA emp health insurance
clearing fund (682-00-9063-9070)..............................................No limit
BPC clearing fund (682-00-9119-9050)...........................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (682-00-9142-9030)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (682-00-9167-9040)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (682-00-9193-9060)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking clearing fund (682-00-9224-9200)..........................No limit
University payroll fund (682-00-9806).............................................No limit

HB 2082 188
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the
chancellor of the university of Kansas of not to exceed a total of $325,000
for all such amounts, from the general fees fund (682-00-2107-2000) to
the following specified funds and accounts of funds: Federal Perkins loan
fund (682-00-7512-7040); educational opportunity act – federal fund (682-
00-3842-3020); university federal fund (682-00-3147-3140); health
professions student loan fund (682-00-7513-7050); loans for
disadvantaged students fund (682-00-7510-7100).
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the water plan
project or projects specified, the following:
Water quantity/aquifer (682-00-1800)..........................................$1,540,000
Water quality (682-00-1800)........................................................$1,000,000
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, in the
geological survey account (682-00-1800-1810) is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chancellor of the
university of Kansas, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the university of Kansas to another item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
university of Kansas: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water
office shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chancellor of the
university of Kansas, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the university of Kansas to any item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas water office, Kansas department of agriculture, Kansas department
of wildlife and parks or the department of health and environment –
division of environment: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water
office shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
Sec. 101.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (683-00-1000-0503)............................$120,300,302

HB 2082 189
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from this account may be used to reimburse medical
residents in residency programs located in Kansas City at the university of
Kansas medical center for the purchase of health insurance for residents'
dependents.
Medical scholarships
and loans (683-00-1000-0600)................................................$4,488,171
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the medical scholarships and
loans account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Medical scholarships and
loans psychiatry (683-00-1000-0610)........................................$970,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the medical scholarships and
loans psychiatry account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
OBGYN medical student loan (683-00-1000-0620).......................$943,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the OBGYN medical student
loan account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
OBGYN medical residency bridging loan (683-00-1000-0630).......$30,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the OBGYN medical
residency bridge loan account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Midwest stem cell
therapy center (683-00-1000-0800)...........................................$787,830
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest stem cell
therapy center account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Rural health bridging (683-00-1000-1010).....................................$140,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rural health bridging
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Rural health bridging psychiatry (683-00-1000-1015).....................$30,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rural health bridging
psychiatry account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (683-00-1000-0350).....................$1,120,150
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following account or accounts in excess

HB 2082 190
of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Health science center KUMed and WSU (683-00-1000-0810) and
KUMC Wichita residency program (683-00-1000-0650): Provided, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the KUMC Wichita
residency program account to the department of family and community
medicine of the university of Kansas school of medicine Wichita for use in
the Smoky Hill family medicine residency program, Wesley family
medicine residency program and Ascension Via Christi family medicine
residency program.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (683-00-2108-2500)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys.
Johnson county education research
triangle fund (683-00-2394-2390)...............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (683-00-2476-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (683-00-2551)..................................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to the following accounts:
Technology equipment; capital improvements; computer services;
expenses reimbursed by the Kansas university endowment association;
postgraduate fees; pathology fees; student health insurance premiums; gift
receipts; designated research collaboration; facilities use; photography;
continuing education; student activity fees; student application fees;
department duplicating; student health services; student identification
badges; student transcript fees; loan administration fees; fitness center
fees; occupational health fees; employee health; telekid care fees; area
outreach fees; police fees; endowment payroll reimbursement; rental
property; e-learning fees; surplus property sales; outreach air travel;
student loan legal fees; hospital authority salary reimbursements; graduate
medical education contracts; Kansas university physicians inc., salaries
reimbursements; housestaff activity fees; anatomy cadavers; biotechnology
services; energy center funded depreciation; biostatistics; electron
microscope services; Wichita faculty contracts; physical therapy services;
legal fee reimbursements; sponsored research; departmental commercial
receipts for all sales, refunds and all other collections of receipts not
specifically enumerated above; Kansas department for children and
families cost-sharing: Provided, however, That the state board of regents,
with the approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which
is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to

HB 2082 191
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided further, That all
restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be
used solely for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from this fund to
purchase health insurance coverage for all students enrolled in the school
of allied health, school of nursing and school of medicine.
Medical student loan programs provider
assessment fund (683-00-2625-2650).........................................No limit
Kansas breast cancer
research fund (683-00-2671-2660)..............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (683-00-2907-2800).............................................No limit
Services to hospital
authority fund (683-00-2915-2900).............................................No limit
Direct medical education
reimbursement fund (683-00-2918-3000)...................................No limit
Graduate medical education
reimbursement fund (683-00-2918-3050)...................................No limit
Cancer research and public information
trust fund (683-00-2925-2925)....................................................No limit
Federal scholarship for disadvantaged
students fund (683-00-3094-3100)..............................................No limit
University federal fund (683-00-3148).............................................No limit
Leveraging educational assistance partnership
federal fund (683-00-3223-3200)................................................No limit
Federal Pell grant fund (683-00-3252-3500)....................................No limit
Federal student educational opportunity
grant fund (683-00-3255-3510)...................................................No limit
Federal college work
study fund (683-00-3256-3520)...................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (683-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (683-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (683-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Parking facility revenue fund –
KC campus (683-00-5176-5550).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking facility
revenue fund – KC campus for capital improvement projects for parking
improvements.

HB 2082 192
Parking fee fund –
Wichita campus (683-00-5180-5590)..........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fee fund –
Wichita campus for capital improvement projects for parking
improvements.
Parking surplus fund (683-00-5002-5006).......................................No limit
Graduate medical education administration
reserve fund (683-00-5652-5640)................................................No limit
University of Kansas medical center
private practice foundation
reserve fund (683-00-5659-5660)................................................No limit
Medical loan repayment fund (683-00-7214-7520)..........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the medical loan repayment fund for
attorney fees and litigation costs associated with the administration of the
medical scholarship and loan program shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the operating expenditures account of
the medical loan repayment fund.
Psychiatry medical loan
repayment fund (683-00-7233-7233)..........................................No limit
Educational nurse faculty loan
program fund (683-00-7505-7540)..............................................No limit
Federal Perkins student
loan fund (683-00-7515-7550)....................................................No limit
Federal health professions/
primary care student
loan fund (683-00-7516-7560)....................................................No limit
Federal nursing student
loan fund (683-00-7517-7570)....................................................No limit
Suspense fund (683-00-9057-9500)..................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (683-00-9058-9510)..................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (683-00-9143-9520)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (683-00-9168-9530)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (683-00-9194-9600)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking clearing fund (683-00-9225-9200)..........................No limit
University payroll fund (683-00-9807).............................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the
chancellor of the university of Kansas of not to exceed a total of $125,000
for all such amounts, from the general fees fund (683-00-2108-2500) to
the following funds: Federal nursing student loan fund (683-00-7517-

HB 2082 193
7570); federal student education opportunity grant fund (683-00-3255-
3510); federal college work study fund (683-00-3256-3520); educational
nurse faculty loan program fund (683-00-7505-7540); federal health
professions/primary care student loan fund (683-00-7516-7560).
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and within the limits
of appropriations therefor, the university of Kansas medical center may
enter into contracts to purchase additional malpractice insurance for
medical students enrolled at the university of Kansas medical center while
in clinical training at the university of Kansas medical center or at other
health care institutions.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds of the above agency for fiscal year 2026 as
authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from such moneys to review funding for the university of Kansas cancer
center building, including, but not limited to, the need for additional state
moneys to leverage private funding required for construction of such
cancer center to advance and to submit a report on such agency's findings
from such review to the legislature during the 2026 regular session of the
legislature.
Sec. 102.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (715-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Wichita state university (715-00)................................................No limit
Sec. 103.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (715-00-1000-0003)..............................$79,951,342
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Technology transfer facility (715-00-1000-0005)........................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the technology transfer

HB 2082 194
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Aviation infrastructure (715-00-1000-0010)................................$5,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aviation infrastructure
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, in addition
to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made from the
aviation infrastructure account for fiscal year 2026 by Wichita state
university by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature, the moneys appropriated in the aviation infrastructure
account for fiscal year 2026 may only be expended for training and
equipment expenditures of the national center for aviation training.
Aviation research (715-00-1000-0015)......................................$10,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aviation research account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That all moneys in the aviation research
account expended for fiscal year 2026 shall be matched by Wichita state
university on a $1-for-$1 basis from other moneys of Wichita state
university: And provided further, That Wichita state university shall submit
a plan to the house committee on appropriations, the senate committee on
ways and means and the governor as to how aviation research-related
activities create additional jobs in the state and other economic value,
particularly for and with the private sector, for fiscal year 2026.
Business partnership (715-00-1000-0030)...................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the business partnership
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (715-00-1000-0350).....................$4,246,340
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for financial
need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the Health science center WSU account
(715-00-1000-0800) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Aviation research fund (715-00-2052-2052)....................................No limit
General fees fund (715-00-2112)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may be

HB 2082 195
made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Kan-grow engineering
fund – WSU (715-00-2155-2155)...............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (715-00-2477-2400)............................................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (715-00-2536-2020)..............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (715-00-2558)..................................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the following
accounts: Summer school workshops; technology equipment; concert
course; dramatics; continuing education; flight training; gifts and grants
(for teaching, research, and capital improvements); capital improvements;
testing service; state department of education (vocational); investment
income from bequests; sale of surplus books and art objects; public
service; veterans counseling and educational benefits; sponsored research;
campus privilege fee; student activities; national defense education
programs; engineering equipment fee; midwestern student exchange;
departmental receipts – for all sales, refunds and other collections or
receipts not specifically enumerated above: Provided, however, That the
state board of regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting
on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c),
and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees:
Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the
restricted fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or
purposes for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may
be made from this fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance: And provided further, That
expenditures from this fund may be made for the purchase of medical
malpractice liability coverage for individuals employed on the medical
staff at the student health center: And provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Center of innovation for biomaterials in
orthopaedic research – Wichita state
university fund (715-00-2750-2700)...........................................No limit
Wichita state university and
university of Kansas health
collaboration fund (715-00-2878-2878)......................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (715-00-2908-2080).............................................No limit

HB 2082 196
University federal fund (715-00-3149-3140)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money for
and authorize the purchase of such insurance.
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (715-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Wichita state university (715-00)................................................No limit
Economic opportunity act –
federal fund (715-00-3265-3100)................................................No limit
Educational opportunity grant –
federal fund (715-00-3266-3110)................................................No limit
Pell grants federal fund (715-00-3366-3120)...................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (715-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (715-00-3753)................................No limit
Wichita state university ARPA health
collaboration fund (715-00-3756)...............................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (715-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
WSU housing systems
revenue fund (715-00-5100-5250)...............................................No limit
Parking system project KDFA bond
revenue fund (715-00-5148-5000)...............................................No limit
Parking system project
maintenance KDFA revenue
bond fund (715-00-5159-5040)...................................................No limit
WSU housing system
surplus fund (715-00-5620-5270)................................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (715-00-5705-5160).............................................No limit
WSU housing system depreciation and
replacement fund (715-00-5800-5260)........................................No limit
Service clearing fund (715-00-6008)................................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Central service duplicating and reproducing bureau;
automobiles; furniture stores; postal clearing; telecommunications;
computer services; and such other internal service activities as are
authorized by the state board of regents under K.S.A. 76-755, and
amendments thereto.
Scholarship funds fund (715-00-7211-7000)....................................No limit
Nine month payroll clearing

HB 2082 197
account fund (715-00-7717-7030)...............................................No limit
National direct student
loan fund (715-00-7519-7010)....................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (715-00-9059-9500)..................................No limit
Suspense fund (715-00-9077)...........................................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (715-00-9144-9520)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (715-00-9169-9530)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (715-00-9198-9400)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (715-00-9226-9200)..............................................No limit
Sec. 104.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Tuition for technical education (561-00-1000-0120)......................$358,836
(b) On the effective date of this act, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer all moneys in the Kansas ethnic minority fellowship
program fund (561-00-7238-7600) of the state board of regents to the
teacher scholarship repayment fund (561-00-7205-7200) of the state board
of regents: Provided, That on the effective date of this act, all liabilities of
the Kansas ethnic minority fellowship program fund are hereby transferred
to the teacher scholarship repayment fund and the Kansas ethnic minority
fellowship program fund is hereby abolished.
Sec. 105.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (561-00-1000-0103)................................$5,256,170
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
during fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the operating expenditures (including official hospitality)
account for fiscal year 2026 by the state board of regents as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, the state board of regents is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 for attendance at an in-state

HB 2082 198
meeting by members of the state board of regents for participation in
matters of educational interest to the state of Kansas, upon approval of
such attendance and participation by the state board of regents: And
provided further, That each member of the state board of regents attending
an in-state meeting so authorized shall be paid compensation, subsistence
allowances, mileage and other expenses as provided in K.S.A. 75-3212,
and amendments thereto, for members of the legislature: And provided
further, That, during fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of
any other statute and in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 by the state board of
regents as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, the state board of regents is hereby authorized to
make expenditures from the operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 for attendance at an out-of-state
meeting by members of the state board of regents whenever under any
provision of law such members of the state board of regents are authorized
to attend the out-of-state meeting or whenever the state board of regents
authorizes such members to attend the out-of-state meeting for
participation in matters of educational interest to the state of Kansas: And
provided further, That each member of the state board of regents attending
an out-of-state meeting so authorized shall be paid compensation,
subsistence allowances, mileage and other expenses as provided in K.S.A.
75-3212, and amendments thereto, for members of the legislature: And
provided further, That, during fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute and in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 by the state
board of regents as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, the state board of regents is hereby
authorized to make expenditures from the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 for attendance
at an out-of-state meeting by members of the state board of regents
whenever under any provision of law such members of the state board of
regents are authorized to attend the out-of-state meeting or whenever the
state board of regents authorizes such members to attend the out-of-state
meeting for participation in matters of educational interest to the state of
Kansas: And provided further, That each member of the state board of
regents attending an out-of-state meeting so authorized shall be paid
compensation, subsistence allowances, mileage and other expenses as
provided in K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto, for members of the
legislature.
Tuition for technical education (561-00-1000-0120).................$47,050,000

HB 2082 199
Provided, That, any unencumbered balance in the tuition for technical
education account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the tuition for technical education account of the state general fund for
fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
tuition for technical education account of the state general fund for fiscal
year 2026 for the payment of technical education tuition for adult students
who are enrolled in technical education classes while obtaining a high
school equivalency (HSE) credential using the accelerating opportunity
program and for the postsecondary education institution to provide a
transcript to each student who completes such technical education course,
and qualified expenses as provided in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-32,267, and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, not later than 60 days following the class start date,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account for
tuition reimbursement.
NISS academic playbook (561-00-1000-0140)............................$6,361,600
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the NISS academic playbook
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Midwest higher education
commission (561-00-1000-0250)...............................................$115,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest higher
education commission account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Career technical education capital
outlay aid (561-00-1000-0310)...............................................$4,871,585
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, in the career technical education capital outlay aid account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That such aid shall
be distributed to eligible institutions as defined in K.S.A. 71-1802(d), and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That all expenditures from such
account shall require a local match of nonstate moneys or donated
equipment on a $1-for-$1 basis from either a nonstate or private donation.
Universities' IT infrastructure and
cybersecurity (561-00-1000-0330).........................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in universities' IT infrastructure
and cybersecurity account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the above
agency is directed to work with the office of information technology
services to ensure the above moneys are being spent properly.

HB 2082 200
Technology equipment at community colleges and
Washburn university (561-00-1000-0500).................................$398,475
Provided, That the state board of regents is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the technology equipment at community colleges and
Washburn university account for grants to community colleges and
Washburn university pursuant to grant applications for the purchase of
technology equipment, in accordance with guidelines established by the
state board of regents.
Non-tiered course credit
hour grant (561-00-1000-0550)............................................$88,361,538
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the non-tiered course credit
hour grant account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Postsecondary tiered technical education
state aid (561-00-1000-0760)................................................$66,453,525
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the postsecondary tiered
technical education state aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Community colleges' and
technical colleges' cybersecurity
and IT infrastructure (561-00-1000-0860)..............................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community colleges' and
technical colleges' cybersecurity and IT infrastructure account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all expenditures from the community colleges' and
technical colleges' cybersecurity and IT infrastructure account shall be
made to provide $250,000 to each community college, technical college
and the Washburn institute of technology: And provided further, That the
above agency is directed to work with the community colleges and
technical colleges to ensure that the moneys in such account are being
spent properly.
Adult basic education (561-00-1000-0900).................................$1,567,031
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the adult basic education
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Municipal university
operating grant (561-00-1000-1010).....................................$18,470,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the municipal university
operating grant account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Nursing faculty and supplies
grant program (561-00-1000-4130)........................................$3,787,193
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nursing faculty and

HB 2082 201
supplies grant program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the state
board of regents is hereby authorized to make grants to Kansas
postsecondary educational institutions with accredited nursing programs
from the nursing faculty and supplies grant program account for expansion
of nursing faculty, laboratory supplies and tools for student success: And
provided further, That such grants shall be either need-based or
competitive and shall be matched on the basis of $1 from the nursing
faculty and supplies grant program account for $1 from the postsecondary
educational institution receiving the grant.
Kansas blueprint for literacy
(including official hospitality) (561-00-1000-0190).............$10,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas blueprint for
literacy (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas education
opportunity scholarships (561-00-1000-0230)........................$1,700,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas education
opportunity scholarships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Washburn university student
aid for financial need (561-00-1000-0350).............................$1,784,260
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Washburn university
student aid for financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Nursing student scholarship program (561-00-1000-4100).........$1,000,000
Postsecondary education operating grant
(including official hospitality) (561-00-1000-0770)...............$2,000,000
Hero's act scholarships (561-00-1000-0160)................................$1,500,000
Osteopathic service scholarship (561-00-1000-0180)..................$2,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the osteopathic service
scholarship account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Need-based aid scholarship
and recruitment (561-00-1000-0580)....................................$14,400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the need-based aid
scholarship and recruitment account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
SGF – career technical education
capital outlay aid (561-00-1000).............................................$2,547,726
Provided, That expenditures from the SGF – career technical education
capital outlay aid account for each grant of career technical education
capital outlay aid shall require a local match of nonstate moneys or

HB 2082 202
donated equipment on a $1-for-$1 basis from either a nonstate or private
donation.
SGF – technology innovation and
internship program (561-00-1000).............................................$179,284
SGF – EPSCOR (561-00-1000)......................................................$993,265
Community and technical college
competitive grants (561-00-1000)..............................................$500,000
Provided, That all moneys in the community and technical college
competitive grants account shall be for grants awarded to community and
technical colleges under a competitive grant program administered by the
secretary of commerce: Provided further, That all expenditures from such
account shall be for competitive grants to community and technical
colleges that require a local match of nonstate moneys on a $1-for-$1
basis, from either the college or private industry partner, and that will
develop innovative programs with private companies needing specific job
skills or will meet other industry needs that cannot be addressed with
current funding streams.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Technical
colleges operating grants (561-00-1000-0150); Washburn ensuring
pathways to student success (561-00-1000-0455); Washburn university
manufacturing training center (561-00-1000-0200); community college
capital outlay aid (561-00-1000-0850); two-year college apprenticeship act
(561-00-1000-0130); two-year college student success initiatives (561-00-
1000-0210); EMERGE program assistance (561-00-1000-0240); Kansas
nursing initiative grant program (561-00-1000-4110); and rural family
physician residency program expansion grant (561-00-1000-0220).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
GED credentials processing
fees fund (561-00-2151-2100).....................................................No limit
Truck driver training fund (561-00-2172-4900)...............................No limit
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (561-00-2266)................................................................No limit
Financial aid services
fee fund (561-00-2280-2800)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the financial aid services
fee fund for operating expenditures directly or indirectly related to the
operating costs associated with student financial assistance programs
administered by the state board of regents: Provided further, That the chief
executive officer of the state board of regents is hereby authorized to fix,

HB 2082 203
charge and collect fees for the processing of applications and other
activities related to student financial assistance programs administered by
the state board of regents: And provided further, That such fees shall be
fixed in order to recover all or a part of the direct and indirect operating
expenses incurred for administering such programs: And provided further,
That all moneys received for such fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the financial aid services fee
fund.
Motorcycle safety fund (561-00-2366-2360)...................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (561-00-2433-3200)..........................................No limit
Grants fund (561-00-2525-2500)......................................................No limit
Private and out-of-state
postsecondary educational institution
fee fund (561-00-2614-2610)......................................................No limit
Private postsecondary educational institution degree
authorization expense reimbursement
fee fund (561-00-2643-3300)......................................................No limit
Postsecondary education performance-based
incentives fund (561-00-2777-2777)...........................................No limit
KAN-ED services fee fund (561-00-2814-2814).............................No limit
Kansas high school equivalency credential
processing fee fund (561-00-2832-2832)....................................No limit
Adult basic education –
federal fund (561-00-3042-3000)................................................No limit
Carl D. Perkins vocational
and technical education –
federal fund (561-00-3539-3539)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (561-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Earned indirect costs
fund – federal (561-00-3642-3600).............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (561-00-3753)................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (561-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Paul Douglas teacher scholarship
fund – federal (561-00-3879-3950).............................................No limit
USAC E-rate program
federal fund (561-00-3920-3920)................................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
program fund (561-00-7200-7050)..............................................No limit
State scholarship discontinued

HB 2082 204
attendance fund (561-00-7213-6100)..........................................No limit
Osteopathic medical service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7216-6300)..........................................No limit
Nursing service scholarship
program fund (561-00-7220-6800)..............................................No limit
Tuition waiver gifts, grants and
reimbursements fund (561-00-7230-7230)..................................No limit
Kansas ethnic minority fellowship
program fund (561-00-7238-7600)..............................................No limit
Optometry education
repayment fund (561-00-7203-7100)..........................................No limit
Teacher scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7205-7200)..........................................No limit
Nursing service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7210-7400)..........................................No limit
Kansas national guard
educational assistance program
repayment fund (561-00-7228-7000)..........................................No limit
Nurse educator service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7231-7300)..........................................No limit
ROTC service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7232-7232)..........................................No limit
Private donations, gifts, grants
bequest fund (561-00-7262-7700)...............................................No limit
Clearing fund (561-00-9029-9100)...................................................No limit
Regents clearing fund (561-00-9052-9200)......................................No limit
Transportation research fund............................................................No limit
Kansas adult learner grant program fund..........................................No limit
Kansas national guard EMERGE program repayment fund.............No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chief executive
officer of the state board of regents, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation in an account of
the state general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to another
item of appropriation in an account of the state general fund for fiscal year
2026. The chief executive officer of the state board of regents shall certify
each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit
a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research. As
used in this subsection, "account" means any account of the state general
fund of the state board of regents, the university of Kansas, the university
of Kansas medical center, Kansas state university, Kansas state university
Salina, Kansas state university veterinary medical center, Kansas state
university extension systems and agriculture research programs, Wichita
state university, Emporia state university, Pittsburg state university and

HB 2082 205
Fort Hays state university.
(d) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by any state educational institution from the moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 for such state educational institution as authorized by this
or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by such state educational institution from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of capital
improvement projects making energy and other conservation
improvements: Provided, That such capital improvement projects are
hereby approved for such state educational institution for the purposes of
K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization of
issuance of one or more series of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with that statute from time to time during
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That no such bonds shall be issued
until the state board of regents has first advised and consulted on any such
project with the joint committee on state building construction: Provided
further, That the amount of the bond proceeds that may be utilized for any
such capital improvement project shall be subject to approval by the state
finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a
matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in
K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session: And provided further,
That, in addition to such project costs, any such amount of bond proceeds
may include costs of issuance, capitalized interest and any required
reserves for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds: And
provided further, That all moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as prescribed by applicable
bond covenants: And provided further, That payments relating to principal
and interest on such bonds shall be subject to and dependent upon annual
appropriations therefor to the state educational institution for which the
bonds are issued: And provided further, That each energy conservation
capital improvement project for which bonds are issued for financing
under this subsection shall be designed and completed in order to have
cost savings sufficient to be equal to or greater than the cost of debt service
on such bonds: And provided further, That the state board of regents shall
prepare and submit a report to the committee on appropriations of the
house of representatives and the committee on ways and means of the
senate on the savings attributable to energy conservation capital
improvements for which bonds are issued for financing under this
subsection at the beginning of the 2026 regular session of the legislature.
(2) As used in this subsection, "state educational institution" includes

HB 2082 206
each state educational institution as defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and
amendments thereto.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts of the state
economic development initiatives fund in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: SEDIF – career
technical education capital outlay aid (561-00-1900-1950); SEDIF –
technology innovation and internship program (561-00-1900-1960);
SEDIF – EPSCOR (561-00-1900-1970); and community and technical
college competitive grants (561-00-1900-1980).
(f) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by any postsecondary educational institution from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund
or funds for fiscal year 2026 for such postsecondary educational institution
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures may be made by such postsecondary
educational institution from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the
purpose of deeming any person who is enrolled as a member of the
Kickapoo Tribe of Indians of the Kickapoo Reservation in Kansas, the
Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation, the Iowa Tribe of Kansas, the Sac and
Fox Nation of Missouri in Kansas and Nebraska or of indigenous nations
with historical connections to Kansas territories named in this subsection,
regardless of the residence of such person prior to admission at a
postsecondary educational institution, as a resident of this state for the
purpose of tuition and fees for attendance at any postsecondary
educational institution.
(2) As used in this subsection:
(A) "Postsecondary educational institution" means the same as
defined in K.S.A. 74-3201b, and amendments thereto; and
(B) "indigenous nations with historical connections to Kansas
territories" means any federally recognized tribe containing one or more
references to the following tribal affiliations within such tribe's name:
Apache, Arapaho, Caddo, Cheyenne, Cherokee, Chickasaw, Chippewa and
Ojibwe (including Bay Mills), Choctaw, Comanche, Delaware, Iowa
(Ioway and Baxoje), Kaw (Kanza), Kickapoo, Kiowa, Miami, Missouria
(including Otoe-Missouria), Modoc, Muscogee (Creek, including Yuchi,
Euchee or Uchee), Nez Perce, Omaha, Oneida, Osage, Otoe, Ottawa
(Odawa), Potawatomi (Pottawatomi), Pawnee, Peoria, Ponca, Pueblo,
Quapaw, Sac and Fox (including Meskwaki), Seminole, Seneca-Cayuga,
Shawnee, Stockbridge-Munsee (Mohican), Wichita and Affiliated Tribes
(Wichita, Keechi, Waco and Tawakonie) and Wyandotte.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,000,000 from the state
general fund to the Kansas adult learner grant program fund (561-00-2857-

HB 2082 207
2857) of the state board of regents.
Sec. 106.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the following:
Osteopathic service scholarship (561-00-1000-0180)..................$2,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the osteopathic service
scholarship account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Teachers scholarship program (561-00-1000-0800)....................$3,094,046
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the teachers scholarship
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Governor's scholars program (561-00-1000-0950)...........................$20,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the governor's scholars
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Kansas promise scholarship (561-00-1000-0960)......................$10,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas promise
scholarship program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Optometry education program (561-00-1000-1100).......................$107,089
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the optometry education
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
National guard educational assistance (561-00-1000-1300)........$5,400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the national guard
educational assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That moneys
in the national guard educational assistance account represent and include
the profits derived from the veterans benefit game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
8724, and amendments thereto.
Military service scholarships (561-00-1000-1310).........................$500,314
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the military service
scholarships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the military service scholarships account shall be made for
scholarships awarded under the military service scholarship program act,
K.S.A. 74-32,227 through 74-32,232, and amendments thereto.
Tuition waivers (561-00-1000-1650)...........................................$4,450,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the tuition waivers account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2027: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of

HB 2082 208
K.S.A. 75-4364, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the state
board of regents may reimburse a Kansas educational institution as defined
in K.S.A. 75-4364, and amendments thereto, for reimbursement claims of
up to the amount of the appropriation available for such waivers in fiscal
year 2027.
Kansas work-study program (561-00-1000-2000)..........................$546,813
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas work-study
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That the state board
of regents is hereby authorized to transfer moneys from the Kansas work-
study program account to the Kansas career work-study program fund of
any institution under its jurisdiction participating in the Kansas work-study
program established by K.S.A. 74-3274 et seq., and amendments thereto:
And provided further, That all moneys transferred from this account to the
Kansas career work-study program fund of any such institution shall be
expended for and in accordance with the Kansas work-study program.
Career technical workforce grant (561-00-1000-2200)...................$114,075
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the career technical
workforce grant account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Kansas education opportunity scholarships (561-00-1000-0230)$1,700,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas education
opportunity scholarships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
EMERGE program assistance (561-00-1000-0240)....................$2,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the EMERGE program
assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Nursing student scholarship program (561-00-1000-4100).........$1,417,255
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nursing student
scholarship program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Nurse educator grant program (561-00-1000-4120).......................$188,126
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nurse educator grant
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the nurse educator grant program account shall be made for
scholarships awarded under the nurse educator service scholarship
program act.
State scholarship program (561-00-1000-4300)..........................$1,035,919
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state scholarship
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That expenditures

HB 2082 209
may be made from the state scholarship program account for the state
scholarship program under K.S.A. 74-32,239, and amendments thereto,
and for the Kansas distinguished scholarship program under K.S.A. 74-
3278 through 74-3283, and amendments thereto: And provided further,
That, of the total amount appropriated in the state scholarship program
account, the amount dedicated for the Kansas distinguished scholarship
program shall not exceed $25,000.
Comprehensive grant program (561-00-1000-4500).................$40,258,338
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the comprehensive grant
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That all of such
expenditures from such account shall require a match of local nonstate or
private moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis: And provided further, That all
expenditures from the comprehensive grant program account for fiscal
year 2027 shall be made by the above agency in a manner that distributes
50% of such moneys to state educational institutions as defined in K.S.A.
76-711, and amendments thereto, and Washburn university and 50% to
not-for-profit independent institutions of higher education that are defined
as a Kansas educational institution under K.S.A. 74-32,120, and
amendments thereto.
ROTC service scholarships (561-00-1000-4600)...........................$175,335
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the ROTC service
scholarships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Computer science preservice
educator grant (561-00-1000-4700)........................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the computer science
preservice educator grant account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
Any unencumbered balance in the ethnic minority scholarship program
account (561-00-1000-2410) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
(b) On July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,000,000 from the state
general fund to the Kansas adult learner grant program fund (561-00-2857-
2857) of the state board of regents.
Sec. 107.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Treatment and programs –
medical and mental (521-00-1000-0152)................................$5,425,167
Sec. 108.

HB 2082 210
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Evidence-based programs (521-00-1000-0050).........................$13,466,904
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the evidence-based programs
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-52,164, and amendments thereto, or any other statute,
expenditures may be made from this account to conduct research into, and
development of, evidence-based practices to reduce offender behavior and
recidivism among juveniles: Provided, however, That the expenditures for
such research and development shall not exceed $1,000,000: And provided
further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-52,164, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures shall be made by
the above agency from the evidence-based programs account for the jobs
for America's graduates-Kansas programs: Provided, however, That the
expenditures for such programs shall not exceed $5,500,000: And provided
further, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
account to require jobs for American's graduates-Kansas to submit a report
to the Kansas juvenile justice oversight committee established by K.S.A.
75-52,161, and amendments thereto, on or after June 15, 2026, but on or
before June 30, 2026: And provided further, That such report shall include
the number of youths served and performance outcomes.
Juvenile crime
community prevention (521-00-1000-0051)...........................$1,500,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
account during fiscal year 2026 to provide grants to communities for
evidence-based juvenile crime prevention programs: Provided further,
That at least $500,000 of such grants shall require a $1-for-$1 local or
private match.
Operating expenditures –
juvenile services (521-00-1000-0103)....................................$1,807,359
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures –
juvenile services account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs –
offender programs (521-00-1000-0151)...............................$13,543,826
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and programs –
offender programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs – medical
and mental (521-00-1000-0152)...........................................$95,810,002
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and programs –

HB 2082 211
medical and mental account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Department of corrections
hepatitis C treatment (521-00-1000-0153)..............................$2,600,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the department of
corrections hepatitis C treatment account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs –
KUMC contract (521-00-1000-0154).....................................$2,172,472
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and programs –
KUMC contract account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Community corrections (521-00-1000-0220)............................$31,098,494
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community corrections
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That no expenditures may be made by
any county from any grant made to such county from the community
corrections account for either half of state fiscal year 2026 that supplant
any amount of local public or private funding of existing programs as
determined in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the
secretary of corrections.
Prevention and graduated sanctions
community grants (521-00-1000-0221)................................$21,620,419
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the prevention and graduated
sanctions community grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
moneys awarded as grants from the prevention and graduated sanctions
community grants account is not an entitlement to communities, but a
grant that must meet conditions prescribed by the above agency for
appropriate outcomes.
Facilities operations (521-00-1000-0303)..................................$20,970,639
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the facilities operations
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Local jail payments (521-00-1000-0510).....................................$1,550,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the local jail payments
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 19-1930, and amendments thereto, payments by the department of
corrections under K.S.A. 19-1930(b), and amendments thereto, for the cost
of maintenance of prisoners shall not exceed the per capita daily operating
cost, not including inmate programs, for the department of corrections.
Operating expenditures (521-00-1000-0603).............................$57,311,502

HB 2082 212
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Debt service payments – data
systems replacement (521-00-1000-0702)..............................$3,346,286
Equipment replacements (521-00-1000-0810)................................$756,213
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the equipment replacements
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Vehicle replacements (521-00-1000-0820).....................................$591,717
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vehicle replacements
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Ellsworth correctional facility –
facilities operations (177-00-1000-0303)..............................$24,391,081
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Ellsworth correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Ellsworth correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
El Dorado correctional facility –
facilities operations (195-00-1000-0303)..............................$48,480,936
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the El Dorado correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the El Dorado correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Hutchinson correctional facility –
facilities operations (313-00-1000-0303)..............................$53,121,639
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Hutchinson correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Hutchinson correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Kansas juvenile correctional complex –
facilities operations (352-00-1000-0303)..............................$28,985,818
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas juvenile
correctional complex – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the Kansas juvenile correctional complex
– facilities operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from this account

HB 2082 213
for educational services contracts, which are hereby authorized to be
negotiated and entered into by the above agency with unified school
districts or other accredited educational services providers.
Lansing correctional facility –
facilities operations (400-00-1000-0303)..............................$51,451,496
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Lansing correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Lansing correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Larned state correctional facility –
facilities operations (408-00-1000-0303)..............................$19,284,631
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned correctional
mental health facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the Larned state correctional
facility – facilities operations account for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the Larned state correctional facility –
facilities operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Norton correctional facility –
facilities operations (581-00-1000-0303)..............................$25,986,288
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Norton correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Norton correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Topeka correctional facility –
facilities operations (660-00-1000-0303)..............................$25,054,852
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Topeka correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Topeka correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Winfield correctional facility –
facilities operations (712-00-1000-0303)..............................$27,600,301
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Winfield correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Winfield correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Kansas
penitentiary museum content (521-00-1000-0830); Lansing career campus
(521-00-0850); Lansing future museum stabilization (521-00-1000-0840);

HB 2082 214
and inpatient juvenile substance abuse treatment (521-00-1000-0860).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Supervision fees fund (521-00-2116-2100)......................................No limit
Juvenile alternatives to
detention fund (521-00-2250)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 79-4803, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the juvenile alternatives to detention fund for per
diem payments to detention centers: Provided, however, That expenditures
from the juvenile alternatives to detention fund for per diem payments to
detention centers shall not exceed $100,000: And provided further, That the
department of corrections is hereby authorized and directed to make
expenditures from the juvenile alternatives to detention fund for fiscal year
2026 for purchase of services: And provided further, That, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 79-4803, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the juvenile
alternatives to detention fund for graduated sanctions.
Juvenile justice fee fund central office (521-00-2257).....................No limit
Alcohol and drug abuse
treatment fund (521-00-2339-2110)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the alcohol and drug abuse
treatment fund for payments associated with providing treatment services
to offenders who were driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs
regardless of when the services were rendered.
Department of corrections – general
fees fund (521-00-2427-2450).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the department of
corrections – general fees fund for operating expenditures for training
programs for correctional personnel, including official hospitality:
Provided further, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees for such programs: And provided further, That
such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating
expenses incurred for such training programs, including official
hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received for such programs
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
department of corrections – general fees fund.
Community corrections special
revenue fund (521-00-2447-2447)...............................................No limit

HB 2082 215
Department of corrections forensic
psychologist fund (521-00-2492-2492)............................................ limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the department of
corrections forensic psychologist fund for general healthcare contract
expenses.
Community corrections supervision
fund (521-00-2748-2748)............................................................No limit
Residential substance abuse treatment –
federal fund (521-00-3006).........................................................No limit
Title I program for neglected and
delinquent children – federal fund (521-00-3009).......................No limit
Distance learning and telemedicine –
federal fund (521-00-3025).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial
justice assistance grants –
federal fund (521-00-3057).........................................................No limit
Prisoner reentry intv demo –
federal fund (521-00-3063).........................................................No limit
Federal asset forfeiture –
federal fund (521-00-3063-3713)................................................No limit
Violence against women –
federal fund (521-00-3082).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne state and local law assistance –
federal fund (521-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Violence against women –
federal fund (521-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (521-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Title VI-B special education –
federal fund (521-00-3234).........................................................No limit
Victims of crime act –
federal fund (521-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Juvenile justice delinquency prevention
federal fund (521-00-3351).........................................................No limit
Byrne grant – federal fund (521-00-3353-3200)..............................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (521-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance –
federal fund (521-00-3415).........................................................No limit
USMS reimbursement –
federal fund (521-00-3562-3562)................................................No limit
Elementary & secondary schools emergency relief –
federal fund (521-00-3638).........................................................No limit

HB 2082 216
Detection & mitigation of COVID-19
in confinement facilities –
federal fund (521-00-3649).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (521-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Justice reinvestment technical assistance
for state governments project –
federal fund (521-00-3758-3758)................................................No limit
Prison rape elimination act (PREA) justice
assistance grant –
federal fund (521-00-3758).........................................................No limit
JRI technical assistance and training –
federal fund (521-00-3804-3804)................................................No limit
Second chance act –
federal fund (521-00-3895-3895)................................................No limit
Department of corrections –
alien incarceration grant
fund – federal (521-00-3943-3800).............................................No limit
Second chance act reentry initiative –
federal fund (521-00-3985-3901)................................................No limit
ICJR – federal fund...........................................................................No limit
Juvenile delinquency prevention
trust fund (521-00-7322-7000)....................................................No limit
State of Kansas – department
of corrections inmate
benefit fund (521-00-7950-5350)................................................No limit
Ellsworth correctional facility – general
fees fund (177-00-2227-2000).....................................................No limit
El Dorado correctional facility – general
fees fund (195-00-2252-2000).....................................................No limit
Hutchinson correctional facility – general
fees fund (313-00-2051-2000).....................................................No limit
Kansas juvenile correctional
complex – fee fund (352-00-2321-2300).....................................No limit
Kansas juvenile correctional complex –
title I neglected and delinquent
children – federal fund (352-00-3009)........................................No limit
National school breakfast program –
federal fund – Kansas juvenile
correctional complex (352-00-3529-3529)..................................No limit
National school lunch program –
federal fund – Kansas juvenile
correctional complex (352-00-3530-3530)..................................No limit

HB 2082 217
Kansas juvenile correctional
complex – gifts, grants and
donations fund (352-00-7016-7000)............................................No limit
Lansing correctional facility – general
fees fund (400-00-2040-2040).....................................................No limit
Larned state correctional
facility – general
fees fund (408-00-2145-2000).....................................................No limit
Correctional industries fund (522-00-6126-7300)............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the correctional industries
fund for official hospitality.
Norton correctional facility – general
fees fund (581-00-2238-2000).....................................................No limit
Topeka correctional facility – general
fees fund (660-00-2090-2090).....................................................No limit
Topeka correctional facility – community
development block grant –
federal fund (660-00-3669-3669)................................................No limit
Winfield correctional facility – general
fees fund (712-00-2237-2000).....................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
corrections, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, from the state general fund for the department of corrections or any
correctional institution or correctional facility under the general
supervision and management of the secretary of corrections to another
item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for
the department of corrections or any correctional institution or correctional
facility under the general supervision and management of the secretary of
corrections. The secretary of corrections shall certify each such transfer to
the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3731, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall accept for payment from the secretary of corrections any duly
authorized claim to be paid from the local jail payments account (521-00-
1000-0510) of the state general fund during fiscal year 2026 for costs
pursuant to K.S.A. 19-1930(b), and amendments thereto, even though such
claim is not submitted or processed for payment within the fiscal year in
which the service is rendered and whether or not the services were
rendered prior to the effective date of this act.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3731, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and

HB 2082 218
reports shall accept for payment from the director of Kansas correctional
industries any duly authorized claim to be paid from the correctional
industries fund (522-00-6126-7300) during fiscal year 2026 for operating
or manufacturing costs even though such claim is not submitted or
processed for payment within the fiscal year in which the service is
rendered and whether or not the services were rendered prior to the
effective date of this act. The director of Kansas correctional industries
shall provide to the director of the budget on or before September 15,
2026, a detailed accounting of all such payments made from the
correctional industries fund during fiscal year 2026.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
corrections, with the approval of the director of the budget, may make
transfers from the correctional industries fund (522-00-6126-7300) to the
department of corrections – general fees fund (521-00-2427-2450) and the
Kansas correctional industries – capital improvements fund (522-00-6126-
7301). The secretary of corrections shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all expenditures
made by the department of corrections from the correctional industries
fund (522-00-6126-7300) shall be made on budget for all purposes of state
accounting and budgeting for the department of corrections.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-52,164, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during fiscal year 2026, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount certified
pursuant to K.S.A. 75-52,164(b), and amendments thereto, from each
account of the state general fund of a state agency that has been
determined by the secretary of corrections to be actual or projected cost
savings to the evidence-based programs account of the state general fund
of the department of corrections: Provided, That the secretary of
corrections shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
Sec. 109.
ADJUTANT GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Disaster relief (034-00-1000-0200)..............................................$1,600,000
Operating expenditures (034-00-1000-0053)..................................$400,000
Sec. 110.
ADJUTANT GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (034-00-1000-0053)...............................$7,514,875

HB 2082 219
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
Civil air patrol – operating
expenditures (034-00-1000-0103)................................................$43,068
Disaster relief (034-00-1000-0200)..............................................$3,800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the disaster relief account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026.
Military activation payments (034-00-1000-0300).............................$9,114
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the military activation
payments account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the military activation payments account shall be for military
activation payments authorized by and subject to the provisions of K.S.A.
75-3228, and amendments thereto.
Kansas military
emergency relief (034-00-1000-0400)...........................................$9,881
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas military
emergency relief account for grants and interest-free loans, which are
hereby authorized to be entered into by the adjutant general with
repayment provisions and other terms and conditions including eligibility
as may be prescribed by the adjutant general therefor, to members and
families of the Kansas army and air national guard and members and
families of the reserve forces of the United States of America who are
Kansas residents, during the period preceding, during and after
mobilization to provide assistance to eligible family members
experiencing financial emergencies: Provided further, That such assistance
may include, but shall not be limited to, medical, funeral, emergency
travel, rent, utilities, child care, food expenses and other unanticipated
emergencies: And provided further, That any moneys received by the
adjutant general in repayment of any grants or interest-free loans made
from the Kansas military emergency relief account shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the Kansas military
emergency relief account.
Office of emergency
communication (034-00-1000-0800).........................................$307,537
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of emergency
communication account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following

HB 2082 220
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Inaugural expense fund (034-00-2003).............................................No limit
Nuclear safety emergency management
fee fund (034-00-2081)................................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, the
adjutant general may make transfers of moneys from the nuclear safety
emergency management fee fund to other state agencies for fiscal year
2026 pursuant to agreements, which are hereby authorized to be entered
into by the adjutant general with other state agencies to provide
appropriate emergency management plans to administer the Kansas
nuclear safety emergency management act, K.S.A. 48-940 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
General fees fund (034-00-2102)......................................................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees agreed upon in memorandums of understanding with other
state agencies, local government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-
for-profit organizations: Provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in
order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred under the provisions of
the memorandums of understanding with other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: And provided further, That all fees received pursuant to such
memorandums of understanding shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund.
Military fees fund – federal (034-00-2152)......................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the adjutant general from the
federal government for reimbursement for expenditures made under
agreements with the federal government shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the military fees fund –
federal.
Armories and units general
fees fund (034-00-2171)..............................................................No limit
NG – federal forfeiture fund (034-00-2184).....................................No limit
Adjutant general expense fund (034-00-2357).................................No limit
Conversion of materials and equipment fund –
military division (034-00-2400)..................................................No limit
State emergency fund (034-00-2437)...............................................No limit
State emergency fund weather
disasters 5/4/2007 (034-00-2441)................................................No limit

HB 2082 221
State emergency fund weather
disasters 12/06, 7/07 (034-00-2445)............................................No limit
Office of emergency communications
fund (034-00-2496)......................................................................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for recovery of costs associated with the use of the above
agency's communication equipment by other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: Provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of the expenses incurred in providing for the use of the
above agency's communication equipment by other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: And provided further, That all fees received for use of the
above agency's communication equipment by other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations or not-for-profit
organizations shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the office of emergency communications fund.
State asset forfeiture fund (034-00-2498).........................................No limit
Kansas military emergency
relief fund (034-00-2658)............................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas military
emergency relief fund for grants and interest-free loans, which are hereby
authorized to be entered into by the adjutant general with repayment
provisions and other terms and conditions including eligibility as may be
prescribed by the adjutant general therefor, to members and families of the
Kansas army and air national guard and members and families of the
reserve forces of the United States of America who are Kansas residents,
during the period preceding, during and after mobilization to provide
assistance to eligible family members experiencing financial emergencies:
Provided further, That such assistance may include, but shall not be limited
to, medical, funeral, emergency travel, rent, utilities, child care, food
expenses and other unanticipated emergencies: And provided further, That
any moneys received by the adjutant general in repayment of any grants or
interest-free loans made from the Kansas military emergency relief fund
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
Kansas military emergency relief fund.
Great plains joint regional training center
fee fund (034-00-2688)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the great plains joint
regional training center fee fund for use of the great plains joint regional
training center by other state agencies, local government agencies, for-

HB 2082 222
profit organizations and not-for-profit organizations: Provided further,
That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect
fees for recovery of costs associated with the use of the great plains joint
regional training center by other state agencies, local government agencies,
for-profit organizations and not-for-profit organizations: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the
expenses incurred in providing for the use of the great plains joint regional
training center by other state agencies, local government agencies, for-
profit organizations and not-for-profit organizations: And provided further,
That all fees received for use of the great plains joint regional training
center by other state agencies, local government agencies, for-profit
organizations or not-for-profit organizations shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the great plains joint regional
training center fee fund.
Military honors funeral fund (034-00-2789)....................................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to accept gifts and
donations of money during fiscal year 2026 for military funeral honors or
purposes related thereto: Provided further, That such gifts and donations of
money shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the military honors funeral fund.
Disaster grants – public assistance
federal fund (034-00-3005).........................................................No limit
Hazard mitigation grant
federal fund (034-00-3019).........................................................No limit
National guard military operations/maintenance
federal fund (034-00-3055).........................................................No limit
Hazard material training and planning –
federal fund (034-00-3121).........................................................No limit
Military construction national guard
federal fund (034-00-3192).........................................................No limit
National guard civilian youth opportunities
federal fund (034-00-3193).........................................................No limit
Econ adjustment/military installation
federal fund (034-00-3196).........................................................No limit
Pre-disaster mitigation –
federal fund (034-00-3268).........................................................No limit
Fire management assistance grant –
federal fund (034-00-3320).........................................................No limit
Public safety interoperable
communications grant program
federal fund (034-00-3340).........................................................No limit

HB 2082 223
Citizen corps federal fund (034-00-3341)........................................No limit
Emergency management performance grant –
federal fund (034-00-3342).........................................................No limit
Disaster assistance to individual/household
federal fund (034-00-3405).........................................................No limit
Interoperability communication
equipment fund (034-00-3449)....................................................No limit
Safe and drug-free schools and
communities national programs
federal fund (034-00-3569).........................................................No limit
State and local implementation grant program –
federal fund (034-00-3576).........................................................No limit
Emergency management assistance compact
federal fund (034-00-3609).........................................................No limit
Law enforcement terrorism prevention program
federal fund (034-00-3613).........................................................No limit
State homeland security program
federal fund (034-00-3629).........................................................No limit
Emergency systems for advanced registration
for volunteer health professionals –
federal fund (034-00-3748).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (034-00-3753).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (034-00-3756)............................................................No limit
Civil air patrol – grants and contributions –
federal fund (034-00-7315).........................................................No limit
Kansas intelligence fusion center fund (034-00-7369).....................No limit
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the adjutant general from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026 and from which expenditures may be made for salaries and wages, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature, expenditures may be made by the adjutant general from
such moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the provisions
of K.S.A. 48-205, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to other positions within the adjutant general's department in the
unclassified service as prescribed by law for additional positions in the
unclassified service under the Kansas civil service act: Provided, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-2935, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, the adjutant general may appoint a deputy
adjutant general, who shall have no military command authority, and who

HB 2082 224
may be a civilian and shall have served at least five years as a
commissioned officer with the Kansas national guard, who will perform
such duties as the adjutant general shall assign, and who will serve in the
unclassified service under the Kansas civil service act: Provided further,
That the position of such deputy adjutant general in the unclassified
service under the Kansas civil service act shall be established by the
adjutant general within the position limitation established for the adjutant
general on the number of full-time and regular part-time positions equated
to full-time, excluding seasonal and temporary positions, paid from
appropriations for fiscal year 2026 made by this or other appropriation act
of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the adjutant general,
with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer any part of
any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026, from the state general fund
for the adjutant general to another item of appropriation for fiscal year
2026 from the state general fund for the adjutant general: Provided, That
the adjutant general shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of legislative research.
Sec. 111.
STATE FIRE MARSHAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures, other than refunds authorized by law,
purchases of nationally recognized adopted codes for resale and federally
reimbursed overtime, shall not exceed the following:
Boiler inspection fee fund (234-00-2128-2128)...............................No limit
Provided, That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of any statute, in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made from the boiler inspection
fee fund for fiscal year 2026 by the above agency by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the boiler inspection
fee fund for operating expenses of the above agency.
Fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330)...........................................$9,890,287
Provided, That expenditures from the fire marshal fee fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Explosives regulatory and
training fund (234-00-2361-2361)...............................................No limit
Emergency response fund (234-00-2589).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the state fire marshal from
the emergency response fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of

HB 2082 225
responding to specific incidences of emergencies related to hazardous
materials or search and rescue incidents without prior approval of the state
finance council: Provided, however, That expenditures from the emergency
response fund during fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of responding to
any specific incidence of an emergency related to hazardous materials or
search and rescue incidents without prior approval by the state finance
council shall not exceed $25,000, except upon approval by the state
finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a
matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in
K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session.
State fire marshal liquefied petroleum gas
fee fund (234-00-2608-2600)......................................................No limit
Non-fuel flammable or combustible
liquid aboveground storage tank
system fund (234-00-2626-2610)................................................No limit
Fire safety standard and
firefighter protection act
enforcement fund (234-00-2694-2620).......................................No limit
Cigarette fire safety standard
and firefighter protection
act fund (234-00-2696-2630).......................................................No limit
Elevator safety fee fund (234-00-2854-2854)..................................No limit
FFY12 HMEP grant –
federal fund (234-00-3121-3121)................................................No limit
Contract inspections fund (234-00-6122-6122)................................No limit
Intragovernmental
service fund (234-00-6160-6000)................................................No limit
Gifts, grants and
donations fund (234-00-7405-7400)............................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal, with the approval of
the director of the budget, may transfer funds from the fire marshal fee
fund (234-00-2330-2000) to the emergency response fund (234-00-2589)
of the state fire marshal. The state fire marshal shall certify each such
transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of
each such certification to the director of legislative research and the
director of the budget: Provided, That the aggregate amount of such
transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not exceed
$500,000.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be credited

HB 2082 226
to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) during fiscal year 2026,
and, upon a finding by the director of the budget in consultation with the
director of legislative research that the total of the unencumbered balance
and estimated receipts to be credited to the fire marshal fee fund during
fiscal year 2026 are insufficient to fund the budgeted expenditures and
transfers from the fire marshal fee fund for fiscal year 2026 in accordance
with the provisions of appropriation acts, the director of the budget shall
certify such finding to the director of accounts and reports. Upon receipt of
any such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
the amount of moneys from the emergency response fund (234-00-2589)
to the fire marshal fee fund that is required, in accordance with the
certification by the director of the budget under this subsection, to fund the
budgeted expenditures and transfers from the fire marshal fee fund for the
remainder of fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the provisions of
appropriation acts, as specified by the director of the budget pursuant to
such certification.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be credited
to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) and any other resources
available to the fire marshal fee fund during the fiscal year 2026, and,
upon a finding by the director of the budget in consultation with the
director of legislative research that the total of the unencumbered balance
and estimated receipts to be credited to the fire marshal fee fund during
fiscal year 2026 are insufficient to meet in full the estimated expenditures
for fiscal year 2026 as they become due to meet the financial obligations
imposed by law on the fire marshal fee fund as a result of a cash flow
shortfall, within the authorized budgeted expenditures in accordance with
the provisions of appropriation acts, the director of the budget is
authorized and directed to certify such finding to the director of accounts
and reports. Upon receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer the amount of money specified in such
certification from the state general fund to the fire marshal fee fund in
order to maintain the cash flow of the fire marshal fee fund for such
purposes for fiscal year 2026: Provided, That the aggregate amount of
such transfers during fiscal year 2026 pursuant to this subsection shall not
exceed $500,000. Within one year from the date of each such transfer to
the fire marshal fee fund pursuant to this subsection, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer the amount equal to the amount
transferred from the state general fund to the fire marshal fee fund from
the fire marshal fee fund to the state general fund in accordance with a
certification for such purpose by the director of the budget. At the same
time as the director of the budget transmits any certification under this

HB 2082 227
subsection to the director of accounts and reports during fiscal year 2026,
the director of the budget shall transmit a copy of such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal, may transfer funds
from the contract inspections fund (234-00-6122-6122) of the state fire
marshal to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) of the state fire
marshal. The state fire marshal shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research and the director of the
budget.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal is hereby authorized
to transfer moneys during fiscal year 2025 from the elevator safety fee
fund (234-00-2854-2854) to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00- 2330-2000)
to be expended during fiscal year 2026 by the state fire marshal to
administer the provisions of the elevator safety act, K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 44-
1801 through 44-1820, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 112.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Highway patrol priority
capital improvements (280-00-1000)......................................$1,059,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the Kansas highway patrol operations fund (100-00-2704-0100)
of the Kansas highway patrol is hereby increased from $77,309,654 to
$78,926,480.
(c) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,474,812
from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the Kansas highway patrol operations fund (280-00-2034-
1100) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of financing the
acquisition of body worn cameras.
Sec. 113.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:

HB 2082 228
Kansas highway patrol
operations fund (280-00-2034-1100)....................................$78,968,732
Provided, That expenditures from the Kansas highway patrol operations
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $3,000: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the Kansas highway patrol operations
fund for the purchase of civilian clothing for members of the Kansas
highway patrol assigned to duties pursuant to K.S.A. 74-2105, and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That the superintendent shall
make expenditures from the Kansas highway patrol operations fund for
necessary moving expenses in accordance with K.S.A. 75-3225, and
amendments thereto.
General fees fund (280-00-2179-2200)............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received from the sale of used equipment,
recovery of and reimbursements for expenditures and any other source of
revenue shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the general fees fund, except as otherwise provided by law:
Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of article 66 of
chapter 75 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the general fees fund, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from such fund to sell the personal sidearm, with a
trigger lock, of a part-time state law enforcement officer, who has 10 years
or more of service, to such officer, subject to the following: (1) Such
officer is resigning; (2) the sale of such personal sidearm shall be for the
amount equal to the total of the fair market value of the sidearm, as fixed
by the superintendent, plus the cost of the trigger lock; and (3) no sale of a
personal sidearm shall be made to any resigning officer unless the
superintendent determines that the employment record and performance
evaluations of each such officer are satisfactory: And provided further,
That all proceeds from the sale of personal sidearms and trigger locks shall
be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
general fees fund.
Motor carrier safety assistance program
state fund (280-00-2208).............................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the motor carrier safety
assistance program state fund for necessary moving expenses in
accordance with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
Kansas highway patrol staffing and
training fund (280-00-2211-2211)...............................................No limit
Vehicle identification number
fee fund (280-00-2213)................................................................No limit

HB 2082 229
Highway safety fund (280-00-2217-2250).......................................No limit
State forfeiture
fund – pending (280-00-2264-2264)...........................................No limit
Highway patrol training
center fund (280-00-2306)...........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the highway patrol
training center fund for use of the highway patrol training center by other
state agencies, local government agencies and not-for-profit organizations:
Provided further, That the superintendent of the Kansas highway patrol is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for recovery of costs
associated with use of the highway patrol training center by other state
agencies, local government agencies and not-for-profit organizations: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the expenses incurred in providing for the use of the highway patrol
training center by other state or local government agencies: And provided
further, That all fees received for use of the highway patrol training center
by other state agencies, local government agencies or not-for-profit
organizations shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the highway patrol training center fund.
Highway patrol motor
vehicle fund (280-00-2317-2800)................................................No limit
Aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360)................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the aircraft fund – on
budget by the above agency in an amount of not to exceed $1,300,000 for
the maintenance and operations of any aircraft of the above agency.
DUI – IID designation fund (280-00-2380-2380)............................No limit
Kansas highway patrol state
forfeiture fund (280-00-2413-2100)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 60-4117, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, expenditures may be made from the Kansas highway patrol
state forfeiture fund for salaries and wages, and associated fringe benefits
of non-supervisory personnel.
For patrol of Kansas
turnpike fund (280-00-2514-2500)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the for patrol of Kansas
turnpike fund for necessary moving expenses in accordance with K.S.A.
75-3225, and amendments thereto.
Drug tax stamp enforcement fund (280-00-2825-2825)...................No limit
Disaster grants – public assistance –
federal fund (280-00-3005-3005)................................................No limit
Edward Byrne memorial

HB 2082 230
justice assistance grant –
federal fund (280-00-3057).........................................................No limit
National motor carrier safety assistance program –
federal fund (280-00-3073).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the national motor carrier
safety assistance program – federal fund for necessary moving expenses in
accordance with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
BAU fund (280-00-3092).................................................................No limit
Homeland security federal fund (280-00-3199)...............................No limit
Edward Byrne memorial assistance grant –
state and local law enforcement –
federal fund (280-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partner –
federal fund (280-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Public safety partnership
and community policing
federal fund (280-00-3218-3218)................................................No limit
Performance registration
information system management –
federal fund (280-00-3239-3239)................................................No limit
Commercial vehicle
information system network –
federal fund (280-00-3244-3244)................................................No limit
Highway planning and construction –
federal fund (280-00-3333-3333)................................................No limit
KHP federal forfeiture –
federal fund (280-00-3545).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the KHP federal forfeiture
– fund by the above agency for the capital improvement project or projects
for troop F headquarters.
High intensity drug trafficking areas –
federal fund (280-00-3615-3000)................................................No limit
Homeland security program –
federal fund (280-00-3629).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (280-00-3756).....................No limit
Emergency ops cntr –
federal fund (280-00-3808-3808)................................................No limit
State and community highway safety –
federal fund (280-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
General DOJ federal grant fund........................................................No limit
Body worn camera implementation fund..........................................No limit
Capitol area security fund (280-00-6143-6100)...............................No limit
Executive aircraft fund (280-00-6144-6120)....................................No limit

HB 2082 231
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the executive aircraft fund
to provide aircraft services to other state agencies and to purchase liability
and property damage insurance for state aircraft: Provided further, That the
superintendent of the highway patrol is hereby authorized to fix, charge
and collect fees for such aircraft services to other state agencies: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the operating expenses incurred in providing such services: And
provided further, That all fees received for such services shall be deposited
in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the executive aircraft
fund: And provided further, That expenditures shall be made from the
executive aircraft fund by the above agency in an amount of not to exceed
$1,500,000 for the maintenance and operations of any aircraft of the above
agency.
Motor vehicle fuel and storeroom
sales fund (280-00-6155-6200)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the motor vehicle fuel and
storeroom sales fund to acquire and sell commodities and to provide
services to local governments and other state agencies: Provided further,
That the superintendent of the Kansas highway patrol is hereby authorized
to fix, charge and collect fees for such commodities and services: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the expenses incurred in acquiring or providing and selling such
commodities and services: And provided further, That all fees received for
such commodities and services shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the motor vehicle fuel and storeroom sales
fund.
1122 program clearing fund (280-00-7280).....................................No limit
Homeland sec grant prog fund (280-00-7280).................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (280-00-7331)..........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the gifts and donations fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Ignition interlock devices program fund...........................................No limit
(b) On or before the 10th of each month during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the
state general fund to the 1122 program clearing fund (280-00-7280-7280)
interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of moneys in the
1122 program clearing fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net
earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the preceding
month.
(c) Except as provided further, on July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025,
January 1, 2026, and April 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter each such date as

HB 2082 232
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an
amount specified by the executive director of the state corporation
commission, with the approval of the director of the budget, of not more
than $500,000 from the motor carrier license fees fund (143-00-2812-
5500) of the state corporation commission to the motor carrier safety
assistance program state fund (280-00-2208) of the Kansas highway
patrol: Provided, however, That the total of all transfers shall not exceed
$2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026.
(d) Except as provided further, on July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025,
January 1, 2026, and April 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter each such date as
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$19,742,183 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the Kansas highway patrol operations fund
(280-00-2034-1100) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of
financing the Kansas highway patrol operations. In addition to other
purposes for which expenditures may be made from the state highway
fund during fiscal year 2026 and notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
68-416, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, transfers and
expenditures may be made from the state highway fund during fiscal year
2026 for support and maintenance of the Kansas highway patrol.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments thereto,
or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$295,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the highway safety fund (280-00-2217-
2250) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of financing the
motorist assistance program of the Kansas highway patrol.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments thereto,
or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$250,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the general fees fund (280-00-2179-2200)
of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of financing operating
expenditures of the Kansas highway patrol.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,300,000 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to
the aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360) of the Kansas highway
patrol.
(h) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments thereto,
or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$1,500,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the

HB 2082 233
department of transportation to the executive aircraft fund (280-00-6144-
6120) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of maintaining and
operating the executive aircraft.
(i) Any unencumbered balance in the highway patrol priority capital
improvements account of the state general fund in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 114.
ATTORNEY GENERAL – KANSAS
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (083-00-1000-0083).............................$44,616,981
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to
the operating expenditures account for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the operating expenditures account for
official hospitality shall not exceed $750.
Meth lab cleanup (083-00-1000-0200).............................................$51,447
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the meth lab cleanup account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That the above agency is hereby authorized to
make expenditures from the meth lab cleanup account to contract for
services for remediation of sites determined by law enforcement as
hazardous resulting from the production of methamphetamine.
Offender registration compliance (083-00-1000)............................$500,000
Provided, That the above agency is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the offender registration compliance account to replace
the Kansas sex offender registry tool system.
Laboratory infrastructure (083-00-1000)........................................$500,000
Provided, That the above agency is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the laboratory infrastructure account to purchase new or
replace existing laboratory equipment.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: LIMS
replacement (083-00-1000-0310); CMS replacement (083-00-1000-0320);
and lease space WSU campus (083-1000-0700).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Record check fee fund (083-00-2044)..............................................No limit
Provided, That the director of the Kansas bureau of investigation is

HB 2082 234
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in order to recover all or part of
the direct and indirect operating expenses for criminal history record
checks conducted for noncriminal justice entities including government
agencies and private organizations: Provided, however, That all moneys
received for such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the record check fee fund: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the record check fee fund for operating
expenditures of the Kansas bureau of investigation.
Forensic laboratory and materials
fee fund (083-00-2077)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the forensic laboratory and
materials fee fund for the acquisition of laboratory equipment and
materials and for other direct or indirect operating expenditures for the
forensic laboratory of the Kansas bureau of investigation: Provided,
however, That all expenditures from this fund of moneys received as
Kansas bureau of investigation laboratory analysis fees pursuant to K.S.A.
28-176, and amendments thereto, shall be for the purposes authorized by
K.S.A. 28-176(e), and amendments thereto: Provided further, That all fees
received for such laboratory tests, including all moneys received pursuant
to K.S.A. 28-176(a), and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the forensic laboratory and
materials fee fund.
General fees fund (083-00-2140)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
direct or indirect operating expenditures incurred for the following
activities: (1) Conducting education and training classes for special agents
and other personnel, including official hospitality; (2) purchasing illegal
drugs, making contacts and acquiring information leading to illegal drug
outlets, contraband and stolen property, and conducting other activities for
similar investigatory purposes; (3) conducting investigations and related
activities for the Kansas lottery or the Kansas racing and gaming
commission; (4) conducting DNA forensic laboratory tests and related
activities; (5) preparing, publishing and distributing crime prevention
materials; and (6) conducting agency operations: Provided, however, That
the director of the Kansas bureau of investigation is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees in order to recover all or part of the direct and
indirect operating expenses incurred, except as otherwise hereinafter
provided, for the following: (1) Education and training services made
available to local law enforcement personnel in classes conducted for
special agents and other personnel of the Kansas bureau of investigation;
(2) investigations and related activities conducted for the Kansas lottery or

HB 2082 235
the Kansas racing and gaming commission, except that the fees fixed for
these activities shall be fixed in order to recover all of the direct and
indirect expenses incurred for such investigations and related activities; (3)
DNA forensic laboratory tests and related activities; and (4) sale and
distribution of crime prevention materials: Provided further, That all fees
received for such activities shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund: And provided
further, That all moneys that are expended for any such evidence purchase,
information acquisition or similar investigatory purpose or activity from
whatever funding source and that are recovered shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund: And
provided further, That all moneys received as gifts, grants or donations for
the preparation, publication or distribution of crime prevention materials
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
general fees fund: And provided further, That expenditures from any
moneys received from the division of alcoholic beverage control and
credited to the general fees fund may be made by the Kansas bureau of
investigation for all purposes for which expenditures may be made for
operating expenditures: And provided further, That expenditures from any
moneys received from the Kansas criminal justice information system
committee and credited to the general fees fund may be made by the
Kansas bureau of investigation for all purposes for which expenditures
may be made for training activities and official hospitality.
Kansas bureau of investigation state
forfeiture fund (083-00-2283).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures made from the Kansas bureau of investigation
state forfeiture fund shall not be considered a source of revenue to meet
normal operating expenses, but for such special, additional law
enforcement purposes including direct or indirect operating expenditures
incurred for conducting educational classes and training for special agents
and other personnel, including official hospitality.
Kansas bureau of investigation motor
vehicle fund (083-00-2344).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas bureau of
investigation motor vehicle fund to acquire and sell motor vehicles for the
Kansas bureau of investigation: Provided further, That all moneys received
for sale of motor vehicles of the Kansas bureau of investigation shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the Kansas
bureau of investigation motor vehicle fund.

HB 2082 236
Criminal justice information system
line fund (083-00-2457)...............................................................No limit
Provided, That in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made from the criminal justice information system line fund
pursuant to K.S.A. 74-5707, and amendments thereto, expenditures may
be made from the criminal justice information system line fund for salaries
and wages, contractual services, commodities and capital outlay for the
maintenance and support of the Kansas criminal justice information
system.
DNA database fund (083-00-2676)...................................................No limit
Disaster grants – public assistance
federal fund (083-00-3005).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice assistance
federal fund (083-00-3057).........................................................No limit
eCitation national priority safety program –
federal fund (083-00-3092).........................................................No limit
Sexual assault kit grant –
federal fund (083-00-3146).........................................................No limit
National criminal history improvement program
federal fund (083-00-3189).........................................................No limit
Homeland security federal fund (083-00-3199)...............................No limit
Ed Byrne state/local law enforcement
federal fund (083-00-3213).........................................................No limit
Violence against women – ARRA
federal fund (083-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (083-00-3216).........................................................No limit
Project safe
neighborhoods fund (083-00-3217).............................................No limit
Public safety partnership
and community policing
federal fund (083-00-3218).........................................................No limit
Forensic DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3226).........................................................No limit
Coverdell forensic sciences improvement
federal fund (083-00-3227).........................................................No limit
AWA implementation grant program
federal fund (083-00-3228).........................................................No limit
Anti-gang initiative
federal fund (083-00-3229).........................................................No limit
Crime victim assistance
discretionary grant (083-00-3250)...............................................No limit
Substance use disorder

HB 2082 237
federal fund (083-00-3294).........................................................No limit
High intensity drug trafficking area –
federal fund (083-00-3349).........................................................No limit
Federal grants – marijuana eradication –
federal fund (083-00-3350).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial JAG – ARRA
federal fund (083-00-3455).........................................................No limit
Convicted/arrestee DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3489).........................................................No limit
Convicted offender/arrestee
DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3489).........................................................No limit
KBI-FBI reimbursement
federal fund (083-00-3506).........................................................No limit
Social security administration reimbursement –
federal fund (083-00-3560).........................................................No limit
Ncs-x grant – federal fund (083-00-3580)........................................No limit
State homeland security program
federal fund (083-00-3629).........................................................No limit
Byrne discretionary
community fund (083-00-3654)..................................................No limit
Coronavirus emergency
supplemental fund (083-00-3671)...............................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (083-00-3756).....................No limit
Federal forfeiture fund (083-00-3940)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures made from the federal forfeiture fund shall
not be considered a source of revenue to meet normal operating expenses,
but for such special, additional law enforcement purposes including direct
or indirect operating expenditures incurred for conducting educational
classes and training for special agents and other personnel, including
official hospitality.
Agency motor pool fund (083-00-6117)...........................................No limit
Intergovernmental
service fund (083-00-6119).........................................................No limit
Opioid summit fund (083-00-3602)..................................................No limit
State and community highway safety (083-00-3815).......................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the attorney general
may authorize full-time non-FTE unclassified permanent positions and
regular part-time non-FTE unclassified permanent positions for the Kansas
bureau of investigation that are paid from appropriations for the attorney
general – Kansas bureau of investigation for fiscal year 2026 made by this
act or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
which shall be in addition to the number of full-time and regular part-time

HB 2082 238
positions equated to full-time, excluding seasonal and temporary positions,
authorized for fiscal year 2026 for the attorney general – Kansas bureau of
investigation. The attorney general shall certify each such authorization for
non-FTE unclassified permanent positions for the Kansas bureau of
investigation to the director of personnel services of the department of
administration and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research and the director of the budget.
Sec. 115.
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Emergency medical services
operating fund (206-00-2326-4000)........................................$2,318,031
Provided, That the emergency medical services board is hereby authorized
to fix, charge and collect fees in order to recover costs incurred for
distributing educational videos, replacing lost educational materials and
mailing labels of those licensed by the board: Provided further, That such
fees may be fixed in order to recover all or part of such costs: And
provided further, That all moneys received from such fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the emergency
medical services operating fund: And provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6128 or 65-6129b, and
amendments thereto, or of any other statute, all moneys received by the
emergency medical services board for fees authorized by law for licensure
or the issuance of permits, or for any other regulatory duties and functions
prescribed by law in the field of emergency medical services, shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the emergency medical
services operating fund of the emergency medical services board: And
provided further, That expenditures from the emergency medical services
operating fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Education incentive grant
payment fund (206-00-2396-2510).............................................No limit
Provided, That the priority for award of education incentive grants shall be
to award such grants to rural areas.
EMS revolving fund (206-00-2449-2400)........................................No limit
Provided, That, if an organization agrees to receive money from the EMS
revolving fund, the organization shall enter into a grant agreement
requiring such organization to submit a written report to the emergency
medical services board detailing and accounting for all expenditures and

HB 2082 239
receipts related to the use of the moneys received from the EMS revolving
fund: Provided further, That the emergency medical services board shall
prepare a written report specifying and accounting for all moneys allocated
to and expended from the EMS revolving fund: And provided further, That
such report shall be submitted to the house of representatives committee
on appropriations and the senate committee on ways and means on or
before February 1, 2026.
EMS criminal history and
fingerprinting fund (206-00-2806-2806).....................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the emergency medical services board from the emergency
medical services operating fund (206-00-2326-4000) for fiscal year 2026
by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures may be made by the emergency medical services
board from the emergency medical services operating fund for fiscal year
2026 for the purpose of implementing a grant program for emergency
medical services training and educational assistance for persons in
underserved areas: Provided, That when issuing such grants, first priority
shall be given to ambulance services submitting applications seeking
grants to pay the cost of recruiting volunteers and cost of the initial courses
of training for emergency medical service providers: Provided further,
That the second priority shall be given to ambulance services submitting
applications seeking grants to pay the cost of continuing education for
emergency medical service providers: And provided further, That the third
priority shall be given to ambulance services submitting applications
seeking grants to pay the cost of education for emergency medical service
providers who are obtaining a postsecondary education degree for the
purpose of becoming instructors of emergency medical services
educational courses.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the emergency medical services board from the moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund
or funds for the emergency medical services board for fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the emergency
medical services board from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for the emergency medical
services board for fiscal year 2026 to require emergency medical services
agencies in each of the six EMS regions of the state to prepare and submit
a report of the expenditures made and moneys received in each of the EMS
regions that are related to the operation and administration of the Kansas
emergency medical services regional operations to the emergency medical
services board: Provided, That the report for each EMS region shall

HB 2082 240
specify and account for all moneys appropriated from the state treasury for
the emergency medical services board and disbursed to each such EMS
region for the operation of the education and training of emergency
medical service providers in each such EMS region.
(d) On July 1, 2025, and January 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter each
such date as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $150,000 from the emergency medical services operating
fund (206-00-2326-4000) to the educational incentive grant payment fund
(206-00-2396-2510) of the emergency medical services board.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be credited
to the emergency medical services operating fund (206-00-2326-4000)
during fiscal year 2026, and, upon a finding by the director of the budget
in consultation with the director of legislative research that the total of the
unencumbered balance and estimated receipts to be credited to the
emergency medical services operating fund during fiscal year 2026 are
insufficient to fund the budgeted expenditures and transfers from the
emergency medical services operating fund for fiscal year 2026 in
accordance with the provisions of appropriation acts, the director of the
budget shall certify such funding to the director of accounts and reports.
Upon receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer the amount of moneys from the education incentive grant
payment fund (206-00-2396-2510) to the emergency medical services
operating fund that is required, in accordance with the certification by the
director of the budget under this subsection, to fund the budgeted
expenditures and transfers from the emergency medical services operating
fund for the remainder of fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the
provisions of appropriation acts, as specified by the director of the budget
pursuant to such certification.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if any EMS regional
council enters into a grant agreement with the emergency medical services
board, such council shall be required to submit pursuant to such grant
agreement a written report detailing and accounting for all expenditures
and receipts of such council during such fiscal year. The emergency
medical services board shall prepare a written report specifying and
accounting for all moneys received by and expended by each individual
council that has reported to the emergency medical services board pursuant
to such grant agreement and submit such report to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations and the senate committee on
ways and means on or before February 1, 2026.
Sec. 116.
KANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION

HB 2082 241
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $1,427,027 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state
finance council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws
of Kansas from the state general fund in the operating expenditures
account (626-00-1000-0303), the sum of $63,873 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $10,852,184 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by state
finance council section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the substance abuse treatment
programs account (626-00-1000-0600), the sum of $3,566,287 is hereby
lapsed.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the general fees fund of the Kansas
sentencing commission for official hospitality: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the general fees fund for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,500.
Sec. 117.
KANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (626-00-1000-0303)...............................$1,443,127
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $900.
Substance abuse
treatment programs (626-00-1000-0600)..............................$11,955,627
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the substance abuse
treatment programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 21-6824, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, in addition to other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the substance abuse
treatment program account of the state general fund during fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made from such account for operating costs.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
General fees fund (626-00-2201)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the general fees fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,500.

HB 2082 242
Statistical analysis – federal fund (626-00-3600).............................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (626-00-3753).............................................No limit
Sec. 118.
KANSAS COMMISSION ON PEACE OFFICERS'
STANDARDS AND TRAINING
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the Kansas commission on peace officers' standards and
training fund (529-00-2583) of the Kansas commission on peace officers'
standards and training is hereby increased from $934,147 to $947,358.
Sec. 119.
KANSAS COMMISSION ON PEACE OFFICERS'
STANDARDS AND TRAINING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Kansas commission on
peace officers' standards and
training fund (529-00-2583)....................................................$1,071,656
Provided, That expenditures from the Kansas commission on peace
officers' standards and training fund for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
Local law enforcement training
reimbursement fund (529-00-2746).............................................No limit
Sec. 120.
STATE 911 BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
State 911 fund...................................................................................No limit
State 911 grant fund..........................................................................No limit
State 911 operations fund..................................................................No limit
Sec. 121.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (046-00-1000-0053).............................$14,501,415
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures

HB 2082 243
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures from this account for
official hospitality shall not exceed $10,000: Provided, however, That if
funding by a federal act, including, but not limited to, the farm bill is
approved for expenditures budgeted for meat and poultry inspections, then
on the effective date of such federal act, of the $14,501,415 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by this
section from the state general fund in the operating expenditures account,
the sum of $350,000 is hereby lapsed.
Agency legal services (046-00-1000-0300)......................................$50,000
Animal facilities inspection program
emergency animal shelter (046-00-1000-0065)...........................$50,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
animal facilities inspection program emergency animal shelter account in
an amount of at least $25,000 to spay or neuter animals located at such
shelter.
Local farm to food program (046-00-1000-0300)...........................$900,000
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Meat and poultry inspection
fee fund (046-00-2004-0700)......................................................No limit
Entomology fee fund (046-00-2006-0900).......................................No limit
Livestock market brand inspection
fee fund (046-00-2007-2010)......................................................No limit
Veterinary inspection fee fund (046-00-2009-2020)........................No limit
Livestock brand fee fund (046-00-2011-2030).................................No limit
Grain commodity commission
services fund (046-00-2018-1070)..............................................No limit
Water structures fund (046-00-2037-1075)......................................No limit
Water structures – state
highway fund (046-00-2043-1080).............................................No limit
Kansas agricultural
remediation fund (046-00-2095-1090)........................................No limit
Dairy fee fund (046-00-2105-1015).................................................No limit
Water resources cost fund (046-00-2110-1020)................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the secretary of agriculture from
any governmental or nongovernmental source to implement the provisions
of the Kansas water banking act, K.S.A. 82a-761 through 82a-773, and
amendments thereto, which are hereby authorized to be applied for and
received, shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the

HB 2082 244
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the water resources cost fund.
Soil amendment fee fund (046-00-2117-1100).................................No limit
Agricultural liming materials
fee fund (046-00-2118-1200).......................................................No limit
Weights and measures fee fund (046-00-2165-1500).......................No limit
Water appropriation
certification fund (046-00-2168-1600)........................................No limit
Agriculture seed fee fund (046-00-2187-2720)................................No limit
Chemigation fee fund (046-00-2194-1800)......................................No limit
Animal disease control fund (046-00-2202-2500)............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the animal disease control fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $450.
Animal dealers fee fund (046-00-2207-2050)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the animal dealers fee fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $300: Provided further, That expenditures shall
be made from the animal dealers fee fund by the livestock commissioner
for operating expenditures for an educational course regarding animals and
their care and treatment as authorized by K.S.A. 47-1707, and
amendments thereto, to be provided through the internet or printed
booklets.
Plant pest emergency
response fund (046-00-2210-1805).............................................No limit
Water transfer hearing fund (046-00-2278-1900).............................No limit
Publications fee fund (046-00-2322-2000).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the publications fee fund
for operating expenditures related to preparation and publication of
informational or educational materials related to the programs or functions
of the Kansas department of agriculture: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-1005, and amendments
thereto, to the contrary, the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to
enter into a contract with a commercial publisher for the printing,
distribution and sale of such materials: And provided further, That the
secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to collect fees from such
commercial publisher pursuant to contract with the publisher for the sale
of such materials: And provided further, That the secretary of agriculture is
hereby authorized to receive and accept grants, gifts, donations or funds
from any non-federal source for the printing, publication and distribution
of such materials: And provided further, That all moneys received from
such fees or for such grants, gifts, donations or other funds received for
such purpose shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the publications fee fund.

HB 2082 245
Market development fund (046-00-2331-2351)...............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the market development
fund for official hospitality: Provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the market development fund for loans pursuant to loan
agreements, which are hereby authorized to be entered into by the
secretary of agriculture: And provided further, That all moneys received by
the department of agriculture for repayment of loans made under the
agricultural value added center program shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the market development
fund.
Trademark fund (046-00-2333-2360)...............................................No limit
Commercial industrial hemp act licensing
fee fund (046-00-2343-2343)......................................................No limit
General fees fund (046-00-2346-2100)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
operating expenditures for the regulatory programs of the Kansas
department of agriculture and for official hospitality: Provided further,
That the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or
amounts specified by the secretary of agriculture from any special revenue
fund or funds of the department of agriculture that have available moneys
to the general fees fund: And provided further, That the director of
accounts and reports shall transmit a copy of such transfer request to the
director of legislative research.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (046-00-2402-2200)..........................................No limit
Lodging fee fund (046-00-2456-2400).............................................No limit
Buffer participation
incentive fund (046-00-2517-2510).............................................No limit
Land reclamation fee fund (046-00-2542-2090)..............................No limit
Petroleum inspection
fee fund (046-00-2550-2550)......................................................No limit
U.S. geological survey
cooperative gauge agreement
grants fund (046-00-2629-2800).................................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to enter
into a cooperative gauge agreement with the United States geological
survey: Provided further, That all moneys collected for the construction or
operation of river water intake gauges shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the U.S. geological survey
cooperative gauge agreement grants fund: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund to pay the costs incurred in the

HB 2082 246
construction or operation of river water intake gauges.
Laboratory equipment fund (046-00-2710-2700).............................No limit
Arkansas river gaging fund (046-00-2751-2751).............................No limit
Laboratory testing services
fee fund (046-00-2752-2752)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the laboratory testing
services fee fund for administrative operating expenditures of the
agriculture laboratory of the Kansas department of agriculture: Provided
further, That the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount
or amounts specified by the secretary of agriculture from any special
revenue fund or funds of the department of agriculture that have available
moneys to the laboratory testing services fee fund: And provided further,
That the director of accounts and reports shall transmit a copy of such
transfer request to the director of legislative research.
Compliance education fee fund (046-00-2757-2757).......................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the compliance education fee fund
shall be for the purposes of compliance education: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of any statute to the contrary, during fiscal
year 2026, the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to remit and
designate amounts of moneys collected for civil fines and penalties by the
department of agriculture to the state treasurer for deposit in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, to the credit of the compliance education fee fund:
And provided further, That, upon receipt of each such remittance and
designation, the state treasurer shall credit the entire amount of such
remittance to the compliance education fee fund.
Conference registration and
disbursement fund (046-00-2772-2101)......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the conference registration
and disbursement fund for official hospitality.
Reimbursement and
recovery fund (046-00-2773-2294).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the reimbursement and
recovery fund for official hospitality.
Agricultural chemical
fee fund (046-00-2800-2900)......................................................No limit
Feeding stuffs
fee fund (046-00-2801-4000)......................................................No limit
Fertilizer fee fund (046-00-2802-4100)............................................No limit
Pesticide use fee fund (046-00-2804-4300)......................................No limit
Egg fee fund (046-00-2808-4600)....................................................No limit
Warehouse fee fund (046-00-2809-4700).........................................No limit
Food safety fee fund (046-00-2813-4805)........................................No limit

HB 2082 247
Pesticide disposal fund (046-00-2831-2831)....................................No limit
Water structures emergency
fund (046-00-2868-2868)............................................................No limit
Meat and poultry inspection
fund – federal (046-00-3013-3100).............................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.932 fund (046-00-3022-3903)................................................No limit
Water structures NRCS
LIDAR grant (046-00-3081-3081)..............................................No limit
Market protection/
promotion fund (046-00-3104-3315)...........................................No limit
Homeland security grant –
federal fund (046-00-3199-3436)................................................No limit
Cooperating technical partners –
federal fund (046-00-3203-3213)................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA 10.931 fund (046-00-3228-3220).....................No limit
EPA pesticide performance partnership grant –
federal fund (046-00-3295-3290)................................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (046-00-3360)..........................................................No limit
FEMA dam safety –
federal fund (046-00-3362-3353)................................................No limit
USDA Kansas forestry service –
federal fund (046-00-3426-3380)................................................No limit
Ag stats report fund (046-00-3427-3390).........................................No limit
National floodplain insurance assistance (CAP) –
federal fund (046-00-3445-3330)................................................No limit
Food/drug administration/research (046-00-3462)...........................No limit
Specialty crop block grant fund (046-00-3463-3300)......................No limit
Local food purchase agreement –
federal fund (046-00-3662-3662)................................................No limit
HRTLND RGNL FD
BUSN CNTR fund (046-00-3667-3667).....................................No limit
Watershed protect approach/WTR
RSRCE MGT fund (046-00-3889)..............................................No limit
NRCS stream bank water quality –
federal fund (046-00-3917).........................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.069 fund (046-00-3952-3901)................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.924 fund (046-00-3953-3902)................................................No limit
Flx fnding mdl coop
agrmt fund (046-00-3954-3905)..................................................No limit

HB 2082 248
NRCS grant CFDA
10.912 fund (046-00-3955-3904)................................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (046-00-7305-7000).................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to receive
gifts and donations of resources and money for services for the benefit and
support of agriculture and purposes related thereto: Provided further, That
such gifts and donations of money shall be deposited in the state treasury
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the gifts and donations fund.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the water plan
project or projects specified, the following:
Kansas water quality
buffer initiatives (046-00-1800-1250)...................................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas water quality
buffer initiatives account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the Kansas water quality buffer initiatives account shall be for grants
or incentives to install water quality best management practices: And
provided further, That such expenditures may be made from this account
from the approved budget amount for fiscal year 2026 in accordance with
contracts, which are hereby authorized to be entered into by the secretary
of agriculture, for such grants or incentives.
Water quality................................................................................$2,025,425
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nonpoint source
pollution assistance (046-00-1800-1210) and riparian and wetland program
(046-00-1800-1260) accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the water quality account for fiscal year 2026.
Water quantity/aquifer................................................................$17,852,617
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the interstate water issues
(046-00-1800-0070); water use (046-00-1800-0075); basin management
(046-00-1800-0080); irrigation technology (046-00-1800-0088); water
resources cost share (046-00-1800-1205); conservation district aid (046-
00-1800-1220); and Kansas conservation reserve enhancement program
fund (046-00-1800-1225) accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated to the water quantity/aquifer account for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That the initial allocation for grants to
conservation districts for fiscal year 2026 shall be made on a priority basis,
as determined by the secretary of agriculture and the provisions of the state
water plan: And provided further, That expenditures from this account for
contractual technical expertise or non-salary administration expenditures
for the division of conservation of the Kansas department of agriculture
shall not exceed the amount equal to 6.0% of the budget amount for fiscal

HB 2082 249
year 2026 for the water resources cost share account.
Reservoir......................................................................................$4,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the streambank stabilization
projects (046-00-1800-1290) and Kansas reservoir protection initiative
administration (046-00-1800-1300) accounts in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the reservoir account for fiscal year
2026.
Research and education................................................................$2,850,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the crop and livestock
research (046-00-1800-0089) and the soil health initiative (046-00-1800-
0090) accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated to the research and education account for fiscal year 2026.
Resiliency.....................................................................................$5,650,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the watershed dam
construction (046-00-1800-1240) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated to the resiliency account for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That expenditures from the resiliency account are
hereby authorized for engineering contracts for watershed planning as
determined by the secretary of agriculture.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
agriculture, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
water plan fund for the Kansas department of agriculture to another item
of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas department of agriculture: Provided, That the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of legislative research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
agriculture, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
water plan fund for the Kansas department of agriculture to any item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas water office, university of Kansas, Kansas department of wildlife
and parks or the department of health and environment – division of
environment: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water office shall
certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(f) On July 1, 2025, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416,
and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $128,379 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) of the department of transportation to the water structures – state

HB 2082 250
highway fund (046-00-2043-1080) of the Kansas department of
agriculture.
(g) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
Agriculture marketing
program (046-00-1900-1110)..................................................$1,054,361
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the agriculture marketing
program account for loans pursuant to loan agreements, which are hereby
authorized to be entered into by the secretary of agriculture in accordance
with repayment provisions and other terms and conditions as may be
prescribed by the secretary of agriculture therefor under the agricultural
value added center program.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 82a-767, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute concerning the length of time for
conducting water bank evaluations, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the department of agriculture from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue
fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the department of agriculture
from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the chief engineer, in
consultation with the director of the Kansas water office, to develop a
request for proposal and select an independent consultant to conduct the
evaluation, as described in K.S.A. 82a-767, and amendments thereto, of
the operations of the central Kansas water bank: Provided, That such
evaluation shall include specific findings regarding the consumptive use
and potential impairment impacts involved with the use of safe deposit
accounts in the Rattlesnake Creek hydrologic unit: Provided further, That
the results of such evaluation shall be submitted to the house of
representatives committee on water and the senate committee on
agriculture and natural resources on or before January 12, 2026.
Sec. 122.
STATE FAIR BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (373-00-1000-0103)..................................$135,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or

HB 2082 251
funds, except that expenditures, other than refunds authorized by law and
remittances of sales tax to the department of revenue, shall not exceed the
following:
State fair fee fund (373-00-5182-5100)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state fair fee fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $10,000.
State fair debt service special
revenue fund (373-00-2267-2200)...............................................No limit
State fair special cash fund (373-00-9088-9000)..............................No limit
Sec. 123.
KANSAS WATER OFFICE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Water resources operating
expenditures (709-00-1000-0303)...........................................$1,407,987
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water resources
operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,500.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (709-00-2022)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund for
operating expenditures for the Kansas water office, including training and
informational programs and official hospitality: Provided further, That the
director of the Kansas water office is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for such programs: And provided further, That fees for such
programs shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating
expenses incurred for such programs, including official hospitality: And
provided further, That all fees received for such programs and all fees
received for providing access to or for furnishing copies of public records
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
general fees fund.
Lower Smoky Hill water supply
access fund (709-00-2203-2203).................................................No limit
Water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100)......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the water marketing fund
for the purchase of vessel liability insurance.
Indirect cost fund (709-00-2419-2419).............................................No limit

HB 2082 252
State conservation storage water
supply fund (709-00-2502-2600).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
State conservation storage water supply fund for acquisition of storage or
to complete studies or take actions necessary to ensure reservoir storage
sustainability, subject to the availability of moneys credited to the state
conservation storage water supply fund.
Local water project
match fund (709-00-2620-3200).................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received from local government entities and
instrumentalities to be used to match funds for water projects shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the local water
project match fund: Provided further, That all moneys credited to this fund
shall be used to match state funds or federal funds, or both, for water
projects.
Water supply storage
assurance fund (709-00-2631).....................................................No limit
Provided, That no additional water supply storage space shall be purchased
in Milford, Perry, Big Hill or Hillsdale reservoirs during fiscal year 2026
unless a contract is entered into under the state water plan storage act,
K.S.A. 82a-1301 et seq., and amendments thereto, to supply water to users
that is not held under contract in such reservoirs.
Republican river water conservation projects –
Nebraska moneys fund (709-00-2690-2640)...............................No limit
Republican river water conservation projects –
Colorado moneys fund (709-00-2691-2680)...............................No limit
South fork Republican river water conservation
projects fund (709-00-2824-2824)...............................................No limit
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above
agency shall pay an amount equal to the amount certified pursuant to
subsection (k) from the south fork Republican river water conservation
projects fund as a grant pursuant to the grant agreement entered into by the
Kansas water office and the Cheyenne county conservation district:
Provided further, That in accordance with the grant agreement, such
moneys shall be used exclusively for the purposes of paying all or a
portion of the costs of the projects specified in K.S.A. 82a-1804(g), and
amendments thereto, in the area lying in the south fork of the upper
Republican river basin in northwest Kansas in all or parts of Cheyenne and
Sherman counties: And provided further, That in accordance with the grant
agreement, all expenditures of such moneys shall be approved by the
Cheyenne county conservation district and the Kansas water office: And
provided further, That, in accordance with the grant agreement, such

HB 2082 253
moneys shall be administered by the Cheyenne county conservation
district and any interest earned on such moneys shall be used for the
purposes prescribed by this subsection: And provided further, That in
accordance with the grant agreement, all expenditures and the status of
new projects approved by the Cheyenne county conservation district shall
be reported not later than November 1, 2026, to the Kansas water office.
Water projects grant fund (709-00-2881-2881)................................No limit
Water technical assistance fund (709-00-2875-2875).......................No limit
Equipment leasing
fee fund (709-00-2892-2892)......................................................No limit
Milford RCPP federal fund (709-00-3022-3022).............................No limit
Multipurpose grant fund (709-00-3103-3103)..................................No limit
Emergency management performance
grant fund (709-00-3342-3342)...................................................No limit
HHPD rehabilitation
grant fund (709-00-3362-3362)...................................................No limit
Water reclamation and reuse
grant fund (709-00-3731-3731)...................................................No limit
EPA wetland development
grant fund (709-00-3914)............................................................No limit
Motor pool vehicle
replacement fund (709-00-6120-6100)........................................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state water plan
project or projects specified, the following:
Kansas reservoir protection
initiative (709-00-1800-1286)...............................................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas reservoir
protection initiative account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Equus beds chloride plume
remediation project (709-00-1800-1287)..............................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the equus beds chloride
plume remediation project account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Flood response study (709-00-1800-1288)................................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the flood response study
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Water injection dredging (709-00-1800-1290)...........................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water injection dredging
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 254
Water quality................................................................................$1,464,890
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water quality
partnerships (709-00-1800-1280) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated to the water quality account for fiscal year
2026.
Water quantity/aquifer..................................................................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the high plains aquifer
partnerships (709-00-1800-1282) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated to the water quantity/aquifer account for
fiscal year 2026.
Reservoir......................................................................................$4,477,419
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the MOU – storage
operations and maintenance (709-00-1800-1150) and stream gaging (709-
00-1800-1190) accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated to the reservoir account for fiscal year 2026.
Research and education................................................................$3,341,255
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the assessment and
evaluation (709-00-1800-1110), reservoir and water quality research (709-
00-1800-1275), Kansas water plan education and outreach strategy (709-
00-1800-1281) and Arbuckle study (709-00-1800-1289) accounts in excess
of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the research and
education account for fiscal year 2026.
Resiliency.....................................................................................$5,100,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water planning and
project development (709-00-1800), conservation assistance for water
users (709-00-1800-1200), and HB 2302 projects (709-00-1800-1300)
accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to
the resiliency account for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from the resiliency account are hereby authorized for
engineering contracts for watershed planning as determined by the
secretary of agriculture.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the Kansas water office to another item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas water office: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water office
shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the

HB 2082 255
state water plan fund for the Kansas water office to any item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas department of agriculture, university of Kansas, Kansas
department of wildlife and parks or the department of health and
environment – division of environment: Provided, That the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of legislative research.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if it appears that the
resources are insufficient to meet in full the estimated expenditures as they
become due to meet the financial obligations imposed by law on the water
marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the Kansas water office as a result
of a cash flow shortfall, the pooled money investment board is authorized
and directed to loan to the director of the Kansas water office a sufficient
amount or amounts of moneys to maintain the cash flow of the water
marketing fund upon approval of each such loan by the state finance
council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto. No such loan shall be made unless
the terms have been approved by the director of the budget. A copy of the
terms of each such loan shall be submitted to the director of legislative
research. The pooled money investment board is authorized and directed to
use any moneys in the operating accounts, investment accounts or other
investments of the state of Kansas to provide the funds for each such loan.
Each such loan shall be repaid without interest within one year from the
date of the loan.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if it appears that the
resources are insufficient to meet in full the estimated expenditures as they
become due to meet the financial obligations imposed by law on the water
marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the Kansas water office as a result
of increases in water rates, fees or charges imposed by the federal
government, the pooled money investment board is authorized and
directed to loan to the director of the Kansas water office a sufficient
amount or amounts of moneys to reimburse the water marketing fund for
increases in water rates, fees or charges imposed by the federal
government and to allow the Kansas water office to spread such increases
to consumers over a longer period, except that no such loan shall be made
unless the terms thereof have been approved by the state finance council
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto. The pooled money investment
board is authorized and directed to use any moneys in the operating
accounts, investment accounts or other investments of the state of Kansas

HB 2082 256
to provide the funds for each such loan. Each such loan shall bear interest
at a rate equal to the net earnings rate for the pooled money investment
portfolio at the time of the making of such loan. Such loan shall not be
deemed to be an indebtedness or debt of the state of Kansas within the
meaning of section 6 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas.
Upon certification to the pooled money investment board by the director of
the Kansas water office of the amount of each loan authorized pursuant to
this subsection, the pooled money investment board shall transfer each
such amount certified by the director of the Kansas water office from the
state bank account or accounts to the water marketing fund of the Kansas
water office. The principal and interest of each loan authorized pursuant to
this subsection shall be repaid in payments payable at least annually for a
period of not more than five years.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by the
director of the Kansas water office prior to April 1, 2026, from the water
marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) to the state general fund, in
accordance with the provisions of the state water plan storage act, K.S.A.
82a-1301 et seq., and amendments thereto, and rules and regulations
adopted thereunder, for the purposes of making repayments to the state
general fund for moneys advanced for annual capital cost payments for
water supply storage space in reservoirs.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the Kansas water
office from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the Kansas water office from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026 to provide for the Kansas water office to lead database coordination
of water quality and quantity data for all state water agencies and
cooperating federal agencies to facilitate policy-making and such other
matters relating thereto.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify to the director of accounts and reports the
amount of moneys expended by the Kansas department of agriculture from
the state general fund that is attributable to the administration of the state
water plan storage act, K.S.A. 82a-1301 et seq., and amendments thereto,
or the water assurance program act, K.S.A. 82a-1330 et seq., and
amendments thereto: Provided, That upon receipt of such certification, or
as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer the amount certified from the water marketing fund
(709-00-2255-2100) of the Kansas water office to the state general fund:

HB 2082 257
Provided further, That the director of the Kansas water office shall transmit
a copy of each such certification to the director of the budget and the
director of legislative research.
(k) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify the amount of moneys in the Republican
river water conservation projects – Colorado moneys fund and shall
transmit such certification, along with the amount to be transferred, to the
director of accounts and reports. Upon receipt of such certification, or as
soon thereafter as moneys are available, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer the amount specified by the director of the Kansas
water office from the Republican river water conservation projects –
Colorado moneys fund to the south fork Republican river water
conservation projects fund: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water
office shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of the
budget and to the director of legislative research.
(l) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer moneys from the water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the
Kansas water office to the state conservation storage water supply fund
(709-00-2502-2600) of the Kansas water office: Provided, That the
director of the Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer of
moneys to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of
each such certification to the director of legislative research.
Sec. 124.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $36,342 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
economic development initiatives fund in the reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to national guard members account (710-00-1900-1930),
the sum of $67,649 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $17,922 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
economic development initiatives fund in the reimbursement for annual
park permits issued to national guard members account (710-00-1900-
1940), the sum of $35,802 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $69,627 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
economic development initiatives fund in the reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans account (710-00-1900-1950),

HB 2082 258
the sum of $94,497 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 140(c) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the boating fee fund
(710-00-2245-2813) of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks is
hereby increased from $1,164,788 to $1,491,763.
(e) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 140(c) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the department access
roads fund (710-00-2178-2761) of the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks is hereby increased from $2,084,033 to $2,466,529.
(f) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(f) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the parks fee fund (710-
00-2122-2066) of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks is hereby
increased from $1,260,000 to $1,448,037.
(g) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(h) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the wildlife fee fund
(710-00-2300-3262) of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks is
hereby increased from $1,290,834 to $1,869,594.
(h) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(i) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the cabin revenue fund
(710-00-2668-2660) of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks is
hereby increased from $700,046 to $1,937,500.
Sec. 125.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Water quality (710-00-1800)...........................................................$224,457
Any unencumbered balance in the stream monitoring account (710-00-
1800-1801) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (710-00-1900-1910)...............................$2,042,484
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating expenditures
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from this account
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,500: Provided further, That, in

HB 2082 259
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the operating expenditures account for fiscal year
2026, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the operating
expenditures account for fiscal year 2026 to include a provision on the
calendar year 2026 applications for hunting licenses, fishing licenses and
annual park permits for the applicant to make a voluntary contribution of
$2 or more to support the annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled
veterans, annual licenses issued to Kansas national guard members, and
annual park permits issued to Kansas national guard members: And
provided further, That all moneys received as voluntary contributions to
support the annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans, annual
licenses issued to Kansas national guard members, and annual park
permits issued to Kansas national guard members shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, to the credit of the free licenses and permits fund.
State parks operating
expenditures (710-00-1900-1920)...........................................$2,398,359
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state parks operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to national
guard members (710-00-1900-1930)...........................................$36,342
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual licenses issued to national guard members account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for annual licenses
issued to national guard members account shall be expended to pay the
wildlife fee fund for the cost of fees for annual hunting and annual fishing
licenses issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas army or air national
guard members, which licenses are hereby authorized to be issued without
charge to such members in accordance with policies and procedures
prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and parks therefor and subject to the
limitation of the moneys appropriated and available in the reimbursement
for annual licenses issued to national guard members account to pay the
wildlife fee fund for such licenses.
Reimbursement for annual
park permits issued to national
guard members (710-00-1900-1940)...........................................$17,922
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual park permits issued to national guard members account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for annual park

HB 2082 260
permits issued to national guard members account shall be expended to
pay the parks fee fund for the cost of fees for annual park vehicle permits
issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas army or air national guard
members, which annual park vehicle permits are hereby authorized to be
issued without charge to such members in accordance with policies and
procedures prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and parks therefor and
subject to the limitation of the moneys appropriated and available in the
reimbursement for annual park permits issued to national guard members
account to pay the parks fee fund for such permits: Provided further, That
not more than one annual park vehicle permit per family shall be eligible
to be paid from this account.
Reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to Kansas
disabled veterans (710-00-1900-1950)........................................$69,627
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for annual licenses
issued to Kansas disabled veterans account shall be expended to pay the
wildlife fee fund for the cost of fees for annual hunting and annual fishing
licenses issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas disabled veterans,
which licenses are hereby authorized to be issued without charge to such
veterans in accordance with policies and procedures prescribed by the
secretary of wildlife and parks therefor and subject to the limitation of the
moneys appropriated and available in the reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans account to pay the wildlife fee
fund for such licenses: Provided, however, That to qualify for such license
without charge, the resident disabled veteran shall have been separated
from the armed services under honorable conditions, have a disability
certified by the Kansas office of veterans services as being service
connected and such service-connected disability is equal to or greater than
30%: And provided further, That no other hunting or fishing licenses or
permits shall be eligible to be paid from this account.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Prairie spirit rails-to-trails
fee fund (710-00-2025)................................................................No limit
Bridge maintenance fund (710-00-2045)..........................................No limit
State agricultural
production fund (710-00-2050)...................................................No limit

HB 2082 261
Nonfederal grants fund (710-00-2063).............................................No limit
Wildlife and parks
nonrestricted fund (710-00-2065)................................................No limit
Development and
promotions fund (710-00-2097)..................................................No limit
Wildlife conservation
fund (710-00-2100)......................................................................No limit
Parks fee fund (710-00-2122-2053)...........................................$12,673,223
Provided, That expenditures from the boating fee fund for state operations
shall not exceed $1,578,866: Provided further, That additional
expenditures may be made from the parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of compensating federal aid program expenditures, if
necessary, in order to comply with requirements established by the United
States fish and wildlife service for the utilization of federal aid funds: And
provided further, That all such expenditures shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed upon the parks fee fund for fiscal year
2026: And provided further, That the secretary of wildlife and parks shall
report all such expenditures to the governor and the legislature as
appropriate.
Parks restitution fund (710-00-2156)................................................No limit
Fish and wildlife
restitution fund (710-00-2166)....................................................No limit
Department access
roads fund (710-00-2178-2761)..............................................$2,501,078
Boating fee fund (710-00-2245-2813)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the boating fee fund for state operations
shall not exceed $1,578,866: Provided further, That additional
expenditures may be made from the boating fee fund for fiscal year 2026
for the purposes of compensating federal aid program expenditures, if
necessary, in order to comply with requirements established by the United
States fish and wildlife service for the utilization of federal aid funds: And
provided further, That all such expenditures shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed upon the boating fee fund for fiscal year
2026: And provided further, That the secretary of wildlife and parks shall
report all such expenditures to the governor and the legislature as
appropriate.
Office of the secretary building fund (710-00-2253)........................No limit
Wildlife fee fund (710-00-2300-2890).......................................$36,484,671
Provided, That additional expenditures may be made from the wildlife fee
fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of compensating federal aid
program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with requirements
established by the United States fish and wildlife service for the utilization
of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such expenditures shall be

HB 2082 262
in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed upon the wildlife fee
fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That the secretary of
wildlife and parks shall report all such expenditures to the governor and
the legislature as appropriate: And provided further, That expenditures
from the wildlife fee fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $4,000.
Publication and other
sales fund (710-00-2399).............................................................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made from such fund for the purpose of compensating federal aid program
expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with the requirements
established by the United States fish and wildlife service for utilization of
federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such expenditures shall be in
addition to any expenditures made from the publication and other sales
fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That the secretary of
wildlife and parks shall report all such expenditures to the governor and
legislature as appropriate.
Free licenses and
permits fund (710-00-2493).........................................................No limit
Nongame wildlife
improvement fund (710-00-2593)...............................................No limit
Wetlands acquisition fund (710-00-2600)........................................No limit
Feed the hungry fund (710-00-2642)................................................No limit
Cabin revenue fund (710-00-2668)...................................................No limit
Federally licensed wildlife
areas fund (710-00-2670)............................................................No limit
Disaster grants – public
assistance fund (710-00-3005).....................................................No limit
Wetlands reserve
program fund (710-00-3007).......................................................No limit
Adaptive science fund (710-00-3015)..............................................No limit
Soil/water
conservation fund (710-00-3083)................................................No limit
Energy efficiency/conservation block
grant fund (710-00-3157)............................................................No limit
Navigation projects fund (710-00-3191)..........................................No limit
Recreation resource
management fund (710-00-3197)................................................No limit
Cooperative endangered species
conservation fund (710-00-3198)................................................No limit
Landowner incentive
program fund (710-00-3200).......................................................No limit

HB 2082 263
State wildlife grants fund (710-00-3204)..........................................No limit
Endangered species –
recovery fund (710-00-3209).......................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest
partnership fund (710-00-3216)...................................................No limit
Enforce underage drinking
law fund (710-00-3219)...............................................................No limit
Recreational trails
program fund (710-00-3238).......................................................No limit
Boating safety financial
assistance fund (710-00-3251).....................................................No limit
Highway planning/
construction fund (710-00-3333).................................................No limit
Plant and animal disease and pest
control fund (710-00-3360).........................................................No limit
Americorps – ARRA fund (710-00-3404)........................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance fund (710-00-3415)......................No limit
Wildlife restoration fund (710-00-3418)...........................................No limit
Cooperative forestry
assistance fund (710-00-3426).....................................................No limit
North America wetland
conservation fund (710-00-3453)................................................No limit
Wildlife services fund (710-00-3485)...............................................No limit
Sport fish restoration fund (710-00-3490)........................................No limit
Fish/wildlife management
assistance fund (710-00-3495).....................................................No limit
Migratory bird monitoring (710-00-3504)........................................No limit
Fish/wildlife core act fund (710-00-3513)........................................No limit
Voluntary public access (710-00-3557)............................................No limit
Law enforcement agency support fund (710-00-3652)....................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (710-00-3756)............................................................No limit
Outdoor recreation
acquisition, development and
planning fund (710-00-3794).......................................................No limit
FHT RAISE grant federal fund (710-00-3902)................................No limit
White-nose syndrome
response (710-00-3904)...............................................................No limit
Watershed protection/flood
prevention fund (710-00-3906)...................................................No limit
Enhanced hunter education
program (710-00-3929)...............................................................No limit
Central aircraft fund (710-00-6145).................................................No limit

HB 2082 264
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
central aircraft fund for aircraft operating expenditures, for aircraft
maintenance and repair, to provide aircraft services to other state agencies
and for the purchase of state aircraft insurance: Provided further, That the
secretary of wildlife and parks is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for the provision of aircraft services to other state agencies:
And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed to recover all or part of
the operating expenditures incurred in providing such services: And
provided further, That all fees received for such services shall be credited
to the central aircraft fund.
Department of wildlife
and parks private gifts and
donations fund (710-00-7335).....................................................No limit
Employee maintenance deduction
clearing fund (710-00-9120)........................................................No limit
Suspense fund (710-00-9159)...........................................................No limit
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026, from which expenditures may be made for salaries and
wages, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from such moneys appropriated from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026, from which expenditures may be made for salaries and
wages, for progression within the existing pay structure for natural
resource officers of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks:
Provided, however, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-
2935, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the secretary of
wildlife and parks shall not require such officer to transfer into the
unclassified service in order to progress within the existing pay structure
pursuant to this subsection.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 32-9,100, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the Kansas
department of wildlife and parks from moneys appropriated from the
wildlife fee fund (710-00-2300-2880) of the Kansas department of wildlife
and parks for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from such moneys during
fiscal year 2026 to issue senior lifetime hunting and fishing licenses to
Kansas resident disabled veterans who are 65 years of age or older:
Provided, That such licenses are hereby authorized to be issued without
charge to such veterans in accordance with policies and procedures

HB 2082 265
prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and parks: Provided further, That, to
qualify for such license without charge, the resident disabled veteran shall
have been separated from the armed services under honorable conditions
and have a disability certified by the Kansas office of veterans services as
being service-related and such service-connected disability is equal to or
greater than 30%.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
wildlife and parks, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the Kansas department of wildlife and parks to
any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan
fund for the Kansas water office, Kansas department of agriculture,
university of Kansas or the department of health and environment –
division of environment: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water
office shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director
of legislative research.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
wildlife and parks, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the
state water plan fund for the Kansas department of wildlife and parks to
another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan
fund for the Kansas department of wildlife and parks: Provided, That the
director of the Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
Sec. 126.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(a) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as moneys
are available, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $300,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) of the department of transportation to the driver's education
scholarship grant fund (276-00-2851-2851) of the department of
transportation.
Sec. 127.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rail service
improvement fund (276-00-2008-2100)......................................No limit

HB 2082 266
Seat belt safety fund (276-00-2216-2216)........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (276-00-2256-2256)..........................................No limit
Interagency motor vehicle fuel
sales fund (276-00-2298-2400)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the interagency motor
vehicle fuel sales fund to provide and sell motor vehicle fuel to other state
agencies: Provided further, That the secretary of transportation is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for motor vehicle fuel sold to
other state agencies: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in
order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred in providing motor
vehicle fuel to other state agencies: And provided further, That all fees
received for such sales of motor vehicle fuel shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the interagency motor vehicle
fuel sales fund.
Traffic records
enhancement fund (276-00-2356-2000)......................................No limit
Coordinated public transportation
assistance fund (276-00-2572-0300)...........................................No limit
Highway special
permits fund (276-00-2576-2576).........................................................$0
Transportation technology
development fund (276-00-2835-2835).......................................No limit
Broadband infrastructure construction
grant fund (276-00-2836-2836)...................................................No limit
Short line rail improvement fund (276-00-2837-2837)....................No limit
Driver's education scholarship
grant fund (276-00-2851-2851)...................................................No limit
Other federal grants fund (276-00-3122-3100)................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (276-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
State highway fund (276-00-4100-4100)..........................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures may be made from the state highway fund
other than for the purposes specifically authorized by this or other
appropriation act.
Highway bond
proceeds fund (276-00-4109-4110).............................................No limit
Public use general aviation airport
development fund (276-00-4140-4140).......................................No limit
County equalization and
adjustment fund (276-00-4210-4210).....................................$2,500,000
Special city and county

HB 2082 267
highway fund (276-00-4220-4220).............................................No limit
Highway bond debt
service fund (276-00-4707-9000)................................................No limit
Rail service assistance program loan
guarantee fund (276-00-7502-7200)............................................No limit
Railroad rehabilitation loan
guarantee fund (276-00-7503-7500)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the railroad rehabilitation loan guarantee
fund shall not exceed the amount that the secretary of transportation is
obligated to pay during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in satisfaction
of liabilities arising from the unconditional guarantee of payment that was
entered into by the secretary of transportation in connection with the mid-
states port authority federally taxable revenue refunding bonds, series
1994, dated May 1, 1994, authorized by K.S.A. 12-3420, and amendments
thereto, and guaranteed pursuant to K.S.A. 75-5031, and amendments
thereto.
Transportation
revolving fund (276-00-7511-1000)............................................No limit
Communication system
revolving fund (276-00-7524-7700)............................................No limit
Kansas intermodal transportation
revolving fund (276-00-7552-7551)............................................No limit
Passenger rail service
revolving fund (276-00-7555-7555)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5089, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the passenger rail service revolving fund during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to make loans or grants for the costs of
qualifying projects and operating support for Amtrak or any common rail
carrier approved by the federal railroad administration for operation of an
intercity passenger rail service program to connect Kansas by rail to other
member states of the midwest interstate passenger rail commission, the
midwest regional rail system, the national passenger rail network and any
other passenger rail service operations serving Kansas: Provided, however,
That no expenditures shall be made from this fund for loans or grants until
such loans or grants have been approved by the state finance council
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval also may
be given while the legislature is in session.
Kansas air service development
incentive program fund (276-00-2894-2894).............................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the Kansas air service development

HB 2082 268
incentive program fund shall be to support commercial service airports in
Kansas: Provided further, That the Kansas department of transportation
shall establish requirements for the program, taking into consideration: (1)
Recent or imminent regional economic development opportunities,
including, but not limited to, new business entering the market area or
business growth in the market area; (2) viable air service opportunities,
including, but not limited to, airline support service or market data support
service; (3) air service routes serving a market area that meets the needs of
such economic development opportunities, including, but not limited to,
routes establishing a pipeline to areas with workforce talent or serving a
customer base or main business function; and (4) local match
requirements, including, but not limited to, opportunities to use state or
local moneys to leverage federal air service development grant funds: And
provided further, That local entities representing commercial service
airports may apply for grants from such fund: And provided further, That
the Kansas department of transportation shall form a selection committee
to evaluate such applications: And provided further, That not more than
$1,000,000 shall be awarded for a single commercial service airport: And
provided further, That all grant moneys awarded to a local entity shall be
deposited in an interest-bearing escrow account: And provided further,
That, when awarded a grant, such local entity shall execute a minimum
revenue guarantee (MRG) agreement with an airline: And provided further,
That such MRG agreement shall describe the thresholds that trigger
drawdowns of grant moneys: And provided further, That the Kansas
department of transportation shall verify all expenses before authorizing
any drawdown of grant moneys from such escrow account.
(b) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100)
for the following specified purposes: Provided, That expenditures from the
state highway fund for fiscal year 2026, other than refunds authorized by
law for the following specified purposes, shall not exceed the limitations
prescribed therefor as follows:
Agency operations (276-00-4100-0403)..................................$348,012,564
Provided, That expenditures from the agency operations account of the
state highway fund for official hospitality by the secretary of transportation
shall not exceed $5,000: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from this account for engineering services furnished to counties for road
and bridge projects under K.S.A. 68-402e, and amendments thereto.
Bond services fees (276-00-4100-0580)...........................................No limit
Substantial maintenance (276-00-4100-0700)..................................No limit
Claims (276-00-4100-1150)..............................................................No limit
Conference fees (276-00-4100-2200)...............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of transportation is hereby authorized to fix,

HB 2082 269
charge and collect conference, training and workshop attendance and
registration fees for conferences, training seminars and workshops
sponsored or cosponsored by the department: Provided further, That such
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the conference fees account of the state highway fund: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from this account to
defray all or part of the costs of the conferences, training seminars and
workshops.
Federal local aid programs (276-00-4100-3000)..............................No limit
Categorical aid NHTSA national priority (276-00-4100-3035).......No limit
Payments for city
connecting links (276-00-4100-6200).....................................$5,360,000
Unmanned aerial systems –
UAS aviation only (276-00-4100-6400)......................................No limit
Other capital improvements (276-00-4100-8075)............................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of transportation is authorized to make
expenditures from the other capital improvements account to undertake a
program to assist cities and counties with railroad crossings of roads not
on the state highway system.
(c) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the following capital improvement account or accounts of the state
highway fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital improvement
project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed
therefor:
Buildings – rehabilitation
and repair (276-00-4100-8005)...............................................$5,400,000
Buildings – reroofing (276-00-4100-8010).....................................$446,758
Buildings – other construction, renovation
and repair (276-00-4100-8070).............................................$11,671,107
(2) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 from the unencumbered
balance as of June 30, 2026, in each capital improvement project account
for a building or buildings in the state highway fund for one or more
projects approved for prior fiscal years: Provided, That all expenditures
from the unencumbered balance in any such project account of the state
highway fund for fiscal year 2026 shall not exceed the amount of the
unencumbered balance in such project account on June 30, 2026, subject
to the provisions of subsection (d): Provided further, That all expenditures

HB 2082 270
from any such project account shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
transportation, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation in a capital improvement project
account for a building or buildings for fiscal year 2026 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) for the department of transportation to
another item of appropriation in a capital improvement project account for
a building or buildings for fiscal year 2026 from the state highway fund for
the department of transportation: Provided, That the secretary of
transportation shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(e) On April 1, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer from the motor pool service fund (173-00-6109-4020) of the
department of administration to the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) of the department of transportation an amount determined to be
equal to the sum of the annual vehicle registration fees for each vehicle
owned or leased by the state or any state agencies in accordance with
K.S.A. 75-4611, and amendments thereto.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, upon notification
from the secretary of transportation that an amount is due and payable
from the railroad rehabilitation loan guarantee fund (276-00-7503-7500),
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state highway
fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the railroad rehabilitation loan guarantee fund
the amount certified by the secretary as due and payable.
(g) Any payment for services during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to other state
agencies shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the
state highway fund for fiscal year 2026.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the secretary of transportation shall apportion and distribute
quarterly, on the first day of January, April, July and October, to cities on
the state highway system from the state highway fund moneys at the rate
of $5,000 per year per lane per mile for the maintenance of streets and
highways in cities designated by the secretary as city connecting links:
Provided, That all moneys so distributed shall be used solely for the
maintenance of city connecting links: Provided further, That such
apportionment shall apply only to those city connecting link lanes
maintained by the city, and shall not apply to city connecting link lanes
maintained by the secretary pursuant to agreement with the city: And
provided further, That, as used in this subsection, "lane" means the portion

HB 2082 271
of the roadway for use of moving traffic of a standard width prescribed by
the secretary.
(i) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the passenger rail service revolving
fund (276-00-7555-7555) of the department of transportation.
(j) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the Kansas air service development
incentive program fund (276-00-2894-2894) of the department of
transportation.
(k) In addition to other purposes for which expenditures may be made
by the department of transportation from the economic development
account (276-00-4100-0860) of the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the economic development account of the state highway fund
for fiscal year 2026 for the department of transportation's economic
development grant program to assist local governments in upgrading
county roads impacted by dairy industry expansion in southwest Kansas:
Provided, That expenditures for such purpose from the economic
development account of the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 shall
not exceed $6,000,000: Provided further, That all such expenditures for
such purpose shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on
the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026.
(l) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of transportation from moneys appropriated from
the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the department of transportation from the
state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 to raze the district five area four
construction lab in Great Bend, Kansas.
Sec. 128. (a) On June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 74-8768, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director
of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount of any unencumbered
balance in the expanded lottery act revenues fund to the state general fund:
Provided, That the transfer of such amount shall be in addition to any other
transfer from the expanded lottery act revenues fund to the state general
fund as prescribed by law.
(b) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
determine and notify the director of the budget if the amount of revenue
collected in the expanded lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, is insufficient to fund the appropriations and
transfers that are authorized from the expanded lottery act revenues fund

HB 2082 272
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in accordance with the provisions
of appropriation acts. The director of the budget shall certify to the director
of accounts and reports the amount necessary to be transferred from the
state general fund to the expanded lottery act revenues fund in order to
fund all such appropriations and transfers that are authorized from the
expanded lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026. Upon receipt of such certification, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer the amount of moneys from the state general fund to
the expanded lottery act revenues fund that is required in accordance with
the certification by the director of the budget under this section. At the
same time as the director of the budget transmits this certification to the
director of accounts and reports, the director of the budget shall transmit a
copy of such certification to the director of legislative research.
Sec. 129.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $61,000,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
145(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the state employee pay increase account, the sum of
$6,851,300 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 130.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase......................................................$38,140,000
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account shall
be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the cost to the
state general fund of the salary increase, including associated employer
contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
State employee pay increase...........................................................$382,996
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account shall
be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the cost to the
state economic development initiatives fund of the salary increase,
including associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase.............................................................$65,197
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account shall
be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the cost to the
state water plan fund of the salary increase, including associated employer

HB 2082 273
contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the children's
initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase...............................................................$6,848
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account shall
be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the cost to the
children's initiatives fund of the salary increase, including associated
employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(e) There is appropriated for the above agency from the Kansas
endowment for youth fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
State employee pay increase...............................................................$4,648
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account shall
be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the cost to the
Kansas endowment for youth fund of the salary increase, including
associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(f) Upon recommendation of the director of the budget, the state
finance council, acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a
matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in
K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, is hereby authorized to
approve: (1) Increases in expenditure limitations on special revenue funds
and accounts and increase the transfers between special revenue funds as
necessary to pay the salary increases under this section for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026; and (2) the expenditure of any remaining moneys in
any account appropriated in subsections (a) through (e) to address salary
inequities in any state agency as identified by the director of the budget in
consultation with the director of personnel services. The director of
accounts and reports is hereby authorized and directed to increase
expenditure limitations on such special revenue funds and accounts and
increase the transfers between special revenue funds in accordance with
such approval for the purpose of paying from such funds or accounts the
proportionate share of the cost to such funds or accounts, including
associated employer contributions, of the salary increases and other
amounts specified for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
(g) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h), effective with the first
payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, a
benefits-eligible employee shall be eligible for a salary increase of one
step for employees in the classified service, including associated employer
contributions, and each pay grade of the classified pay matrix shall be
extended upward by one step.
(2) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, an executive branch benefits-eligible employee who
is in the unclassified service shall receive a salary increase of 2.5%,

HB 2082 274
rounded to the nearest penny.
(3) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, all legislative branch state agencies shall receive a
sum equivalent to the total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest penny, of the
salaries of all benefits-eligible unclassified employees in such agency, to
be distributed as a merit pool.
(4) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the judicial branch shall receive a sum equivalent to
the total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest penny, of the salaries of all
benefits-eligible non-judge judicial branch employees in such agency, to
be distributed as a merit pool.
(5) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the universities shall
receive a sum equivalent to the total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest penny,
of the salaries of all benefits-eligible employees in such agency, to be
distributed as a merit pool.
(6) Effective with the first pay period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, classified, benefits-eligible employees in exempt
positions in the psychologist III job classification in the 24/7 facilities
under the Kansas office of veterans services shall receive a salary increase
of two steps in addition to the salary increase provided in subsection (g)
(1).
(7) Effective with the first pay period chargeable to the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, unclassified, benefits-eligible employees in exempt
positions in the 24/7 facilities under the Kansas office of veterans services,
the Kansas department for aging and disability services and the Kansas
department of corrections in the following job titles shall receive a salary
increase of 5%, rounded to the nearest penny, in addition to the salary
increase provided in subsection (g)(2):
(A) Chief financial officer;
(B) chief fiscal officer;
(C) chief of operations;
(D) assistant superintendent;
(E) clinical director;
(F) corrections supervisor;
(G) corrections manager III;
(H) director;
(I) information resource manager;
(J) information technology manager;
(K) psychologist;
(L) appointive state agency head;
(M) head of division of state agency; and
(N) warden.

HB 2082 275
(h) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 46-137a and 46-
137b, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the provisions of
subsection (g) shall not apply to the compensation or bi-weekly allowance
paid to each member of the legislature.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3111a, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the provisions of subsection (g)
shall not apply to state officers elected on a statewide basis.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3120l, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the provisions of subsection (g)
shall not apply to justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, district court judges and district magistrate judges.
(4) The provisions of subsection (g) shall not apply to:
(A) Teachers and licensed personnel at the Kansas state school for the
deaf or the Kansas state school for the blind.
(B) Any other employees on a formal, written career progression plan
implemented by executive directive.
(i) After implementation of subsections (g) and (h), the governor is
hereby authorized and directed to modify the pay plan for fiscal year 2026
in accordance with this subsection and to adopt such pay plan so modified.
Sec. 131. During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to
the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department
of administration from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or
any special revenue fund or funds for the department of administration for
fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the department of
administration from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, for and on behalf of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services, to convey, without
consideration, all of the rights, title and interest in approximately 15 acres
of real estate described in section 145(a) of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session
Laws of Kansas, and any improvements thereon, to the Kansas office of
veterans services subject to the provisions, including all contingencies and
limitations, of section 145 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of
Kansas: Provided, however, That the provisions of section 145(d) of
chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas shall not apply to the
conveyance of the real property authorized by this section.
Sec. 132.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Debt service
refunding – 2019F/G (173-00-1000-0465).............................$6,642,191

HB 2082 276
Rehabilitation and repair for
state facilities (173-00-1000-8500).........................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and repair
for state facilities account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Debt service
refunding – 2021P (173-00-1000-8562).................................$3,417,500
Debt service
refunding – 2020R (173-00-1000-8563).................................$8,228,450
2025A debt service (173-00-1000).............................................$10,266,988
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Statehouse debt service – state
highway fund (173-00-2861-2861).............................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2019F/G –
state highway fund (173-00-2823-2823).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2020R –
state highway fund (173-00-2865-2865).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2020S –
state highway fund (173-00-2866-2866).....................................No limit
State buildings
depreciation fund (173-00-6149-4500).......................................No limit
Capitol area plaza authority
planning fund (173-00-7121-7035).............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of administration may accept gifts, donations
and grants of money, including payments from local units of city and
county government, for the development of a new master plan for the
capitol plaza and the state zoning area described in K.S.A. 75-3619, and
amendments thereto: Provided further, That all such gifts, donations and
grants shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, to the credit of the
capitol area plaza authority planning fund.
Veterans memorial fund (173-00-7253-7250)..................................No limit
Executive mansion gifts fund (173-00-7257-7270)..........................No limit
State facilities gift fund (173-00-7263-7290)...................................No limit
Topeka state hospital cemetery memorial
gift fund (173-00-7337-7240)......................................................No limit
Master lease program fund (173-00-8732).......................................No limit
Printing plant improvement fund......................................................No limit
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the building and ground fund (173-00-

HB 2082 277
2028) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the following capital improvement account or accounts of the
building and ground fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Parking improvements
and repair (173-00-2028-2085)...................................................No limit
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the state buildings depreciation fund (173-
00-6149) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts of the
state buildings depreciation fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following
capital improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure
limitations prescribed therefor:
State of Kansas facilities projects –
debt service (173-00-6149-4520)................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
state buildings depreciation fund for fiscal year 2026.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the state buildings operating fund (173-
00-6148) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts of the
state buildings operating fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Eisenhower building purchase and renovation –
debt service (173-00-6148-4610)................................................No limit
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the building and ground fund (173-00-
2028), the state buildings depreciation fund (173-00-6149), and the state
buildings operating fund (173-00-6148) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures
may be made by the above agency from each such special revenue fund for
fiscal year 2026 from the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in
each existing capital improvement account of each such special revenue
fund: Provided, That expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any
such existing capital improvement account shall not exceed the amount of
the unencumbered balance in such account on June 30, 2026: Provided
further, That all expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any such
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on each
such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 and shall be in addition to
any other expenditure limitation imposed on any such account of each
such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 278
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of administration from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the department of
administration from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project to construct, renovate, develop and equip the pure
imagination facility (Kansas advanced immersive research for emerging
systems center) on the Salina campus of Kansas state university: Provided,
That such capital improvement project is hereby approved for Kansas state
university for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto,
and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with such statute: Provided further, That
Kansas state university may make expenditures from the moneys received
from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall not
exceed $45,000,000 plus all amounts required for costs of bond issuance,
costs of interest on the bonds issued for such capital improvement project
during the construction and renovation of such project and, for a period of
not more than one year following completion of such project, credit
enhancement costs and any required reserves for the payment of principal
and interest on the bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received
from the issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for
as prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall
be financed by appropriations from the state general fund to the
department of administration: And provided further, That any such bonds
and interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within
the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of
Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of
the state of Kansas: And provided further, That Kansas state university
shall make provisions for the maintenance of the pure imagination facility
(K-AIRES center): And provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739 through 75-3744, and amendments thereto,
or any other statute to the contrary, all procurement approvals by the
department of commerce concerning such pure imagination facility during
fiscal year 2024 shall be deemed to be approved by Kansas state university
and shall not require any resubmission or rebidding.
(h) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be

HB 2082 279
made by the department of administration from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the department of
administration from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project to construct a central medical and behavioral health
support building at the Topeka correctional facility: Provided, That such
capital improvement project is hereby approved for the department of
corrections for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments
thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with such statute: Provided
further, That the department of corrections may make expenditures from
the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures from the
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project shall not exceed $40,235,000 plus all amounts
required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the bonds issued
for such capital improvement project during the construction and
renovation of such project and, for a period of not more than one year
following completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds:
And provided further, That all moneys received from the issuance of any
such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as prescribed by
applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That debt service for any
such bonds for such capital improvement project shall be financed by
appropriations from the state general fund to the department of
administration: And provided further, That any such bonds and interest
thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development finance
authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the
meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of
Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of
the state of Kansas: And provided further, That the department of
corrections shall make provisions for the maintenance of the building.
(i) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of administration from the moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the
department of administration from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026 to provide for the issuance of 20-year bonds by the Kansas

HB 2082 280
development finance authority in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and
amendments thereto, for a capital improvement project for the Kansas
bureau of investigation to construct, renovate, develop and equip a
regional crime center and laboratory in Pittsburg, Kansas: Provided, That
such capital improvement project is hereby approved for the Kansas
bureau of investigation for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and
amendments thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the
Kansas development finance authority in accordance with such statute:
Provided further, That the Kansas bureau of investigation may make
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project shall not exceed $40,000,000
plus all amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on
the bonds issued for such capital improvement project during the
construction and renovation of such project and, for a period of not more
than one year following completion of such project, credit enhancement
costs and any required reserves for the payment of principal and interest
on the bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That debt
service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall be
financed by appropriations from the state general fund and any appropriate
special revenue fund or funds of the department of administration: And
provided further, That any such bonds and interest thereon shall be an
obligation only of the Kansas development finance authority, shall not
constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6 or
7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not
pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state of Kansas:
And provided further, That the Kansas bureau of investigation shall make
provisions for the maintenance of the regional crime center and laboratory.
Sec. 133.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the reimbursement and recovery fund
(300-00-2275) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts
of the reimbursement and recovery fund during the fiscal year 2026, for
the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair (300-00-2275)..........................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the Wagner Peyser employment services –

HB 2082 281
federal fund (300-00-3275) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the following capital improvement
account or accounts of the Wagner Peyser employment services – federal
fund during the fiscal year 2026, for the following capital improvement
project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed
therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair (300-00-3275)..........................................No limit
Sec. 134.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects (039-00-8100-8240).............$12,558,200
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to transfer moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the
rehabilitation and repair projects account to a rehabilitation and repair
account for any institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-12a01, and
amendments thereto, for projects approved by the secretary for aging and
disability services: Provided further, That expenditures also may be made
from this account during fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of rehabilitation
and repair for facilities of the Kansas department for aging and disability
services other than any institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-12a01, and
amendments thereto.
Larned state hospital – city of Larned
wastewater treatment (410-00-8100-8300)................................$129,620
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b05, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the Larned state hospital – city of Larned wastewater treatment account of
the state institutions building fund for payment of Larned state hospital's
portion of the city of Larned's wastewater treatment system.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Biddle
courtyard (494-00-8100-8200); razing of buildings (039-00-8100-8250);
and remodeling (039-00-8100-8330).
Sec. 135.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements (296-00-1000-8010)....................................$267,101
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 156(d) of

HB 2082 282
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the workmen's
compensation fee fund (296-00-2124-2228) of the department of labor is
hereby increased from $464,000 to $664,000.
Sec. 136.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements (296-00-1000-8010)....................................$696,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the capital improvements
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Employment security administration property
sale fund (296-00-3336-3110).....................................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of labor is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the employment security administration property sale
fund during fiscal year 2026 for the unemployment insurance program:
Provided, however, That no expenditures shall be made from this fund for
the proposed purchase or other acquisition of additional real estate to
provide space for the unemployment insurance program of the department
of labor until such proposed purchase or other acquisition, including the
preliminary plans and program statement for any capital improvement
project that is proposed to be initiated and completed by or for the
department of labor have been reviewed by the joint committee on state
building construction.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of labor from moneys appropriated from any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the department of labor for fiscal year 2026
from the moneys appropriated from any special revenue fund for the
expenses of the sale, exchange or other disposition conveying title for any
portion or all of the real estate of the department of labor: Provided, That
such expenditures may be made and such sale, exchange or other
disposition conveying title for any portion or all of the real estate of the
department of labor may be executed or otherwise effectuated only upon
specific authorization by the state finance council acting on this matter,
which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and
subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and

HB 2082 283
amendments thereto, and acting after receiving the recommendations of
the joint committee on state building construction: Provided, however,
That no such sale, exchange or other disposition conveying title for any
portion of the real estate of the department of labor shall be executed until
the proposed sale, exchange or other disposition conveying title for such
real estate has been reviewed by the joint committee on state building
construction: Provided further, That the net proceeds from the sale of any
of the real estate of the department of labor shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the employment security
administration property sale fund of the department of labor: And provided
further, That expenditures from the employment security administration
property sale fund shall not exceed the limitation established for fiscal year
2026 by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature except upon approval of the state finance council.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the workmen's compensation fee fund
(296-00-2124) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the workmen's compensation fee fund for fiscal year
2026 for the following capital improvement projects: Payment of
rehabilitation and repair projects: Provided, That expenditures from the
workmen's compensation fee fund (296-00-2124-2228) for fiscal year
2026 for such capital improvement purposes shall not exceed $464,000.
Sec. 137.
KANSAS OFFICE OF VETERANS SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Veterans cemetery program rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-1000-0904)...........................................$201,980
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterans cemetery
program rehabilitation and repair projects account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Soldiers' home rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-8100-7100)...........................................$798,670
Veterans' home rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-8100-8250)........................................$1,813,648
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Northeast
Kansas veterans' home (694-00-8100-8290); committal shelter doors (694-

HB 2082 284
00-8100-8291); storage building (694-00-8100-8292); and Kansas soldiers
home demolition of structures (694-00-8100-8252).
Sec. 138.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (604-00-8100-8108)........................................$1,792,718
Security system
upgrade project (604-00-8100-8130).........................................$306,343
Campus boilers and
HVAC upgrades (604-00-8100-8145).....................................$1,418,500
Sec. 139.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects (610-00-8100-8108)...............$2,005,712
Campus life safety and security (610-00-8100-8130).....................$397,356
Campus boilers and
HVAC upgrades (610-00-8100-8145).....................................$1,592,750
Sec. 140.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair
projects (288-00-1000-8088).....................................................$625,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and repair
projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Mobile shelving repair (288-00-1000)............................................$302,500
Grinter place parking repair (288-00-1000)....................................$128,040
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Shawnee
Mission roofs replacement (288-00-1000-0100); museum of history air
handling units/chiller replacement (288-00-1000-0200); museum of
history rehabilitation and repair (288-00-1000); and Charles Curtis home
purchase (288-00-1000-0300): Provided, however, That if the amount
expended by the above agency to purchase the Charles Curtis home is less
than $300,000 based on the market value appraisals required by K.S.A. 76-
2050, and amendments thereto, then on the date of such purchase, of the

HB 2082 285
amount reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, by this section from the state general fund in the Charles Curtis
home purchase account, the amount equal to the excess of the purchase
price for the Charles Curtis home is hereby lapsed.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the private gifts, grants and bequests fund
(288-00-7302) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts
of the private gifts, grants and bequests fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair projects.....................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
private gifts, grants and bequests fund for fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the historical preservation grant in aid
fund (288-00-3089) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts
of the historical preservation grant in aid fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair projects.....................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
historical preservation grant in aid fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the private gifts, grants and bequests fund,
historic properties fee fund, state historical facilities fund, save America's
treasures fund, historical society capital improvement fund, law
enforcement memorial fund and historical preservation grant in aid fund
for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from
each such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 from the
unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in each existing capital
improvement account of each such special revenue fund: Provided, That
expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any such existing capital
improvement account shall not exceed the amount of the unencumbered
balance in such account on June 30, 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any such account shall be
in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on each such special
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 and shall be in addition to any other
expenditure limitation imposed on any such account of each such special
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.

HB 2082 286
Sec. 141.
EMPORIA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(379-00-2526-2040; 379-00-2069-2010)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (379-00-2485-2485)........................No limit
Morris central renovation (379-00-2526-2040)................................No limit
Welch stadium renovation (379-00-2526-2040)...............................No limit
King hall theatre (379-00-2526-2040)..............................................No limit
Twin towers housing project –
debt service 2017D (379-00-5120-5030)....................................No limit
Memorial union project –
debt service 2020F (379-00-5161-5040).....................................No limit
Student housing projects –
debt service 2017D (379-00-5169-5050)....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (379-00-5186-5060).........................No limit
Student housing projects (379-00-5650-5120;
379-00-5169-5050)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (379-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (379-00-8001-8318)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of buildings account of the

HB 2082 287
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (379-00-1000-0320);
demolition of buildings (379-00-1000-8510); and Emporia state university
student affordability (379-00-1000-0370): Provided, That all expenditures
from the Emporia state university student affordability account shall be
used to eliminate the student fee of $125.12 per semester for full-time, on-
campus students and $14.83 per credit hour for part-time students for
memorial union debt: Provided, however, That during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the Emporia state university or the state board of
regents shall not increase any other student fees to offset the revenue
reduction from the elimination of such student fee.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by Emporia state university from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature, expenditures may be made by Emporia state university
from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the issuance of bonds
by the Kansas development finance authority in accordance with K.S.A.
74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital improvement project to
upgrade all campus lighting, improve building energy efficiency,
implement campus-wide water conservation and replace and upgrade
HVAC systems: Provided, That such capital improvement project is hereby
approved for Emporia state university for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-
8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of
bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in accordance with
such statute: Provided further, That Emporia state university may make
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project shall not exceed $10,200,000
plus all amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on
the bonds issued for such capital improvement project during the
construction and renovation of such project and, for a period of not more
than one year following completion of such project, credit enhancement
costs and any required reserves for the payment of principal and interest
on the bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That debt
service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall be

HB 2082 288
financed by appropriations from any appropriate special revenue fund or
funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and interest thereon shall
be an obligation only of the Kansas development finance authority, shall
not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6
or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not
pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state of Kansas:
And provided further, That Emporia state university shall make provisions
for the maintenance of the such capital improvement project.
Sec. 142.
FORT HAYS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Akers energy center project (246-00-2035-2000).............................No limit
Forsyth library renovation (246-00-2035-2000)...............................No limit
Rarick hall renovation (246-00-2035-2000).....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(246-00-2035-2000; 246-00-2510-2040)....................................No limit
Gross coliseum parking lot project
(246-00-2035-2000; 246-00-5185-5050)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (246-00-2483-2483)........................No limit
Memorial union addition –
debt service 2020C (246-00-2510-2040).....................................No limit
Memorial union project (246-00-2510-2040)...................................No limit
Memorial union renovation –
debt service 2005G (246-00-5102-5010)....................................No limit
Student union rehabilitation and
repair projects (246-00-5102-5010).............................................No limit
Lewis field/Wiest hall renovation –
debt service 2016B (246-00-5103-5020).....................................No limit
Wiest hall replacement –
debt service 2016B (246-00-5103-5020).....................................No limit
Student housing rehabilitation and
repair projects (246-00-5103-5020).............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (246-00-5185-5050).........................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (246-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (246-00-8001-8318)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for

HB 2082 289
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (246-00-1000-0320)
and demolition of buildings (246-00-1000-8510).
Sec. 143.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Biosecurity research (367-00-1000-0220)...................................$2,191,600
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Chiller plant project –
debt service 2015B (367-00-2062-2000).....................................No limit
Engineering hall renovation
project (367-00-2062-2000)........................................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-2062-2080;
367-00-2520-2080; 367-00-2901-2160)......................................No limit
Energy conservation projects –
debt service 2021A, 2012F/H, 2017B
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-5163-4500)....................................No limit
Capital lease – debt service

HB 2082 290
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-520-2080;
367-00-5117-4430)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (367-00-2484-2484)........................No limit
Electrical upgrade project – debt service 2017E
(367-00-2520-2080; 367-00-2484-2484)....................................No limit
Recreation complex project – debt service
2021A, 2010G1/2 (367-00-2520-2080).......................................No limit
Seaton hall renovation –
debt service 2016A (367-00-2520-2080).....................................No limit
Student union renovation project –
debt service 2016A (367-00-2520-2080).....................................No limit
Research initiative debt service
2021A (367-00-2901-2106).........................................................No limit
Building retro-commissioning
project (367-00-2901-2160)........................................................No limit
Chemical landfill – debt service
refunding 2011G-2 (367-00-2901-2160).....................................No limit
Salina student life center project – debt service
2008D (367-00-5111-5120).........................................................No limit
K-state Salina residence hall – debt service
2022A (367-00-5117-4430).........................................................No limit
Childcare development center project –
debt service 2019C (367-00-5125-5101).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding 2022D (367-00-5163-4500)........................No limit
Derby dining center project – debt
service 2019C (367-00-5163-4500).............................................No limit
Jardine housing project – debt service 2022D/
2014D/2015B/2011G-1 (367-00-5163-4500)..............................No limit
Student housing projects
(367-00-5163-4500; 367-00-5117-4430).....................................No limit
Wefald dining and residence hall project – debt
service 2022D/2014D-2 (367-00-5163-4500).............................No limit
Union parking –
debt service 2016A (367-00-5181-4630).....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (367-00-5181-4638).........................No limit
Strong complex project – debt service 2024F (367-00-5163-4500).No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (367-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (367-00-8001-8318)...................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for

HB 2082 291
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(f) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (367-00-1000-0320);
demolition of buildings (367-00-1000-8510); Kansas state university
animal diagnostic laboratory (367-00-1000-0260); and Kansas state
university ag innovation initiative (367-00-1000-0210): Provided, That all
expenditures from the Kansas state university ag innovation initiative
account shall require a match of nonstate or private moneys on a $1-for-$1
basis: Provided, however, That no federal grants may be used for such
match.
Sec. 144.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SYSTEMS
AND AGRICULTURE RESEARCH PROGRAMS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rehabilitation and repair
projects (369-00-2697-1100; 369-00-2921-1200).......................No limit
Sec. 145.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
VETERINARY MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or

HB 2082 292
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(368-00-2129-5500; 368-00-5160-5300;
368-00-2590-5530)......................................................................No limit
AHU replacement project (368-00-2590-5530)...............................No limit
Mosier lab renovation (368-00-2590-5530).....................................No limit
Capital lease – debt service (368-00-5160-5300).............................No limit
Sec. 146.
PITTSBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Debt service refunding – 2022E
(385-00-2070-2010; 385-00-5106-5105;
385-00-2820-2820; 385-00-2833-2831)......................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (385-00-2486-2486)........................No limit
Overman student
center project (385-00-2820-2820)..............................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(385-00-2833-2831; 385-00-2070-2010;
385-00-2529-2040)......................................................................No limit
Student housing projects – debt service,
2020H (385-00-2833-2831;
385-00-5165-5050)......................................................................No limit
Parking facility – debt service
2020H (385-00-5187-5060).........................................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (385-00-5187-5060).........................No limit
Student housing maintenance projects (385-00-5646-5160)............No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (385-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (385-00-8001-8318)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.

HB 2082 293
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by the
provisions of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by the provisions of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (385-00-1000-0320);
demolition of buildings (385-00-1000-8510); American center for reading
facility (385-00-1000-0290); and NIMA manufacturing prove out facility
(385-00-1000-0250).
Sec. 147.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Energy conservation projects – debt service
2020B (682-00-2107-2000;
682-00-2545-2080)......................................................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(682-00-2107-2000; 682-00-2545-2080)....................................No limit
Kansas law enforcement training
center projects (682-00-2133-2020)............................................No limit
Engineering facility – debt service 2021D
(682-00-2153-2153; 682-00-2545-2080)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (682-00-2487-2487)........................No limit
Energy conservation projects –
debt service (682-00-2545-2080)................................................No limit
Earth, energy and environment center –
debt service 2017A (682-00-2545-2080).....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (682-00-2545-2080).............................................No limit
Student recreation center –
debt service 2017A (682-00-2864-2860).....................................No limit
Student recreation center rehabilitation
and repair (682-00-2864-2860)...................................................No limit

HB 2082 294
Law enforcement training center capital
improvement ARPA fund (682-00-3756)....................................No limit
Student housing projects –
debt service 2014C, 2017A,
2020B, 2021D (682-00-5142-5050)............................................No limit
McCollum hall parking facility – debt
service 2014C (682-00-5175-5070).............................................No limit
Parking facilities – debt service
2014C, 2017A (682-00-5175-5070)............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (682-00-5175-5070).........................No limit
Student housing maintenance projects
(682-00-5621-5110; 682-00-5142-5050;
682-00-2545-2080; 682-00-2905-2160)......................................No limit
Student health facility rehabilitation and
repair projects (682-00-5640-5120).............................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (682-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (682-00-8001-8328)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (682-00-1000-0420)

HB 2082 295
and demolition of buildings (682-00-1000-8510).
Sec. 148.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Health education building –
debt service 2017A (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108)..............No limit
Energy conservation –
debt service 2020B (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108).............No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(683-00-2108-2500; 683-00-2394-2390;
683-00-2551-2600; 683-00-2907-2800;
683-00-2915-2900)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (683-00-2488-2488)........................No limit
Hemenway research initiative – debt service
2020B (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108)..................................No limit
KUMC research institute – debt service
2020B (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108)..................................No limit
Parking garage 3 –
debt service 2014C (683-00-5176-5550).....................................No limit
Parking garage 4 – debt service
2020B (683-00-5176-5550).........................................................No limit
Parking garage 5 –
debt service 2016C (683-00-5176-5550).....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (683-00-5176-5550).........................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (683-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (683-00-8001-8618)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital

HB 2082 296
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (683-00-1000-0320);
demolition of buildings (683-00-1000-8510); and university of Kansas
medical center cancer research facility (683-00-1000-0640): Provided,
That all expenditures from the university of Kansas medical center cancer
research facility account shall require a match of nonstate or private
moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis: Provided, however, That no federal grants
may be used for such match.
Sec. 149.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Clinton hall shocker student success center –
debt service 2022G (715-00-2112-2000;
715-00-2558-2030)......................................................................No limit
Energy conservation –
debt service (715-00-2112-2000).................................................No limit
Honors colleges foundation –
debt service (715-00-2112-2000).................................................No limit
Woolsey hall – school of business
debt service 2020P (715-00-2112-2000;
715-00-2558-2030)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (715-00-2489-2489)........................No limit
Cessna stadium demolition (715-00-2558-2030).............................No limit
Convergence sciences 2 – debt
service 2021L (715-00-2558)......................................................No limit
Marcus welcome center
project (715-00-2558; 715-00-2112-2000)..................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(715-00-2558-2030; 715-00-2908-2080;
715-00-2558-3000; 715-00-2112-2000)......................................No limit

HB 2082 297
Rhatigan student center –
debt service 2020P (715-00-2558-2030).....................................No limit
Engineering research lab – debt
service 2016J (715-00-2558-2030)..............................................No limit
NIAR/engineering/industry &
defense projects (715-00-2908-2080;
715-00-2558-2030; 715-00-2558-3000)......................................No limit
Flats and suites –
debt service 2020P (715-00-5100-5250).....................................No limit
Shocker residence hall –
debt service 2021L (715-00-5100-5250).....................................No limit
Student housing projects (715-00-5100-5250).................................No limit
Parking garage – debt
service 2016J (715-00-5148-5000)..............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (715-00-5159-5040).........................No limit
Fairmont towers – debt
service 2012A2 (715-00-5620-5270)..........................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (715-00)...................................No limit
Kansas educational building fund (715-00-8001-8318)...................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects, and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational building
fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such account by the
state board of regents by any provision of this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature: Provided, That this subsection
shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any account of the Kansas
educational building fund of the above agency that was first appropriated
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency of
moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by any
provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of

HB 2082 298
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (715-00-1000-0320);
and demolition of buildings (715-00-1000-8510).
Sec. 150.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
Kansas educational
building fund (561-00-8001-8108)..............................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of regents is hereby authorized to transfer
moneys from the Kansas educational building fund to an account or
accounts of the Kansas educational building fund of any institution under
the control and supervision of the state board of regents to be expended by
the institution for projects, including planning, new construction and
razing, approved by the state board of regents: Provided, however, That no
expenditures shall be made from any such account until the proposed
projects have been reviewed by the joint committee on state building
construction: Provided further, That the state board of regents shall certify
to the director of accounts and reports each such transfer of moneys from
the Kansas educational building fund: And provided further, That the state
board of regents shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of the budget and to the director of legislative research.
Kansas campus restoration fund (561-00)........................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of regents is hereby authorized to transfer
moneys from the Kansas campus restoration fund to the deferred
maintenance account – Kansas campus restoration fund of any institution
under the control and supervision of the state board of regents to be
expended by the institution for projects approved by the state board of
regents: Provided further, That the state board of regents shall certify to the
director of accounts and reports each such transfer of moneys from the
Kansas campus restoration fund: And provided further, That the state board
of regents shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of
the budget and the director of legislative research.
Any unencumbered balance in the demolition of buildings account (561-
00-1000-8510) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 151.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the correctional
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the

HB 2082 299
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements – rehabilitation and repair of
correctional institutions (521-00-8600-8240).........................$4,182,000
Provided, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to transfer
moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the capital improvements –
rehabilitation and repair of correctional institutions account of the
correctional institutions building fund to an account or accounts of the
correctional institutions building fund of any institution or facility under
the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections to be expended during fiscal
year 2026 by the institution or facility for capital improvement projects
and for security improvement projects including acquisition of security
equipment.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements –
rehabilitation and repair of juvenile
correctional facilities (521-00-8100-8000)................................$913,619
Provided, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to transfer
moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the capital improvements –
rehabilitation and repair account of the state institutions building fund to
any account or accounts of the state institutions building fund of any
juvenile correctional facility or institution under the general supervision
and management of the secretary of corrections to be expended during
fiscal year 2026 for capital improvement projects approved by the
secretary: Provided further, That the secretary of corrections shall certify
each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit
a copy of each such certification to the director of the budget and the
director of legislative research.
Lansing razing and warehouse (521-00-8100)...........................$11,001,599
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b04 and 76-
6b05, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the Lansing razing and warehouse account of the state institutions building
fund during fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall be made from such
account during fiscal year 2026 for the razing of structures and
construction of a new warehouse at the old Lansing correctional facility
site.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:

HB 2082 300
Correctional facility
infrastructure project (521-00-2834)...........................................No limit
Correctional industries fund capital unit (522-00-6126-7301).........No limit
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Priority capital improvement projects (521-00-1000-0800)........$4,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the priority capital
improvement projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the Lansing correctional facility
career campus account (521-00-1000-0850) in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the secretary of corrections shall make expenditures from the Lansing
correctional facility career campus account to match privately raised funds
on a $1-for-$1 basis to develop and construct a career campus at the
Lansing correctional facility.
Sec. 152.
ATTORNEY GENERAL –
KANSAS BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) On the effective date of this act, the $3,050,000 appropriated for
the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section
174(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the regional crime center and laboratory debt service
account (083-00-1000-0830) is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 153.
ATTORNEY GENERAL –
KANSAS BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (083-00-1000-0100)...........................................$300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and repair
projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 154.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the highway patrol

HB 2082 301
training center fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair – training
center – Salina (280-00-2306-2004)............................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year 2026.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the vehicle identification number fee fund (280-00-2213) for
fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
vehicle identification number fee fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Training academy rehabilitation
and repair (280-00-2213-2401)...................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
vehicle identification number fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the Kansas highway patrol operations fund for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the Kansas highway
patrol operations fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Scale replacement and rehabilitation and
repair of buildings (280-00-2034-1115)..................................$1,582,860
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
Kansas highway patrol operations fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the Kansas highway patrol operations
fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from each such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 from the
unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in each existing capital
improvement account of each such special revenue fund: Provided, That
expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any such existing capital
improvement account shall not exceed the amount of the unencumbered
balance in such account on June 30, 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any such account shall be
in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on each such special
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 and shall be in addition to any other
expenditure limitation imposed on any such account of each such special

HB 2082 302
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,582,860 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to
the scale replacement and rehabilitation and
repair of buildings account of the Kansas highway patrol operations fund
(280-00-2034-1115). In addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made from the state highway fund during fiscal year
2026 and notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, transfers and expenditures may
be made from the state highway fund during fiscal year 2026 for support
and maintenance of the Kansas highway patrol.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the KHP federal forfeiture – federal fund
(280-00-3545) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following account or accounts of the KHP federal
forfeiture – federal fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Troop F storage building (280-00-3545-3545).................................No limit
Training academy rehabilitation
and repair (280-00-3545-3548)...................................................No limit
KHP federal forfeiture – new construction.......................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
KHP federal forfeiture – federal fund for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 155.
ADJUTANT GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital improvement
project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (034-00-1000-8000)........................................$3,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and repair
projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, in the
following accounts are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Hays
armory (034-00-1000-8040); SDB remodel (034-00-1000-8030); and
deferred maintenance (034-00-1000-0700).
Sec. 156.
STATE FAIR BOARD
(a) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts of the state

HB 2082 303
general fund for the above agency in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Bison arena renovation
(373-00-1000-8105); and state fair facilities upgrades (373-00-1000-8110).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund or
funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law shall
not exceed the following:
State fair capital
improvements fund (373-00-2533-2500)....................................No limit
(c) On or before the 10th day of each month during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state general fund to the state fair capital improvements fund
interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of moneys in the
state fair capital improvements fund for the preceding month; and (2) the
net earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the
preceding month.
Sec. 157.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Dam repair (710-00-1000-0700); El Dorado shower house (710-00-1000-
0650); and flint hills trail system (710-00-1000-0660).
(b) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $3,400,000 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to
the department access road fund (710-00-2178-2760) of the Kansas
department of wildlife and parks.
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $200,000 from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to
the bridge maintenance fund (710-00-2045-2070) of the Kansas
department of wildlife and parks.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the following capital
improvement account or accounts of the parks fee fund for fiscal year
2026 for the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to
the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Parks rehabilitation and
repair projects (710-00-2122-
2066).................................................................... $1,289,225

HB 2082 304
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the department access road fund for fiscal
year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
following capital improvement account or accounts of the department
access road fund during fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Department access road fund (710-00-2178-2760)..........................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the department access road fund,
expenditures may be made from this fund for road improvement projects
administered by the department of transportation in state parks and on
public lands: Provided further, That all expenditures from each such
capital improvement account shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitations imposed on the parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the wildlife fee fund for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the following capital
improvement account or accounts of the wildlife fee fund during fiscal
year 2026 for the following capital improvement project or projects,
subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Shooting range development (710-00-2300-2301).........................$284,250
Coast guard boating projects (710-00-2300-3000)........................ $100,000
Land acquisition (710-00-2300-3040)........................................... $400,000
Rehabilitation and repair (710-00-2300-3262)............................$3,459,167
Federally mandated
boating access (710-00-2300-4360)...........................................$573,000
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the
wildlife fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the migratory waterfowl propagation and
protection fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts
of the migratory waterfowl propagation and protection fund for fiscal year
2026 for the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to
the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Wetlands acquisition (710-00-2600-3330)......................................$775,000
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on the

HB 2082 305
migratory waterfowl propagation and protection fund for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 158. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 2-223 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 2-223. (a) There is hereby established in the state treasury the
state fair capital improvements fund. All expenditures of moneys in the
state fair capital improvements fund shall be used for the payment of
capital improvements and maintenance for the state fairgrounds and the
payment of capital improvement obligations that have been financed.
Capital improvement projects for the Kansas state fairgrounds are hereby
approved for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto,
and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with that statute.
(b) Except as provided further, on each June 30, the state fair board
shall certify to the director of accounts and reports an amount to be
transferred from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund, which amount shall be not less than the amount equal
to 5% of the total gross receipts during the current fiscal year from state
fair activities and non-fair days activities. For the fiscal year ending June
30, 2024 2025, notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, on
March 1, 2024 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available
therefor, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state
fair fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund the amount equal
to the greater of $300,000 or the amount equal to 5% of the total gross
receipts during fiscal year 2024 2025 from state fair activities and non-fair
days activities through March 1, 2024 2025, except that, subject to
approval by the director of the budget prior to March 1, 2024 2025, after
reviewing the amounts credited to the state fair fee fund and the state fair
capital improvements fund, cash flow considerations for the state fair fee
fund, and the amount required to be credited to the state fair capital
improvements fund pursuant to this subsection to pay the bonded debt
service payment due on April 1, 2024 2025, the state fair board may certify
an amount on March 1, 2024 2025, to the director of accounts and reports
to be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund that is equal to the amount required to be credited to
the state fair capital improvements fund pursuant to this subsection to pay
the bonded debt service payment due on April 1, 2024 2025, and shall
certify to the director of accounts and reports on the date specified by the
director of the budget the amount equal to the balance of the aggregate
amount that is required to be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the
state fair capital improvements fund for fiscal year 2024 2025. Upon
receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer moneys from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund in accordance with such certification. For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025 2026, notwithstanding the other provisions of

HB 2082 306
this section, on March 1, 2025 2026, or as soon thereafter as moneys are
available therefor, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from
the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund the
amount equal to the greater of $300,000 or the amount equal to 5% of the
total gross receipts during fiscal year 2025 2026 from state fair activities
and non-fair days activities through March 1, 2025 2026, except that,
subject to approval by the director of the budget prior to March 1, 2025
2026, after reviewing the amounts credited to the state fair fee fund and
the state fair capital improvements fund, cash flow considerations for the
state fair fee fund, and the amount required to be credited to the state fair
capital improvements fund pursuant to this subsection to pay the bonded
debt service payment due on April 1, 2025 2026, the state fair board may
certify an amount on March 1, 2025 2026, to the director of accounts and
reports to be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund that is equal to the amount required to be credited to
the state fair capital improvements fund pursuant to this subsection to pay
the bonded debt service payment due on April 1, 2025 2026, and shall
certify to the director of accounts and reports on the date specified by the
director of the budget the amount equal to the balance of the aggregate
amount that is required to be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the
state fair capital improvements fund for fiscal year 2025 2026. Upon
receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer moneys from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund in accordance with such certification.
Sec. 159. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-1775a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-1775a. (a) Prior to December 31, 1996, the governing body of
each city that, pursuant to K.S.A. 12-1771, and amendments thereto, has
established a redevelopment district prior to July 1, 1996, shall certify to
the director of accounts and reports the amount equal to the amount of
revenue realized from ad valorem taxes imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 72-
5142, and amendments thereto, within such redevelopment district. Except
as provided further, to February 1, 1997, and annually on that date
thereafter, the governing body of each such city shall certify to the director
of accounts and reports an amount equal to the amount by which revenues
realized from such ad valorem taxes imposed in such redevelopment
district are estimated to be reduced for the ensuing calendar year due to
legislative changes in the statewide school finance formula. Prior to March
1 of each year, the director of accounts and reports shall certify to the state
treasurer each amount certified by the governing bodies of cities under this
section for the ensuing calendar year and shall transfer from the state
general fund to the city tax increment financing revenue replacement fund
the aggregate of all amounts so certified. Prior to April 15 of each year, the
state treasurer shall pay from the city tax increment financing revenue

HB 2082 307
replacement fund to each city certifying an amount to the director of
accounts and reports under this section for the ensuing calendar year the
amount so certified. During fiscal years 2024, 2025 and, 2026 and 2027,
no moneys shall be transferred from the state general fund to the city tax
increment financing revenue replacement fund pursuant to this subsection.
(b) There is hereby created the tax increment financing revenue
replacement fund, which shall be administered by the state treasurer. All
expenditures from the tax increment financing revenue replacement fund
shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by
the state treasurer or a person or persons designated by the state treasurer.
Sec. 160. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-5256 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-5256. (a) All expenditures from the state housing trust fund
made for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-5253 through 12-5255, and
amendments thereto, shall be made in accordance with appropriation acts
upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the president of the Kansas housing resources
corporation.
(b) (1) On July 1, 2023, July 1, 2024, and July 1, 2025, and July 1,
2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $2,000,000 from
the state economic development initiatives fund to the state housing trust
fund established by K.S.A. 74-8959, and amendments thereto.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8959, and
amendments thereto, to the contrary, during fiscal year 2024, fiscal year
2025 and, fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, moneys in the state
housing trust fund shall be used solely for the purpose of loans or grants to
cities or counties for infrastructure or housing development in rural areas.
During such fiscal years, on or before January 13, 2025, January 12, 2026,
and January 11, 2027, and January 10, 2028, the president of the Kansas
housing resources corporation shall submit a report concerning the
activities of the state housing trust fund to the house of representatives
committee on appropriations and the senate committee on ways and
means.
Sec. 161. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-180 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-180. The secretary of health and environment shall:
(a) Institute and carry on an intensive educational program among
physicians, hospitals, public health nurses and the public concerning
congenital hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria and other
genetic diseases detectable with the same specimen. This educational
program shall include information about the nature of such conditions and
examinations for the detection thereof in early infancy in order that
measures may be taken to prevent intellectual disability or morbidity
resulting from such conditions.

HB 2082 308
(b) Provide recognized screening tests for phenylketonuria,
galactosemia, hypothyroidism and such other diseases as may be
appropriately detected with the same specimen. The initial laboratory
screening tests for these diseases shall be performed by the department of
health and environment or its designee for all infants born in the state.
Such services shall be performed without charge.
(c) Provide a follow-up program by providing test results and other
information to identified physicians; locate infants with abnormal newborn
screening test results; with parental consent, monitor infants to assure
appropriate testing to either confirm or not confirm the disease suggested
by the screening test results; with parental consent, monitor therapy and
treatment for infants with confirmed diagnosis of congenital
hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria or other genetic diseases
being screened under this statute; and establish ongoing education and
support activities for individuals with confirmed diagnosis of congenital
hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria and other genetic diseases
being screened under this statute and for the families of such individuals.
(d) Maintain a registry of cases including information of importance
for the purpose of follow-up services to prevent intellectual disability or
morbidity.
(e) Provide, within the limits of appropriations available therefor, the
necessary treatment product for diagnosed cases for as long as medically
indicated, when the product is not available through other state agencies.
In addition to diagnosed cases under this section, diagnosed cases of maple
syrup urine disease shall be included as a diagnosed case under this
subsection. Where the applicable income of the person or persons who
have legal responsibility for the diagnosed individual meets medicaid
eligibility, such individuals' needs shall be covered under the medicaid
state plan. Where the applicable income of the person or persons who have
legal responsibility for the diagnosed individual is not medicaid eligible,
but is below 300% of the federal poverty level established under the most
recent poverty guidelines issued by the United States department of health
and human services, the department of health and environment shall
provide reimbursement of between 50% to 100% of the product cost in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of health
and environment. Where the applicable income of the person or persons
who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed individual exceeds 300%
of the federal poverty level established under the most recent poverty
guidelines issued by the United States department of health and human
services, the department of health and environment shall provide
reimbursement of an amount not to exceed 50% of the product cost in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of health
and environment.

HB 2082 309
(f) Provide state assistance to an applicant pursuant to subsection (e)
only after it has been shown that the applicant has exhausted all benefits
from private third-party payers, medicare, medicaid and other government
assistance programs and after consideration of the applicant's income and
assets. The secretary of health and environment shall adopt rules and
regulations establishing standards for determining eligibility for state
assistance under this section.
(g) (1) Except for treatment products provided under subsection (e), if
the medically necessary food treatment product for diagnosed cases must
be purchased, the purchaser shall be reimbursed by the department of
health and environment for costs incurred up to $1,500 per year per
diagnosed child age 18 or younger at 100% of the product cost upon
submission of a receipt of purchase identifying the company from which
the product was purchased. For a purchaser to be eligible for
reimbursement under this subsection, the applicable income of the person
or persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed child shall not
exceed 300% of the poverty level established under the most recent
poverty guidelines issued by the federal department of health and human
services.
(2) As an option to reimbursement authorized under subsection (g)
(1), the department of health and environment may purchase food
treatment products for distribution to diagnosed children in an amount not
to exceed $1,500 per year per diagnosed child age 18 or younger. For a
diagnosed child to be eligible for the distribution of food treatment
products under this subsection, the applicable income of the person or
persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed child shall not
exceed 300% of the poverty level established under the most recent
poverty guidelines issued by the federal department of health and human
services.
(3) In addition to diagnosed cases under this section, diagnosed cases
of maple syrup urine disease shall be included as a diagnosed case under
this subsection.
(h) The department of health and environment shall continue to
receive orders for both necessary treatment products and necessary food
treatment products, purchase such products, and shall deliver the products
to an address prescribed by the diagnosed individual. The department of
health and environment shall bill the person or persons who have legal
responsibility for the diagnosed patient for a pro-rata share of the total
costs, in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this
section.
(i) The secretary of health and environment shall adopt rules and
regulations as needed to require, to the extent of available funding,
newborn screening tests to screen for treatable disorders listed in the core

HB 2082 310
uniform panel of newborn screening conditions recommended in the 2005
report by the American college of medical genetics entitled "Newborn
Screening: Toward a Uniform Screening Panel and System" or another
report determined by the department of health and environment to provide
more appropriate newborn screening guidelines to protect the health and
welfare of newborns for treatable disorders.
(j) In performing the duties under subsection (i), the secretary of
health and environment shall appoint an advisory council to advise the
department of health and environment on implementation of subsection (i).
(k) The department of health and environment shall periodically
review the newborn screening program to determine the efficacy and cost
effectiveness of the program and determine whether adjustments to the
program are necessary to protect the health and welfare of newborns and
to maximize the number of newborn screenings that may be conducted
with the funding available for the screening program.
(l) There is hereby established in the state treasury the Kansas
newborn screening fund that shall be administered by the secretary of
health and environment. All expenditures from the fund shall be for the
newborn screening program. All expenditures from the fund shall be made
in accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the
secretary of health and environment or the secretary's designee. On July 1
of each year, the director of accounts and reports shall determine the
amount credited to the medical assistance fee fund pursuant to K.S.A. 40-
3213, and amendments thereto, and shall transfer the estimated portion of
such amount that is necessary to fund the newborn screening program for
the ensuing fiscal year as certified by the secretary of health and
environment or the secretary's designee to the Kansas newborn screening
fund. Such amount shall not exceed $5,000,000 in fiscal years 2024, 2025
and, 2026 and 2027.
Sec. 162. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,107 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 74-50,107. (a) Commencing on July 1, 2021, and on the first day
of each month thereafter during fiscal year 2024, fiscal year 2025 and,
fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the secretary of revenue shall apply
a rate of 2% to that portion of moneys withheld from the wages of
individuals and collected under the Kansas withholding and declaration of
estimated tax act, K.S.A. 79-3294 et seq., and amendments thereto. The
amount so determined shall be credited on a monthly basis as follows: (1)
An amount necessary to meet obligations of the debt services for the
IMPACT program repayment fund; (2) an amount to the IMPACT program
services fund as needed for program administration; and (3) any remaining
amounts to the job creation program fund created pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
50,224, and amendments thereto. During fiscal year 2024, fiscal year 2025

HB 2082 311
and, fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the aggregate amount that is
credited to the job creation program fund pursuant to this subsection shall
not exceed $20,000,000 for each such fiscal year.
(b) Commencing on July 1, 2026 2027, and on an annual basis
thereafter, the secretary of revenue shall estimate the amount equal to the
amount of net savings realized from the elimination, modification or
limitation of any credit, deduction or program pursuant to the provisions of
this act as compared to the expense deduction provided for in K.S.A. 79-
32,143a, and amendments thereto. Whereupon such amount of savings in
accordance with appropriation acts shall be remitted to the state treasurer
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount to the credit of the job creation program fund
created pursuant to K.S.A. 74-50,224, and amendments thereto. In
addition, such other amount or amounts of money may be transferred from
the state general fund or any other fund or funds in the state treasury to the
job creation program fund in accordance with appropriation acts.
Sec. 163. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-99b34 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 74-99b34. (a) The bioscience development and investment fund is
hereby created. The bioscience development and investment fund shall not
be a part of the state treasury and the funds in the bioscience development
and investment fund shall belong exclusively to the authority.
(b) Distributions from the bioscience development and investment
fund shall be for the exclusive benefit of the authority, under the control of
the board and used to fulfill the purpose, powers and duties of the
authority pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-99b01 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
(c) The secretary of revenue and the authority shall establish the base
year taxation for all bioscience companies and state universities. The
secretary of revenue, the authority and the board of regents shall establish
the number of bioscience employees associated with state universities and
report annually and determine the increase from the taxation base annually.
The secretary of revenue and the authority may consider any verifiable
evidence, including, but not limited to, the NAICS code assigned or
recorded by the department of labor for companies with employees in
Kansas, when determining which companies should be classified as
bioscience companies.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h), for a period of 15 years
from the effective date of this act, the state treasurer shall pay annually
95% of withholding above the base, as certified by the secretary of
revenue, upon Kansas wages paid by bioscience employees to the
bioscience development and investment fund. Such payments shall be
reconciled annually. On or before the 10th day of each month, the director

HB 2082 312
of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the
bioscience development and investment fund interest earnings based on:
(A) The average daily balance of moneys in the bioscience
development and investment fund for the preceding month; and
(B) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio for
the preceding month.
(2) There is hereby established in the state treasury the center of
innovation for biomaterials in orthopaedic research – Wichita state
university fund, which shall be administered by Wichita state university.
All moneys credited to the fund shall be used for research and
development. All expenditures from the center of innovation for
biomaterials in orthopaedic research – Wichita state university fund shall
be made in accordance with appropriation acts and upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to expenditures approved
by the president of Wichita state university or by the person or persons
designated by the president of Wichita state university.
(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury the national bio
agro-defense facility fund, which shall be administered by Kansas state
university in accordance with the strategic plan adopted by the governor's
national bio agro-defense facility steering committee. All moneys credited
to the fund shall be used in accordance with the governor's national bio
agro-defense facility steering committee's plan with the approval of the
president of Kansas state university. All expenditures from the national bio
agro-defense facility fund shall be made in accordance with appropriation
acts and upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued
pursuant to expenditures approved by the steering committee and the
president of Kansas state university or by the person or persons designated
by the president of Kansas state university.
(e) The cumulative amounts of funds paid by the state treasurer to the
bioscience development and investment fund shall not exceed
$581,800,000.
(f) The division of post audit is hereby authorized to conduct a post
audit in accordance with the provisions of the legislative post audit act,
K.S.A. 46-1106 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(g) At the direction of the authority, the fund may be held in the
custody of and invested by the state treasurer, provided that the bioscience
development and investment fund shall at all times be accounted for in a
separate report from all other funds of the authority and the state.
(h) During fiscal years 2024, 2025 and, 2026 and 2027, no moneys
shall be transferred from the state general fund to the bioscience
development and investment fund pursuant to subsection (d)(1).
Sec. 164. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-5748 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-5748.(a) There is hereby created in the state treasury the

HB 2082 313
Kansas sheltered workshop transition fund. The secretary of labor shall
administer the fund. All expenditures from the fund shall be for the
purpose of facilitating transitions by Kansas sheltered workshop
employers away from employing individuals with disabilities under a
certificate issued by the United States secretary of labor under 29 U.S.C. §
214(c) and toward paying all such employees at least the minimum wage.
Such purpose shall be achieved by providing matching grants from fund
moneys to Kansas sheltered workshop employers that commit to paying at
least the minimum wage to all employees. A grant shall be matched on a
$1-to-$1 basis by the Kansas sheltered workshop employer from nonstate
sources.
(b) Applications for matching grants shall be made by Kansas
sheltered workshop employers to the secretary in the form and manner
required by the secretary. In determining whether applicants should be
approved and receive a grant, the secretary shall seek the assistance of the
secretary for children and families, the secretary for aging and disability
services or any other appropriate state agency. The secretary for children
and families, secretary for aging and disability services or other state
agency shall provide such assistance to the secretary as requested by the
secretary. The applicant shall provide a transition plan to the secretary
demonstrating how the applicant will use the grant and other funding to
transition away from use of a certificate issued by the United States
secretary of labor under 29 U.S.C. § 214(c). The Kansas sheltered
workshop shall commit to completing the plan to receive a grant. If the
secretary approves the transition plan, finds that the Kansas sheltered
workshop has sufficient nonstate funding to match the grant with nonstate
funds on a $1-to-$1 basis and approves the application, the secretary shall
award the Kansas sheltered workshop a matching grant in the amount
determined by the secretary. The secretary may award subsequent
additional grants to the same Kansas sheltered workshop employer upon
satisfactory progress shown by such workshop employer pursuant to the
workshop employer's transition plan.
(c) Kansas sheltered workshop employers that receive a matching
grant shall provide such information to the secretary as requested,
excluding any information prohibited from disclosure under state or
federal law, regarding the use of grant funds, use of associated nonstate
funds and progress made toward achievement of the transition plan as
developed pursuant to subsection (b). Such information shall be utilized by
the secretary to analyze and monitor the use of grant funds and compliance
with and progress toward completion of the transition plan by workshop
employers and to develop best uses of grant funds and transition methods
to attain the goal of K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-5747 through 75-5749, and
amendments thereto.

HB 2082 314
(d) On or before January 31, 2025, and annually on or before January
31 thereafter, the secretary shall report to the house of representatives
standing committee on commerce, labor and economic development or its
successor committee and the senate standing committee on commerce or
its successor committee on the amount and uses of grant funding by each
Kansas sheltered workshop employer that has received a matching grant
and the progress made by each Kansas sheltered workshop employer
toward the goal of K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-5747 through 75-5749, and
amendments thereto.
(e) All expenditures from the Kansas sheltered workshop transition
fund shall be for the purpose described in subsection (a) and shall be made
in accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the
secretary of labor or the secretary's designee.
(f) On July 1, 2024, and each July 1 thereafter, or as soon thereafter
as moneys may be available, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $1,000,000 from the state economic development initiatives fund
established by K.S.A. 79-4804, and amendments thereto, to the Kansas
sheltered workshop transition fund, except that no moneys shall be
transferred pursuant to this section from the state economic development
initiatives fund to the Kansas sheltered workshop transition fund during
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
Sec. 165. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-775 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 76-775. (a) Subject to the other provisions of this act, on the first
day of the first state fiscal year commencing after receiving a certification
of receipt of a qualifying gift under K.S.A. 76-774, and amendments
thereto, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state
general fund the amount determined by the director of accounts and
reports to be the earnings equivalent award for such qualifying gift for the
period of time between the date of certification of the qualifying gift and
the first day of the ensuing state fiscal year to either: (1) The endowed
professorship account of the faculty of distinction matching fund of the
eligible educational institution, in the case of a certification of a qualifying
gift to an eligible educational institution that is a state educational
institution; or (2) the faculty of distinction program fund of the state board
of regents, in the case of a certification of a qualifying gift to an eligible
institution that is not a state educational institution. Subject to the other
provisions of this act, on each July 1 thereafter, the director of accounts
and reports shall make such transfer from the state general fund of the
earnings equivalent award for such qualifying gift for the period of the
preceding state fiscal year. All transfers made in accordance with the
provisions of this subsection shall be considered demand transfers from
the state general fund, except that all such transfers during the fiscal years

HB 2082 315
ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, shall be considered to be revenue transfers from the state general
fund.
(b) There is hereby established in the state treasury the faculty of
distinction program fund, which shall be administered by the state board of
regents. All moneys transferred under this section to the faculty of
distinction program fund of the state board of regents shall be paid to
eligible educational institutions that are not state educational institutions
for earnings equivalent awards for qualifying gifts to such eligible
educational institutions. The state board of regents shall pay from the
faculty of distinction program fund the amount of each such transfer to the
eligible educational institution for the earnings equivalent award for which
such transfer was made under this section.
(c) The earnings equivalent award for an endowed professorship shall
be determined by the director of accounts and reports and shall be the
amount of interest earnings that the amount of the qualifying gift certified
by the state board of regents would have earned at the average net earnings
rate of the pooled money investment board portfolio for the period for
which the determination is being made.
(d) The total amount of new qualifying gifts that may be certified to
the director of accounts and reports under this act during any state fiscal
year for all eligible educational institutions shall not exceed $30,000,000.
The total amount of new qualifying gifts that may be certified to the
director of accounts and reports under this act during any state fiscal year
for any individual eligible educational institution shall not exceed
$10,000,000. No additional qualifying gifts shall be certified by the state
board of regents under this act when the total of all transfers from the state
general fund for earnings equivalent awards for qualifying gifts pursuant
to this section, and amendments thereto, for a fiscal year is equal to or
greater than $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 2025 and in each fiscal year
thereafter.
Sec. 166. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,107 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 76-7,107. (a) (1) On July 1, 2008, or as soon thereafter as
sufficient moneys are available, $7,000,000 shall be transferred by the
director of accounts and reports from the state general fund to the
infrastructure maintenance fund established by K.S.A. 76-7,104, and
amendments thereto.
(2) No moneys shall be transferred by the director of accounts and
reports from the state general fund to the infrastructure maintenance fund
established by K.S.A. 76-7,104, and amendments thereto, during the fiscal
years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, and June
30, 2027, pursuant to this section.
(b) All transfers made in accordance with the provisions of this

HB 2082 316
section shall be considered to be demand transfers from the state general
fund.
(c) All moneys credited to the infrastructure maintenance fund shall
be expended or transferred only for the purpose of paying the cost of
projects approved by the state board pursuant to the state educational
institution long-term infrastructure maintenance program.
Sec. 167. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2989 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-2989. (a) For calendar years 2023 and 2024 and 2025, if a
county clerk has printing or postage costs pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp.
79-2988, and amendments thereto, the county clerk shall notify and
provide documentation of such costs to the secretary of revenue. The
secretary of revenue shall certify the amount of moneys attributable to
such costs and shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of
accounts and reports. Upon such receipt of such certification, the director
of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount of moneys equal to such
certified amount from the state general fund to the taxpayer notification
costs fund of the department of revenue. The secretary of revenue shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research and the director of the budget.
(b) There is hereby established in the state treasury the taxpayer
notification costs fund that shall be administered by the secretary of
revenue. All expenditures from the taxpayer notification costs fund shall
be for the purpose of paying county printing and postage costs pursuant to
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2988, and amendments thereto. All expenditures
from such fund shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts upon
warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the secretary of revenue or the secretary's designee.
Sec. 168. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3425i is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3425i. On January 15 and July 15 of each year, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer a sum equal to the total taxes collected
under the provisions of K.S.A. 79-6a04 and 79-6a10, and amendments
thereto, and annual commercial vehicle fees collected pursuant to K.S.A.
8-143m, and amendments thereto, and credited to the state general fund
during the six months next preceding the date of transfer, from the state
general fund to the special city and county highway fund, created by
K.S.A. 79-3425, and amendments thereto, except that: (1) Such transfers
are subject to reduction under K.S.A. 75-6704, and amendments thereto;
(2) no moneys shall be transferred from the state general fund to the
special city and county highway fund during state fiscal year 2024, state
fiscal year 2025 or, state fiscal year 2026 or state fiscal year 2027; and (3)
all transfers under this section shall be considered to be demand transfers
from the state general fund.
Sec. 169. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-34,171 is hereby amended to read as

HB 2082 317
follows: 79-34,171. (a) On January 1, 2009, and quarterly thereafter, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $400,000 from the state
general fund to the Kansas retail dealer incentive fund, except that no
moneys shall be transferred pursuant to this section from the state general
fund to the Kansas retail dealer incentive fund during the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, or June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027.
On and after July 1, 2009, the unobligated balance in the Kansas retail
dealer incentive fund shall not exceed $1.5 million. If the unobligated
balance of the fund exceeds $1.1 million at the time of a quarterly transfer,
the transfer shall be limited to the amount necessary for the fund to reach a
total of $1.5 million.
(b) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Kansas retail
dealer incentive fund. All moneys in the Kansas retail dealer incentive
fund shall be expended by the secretary of the department of revenue for
the payment of incentives to Kansas retail dealers who sell and dispense
renewable fuels or biodiesel through a motor fuel pump in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 79-34,170 through 79-34,175, and amendments
thereto.
(c) All moneys remaining in the Kansas retail dealer incentive fund
upon the expiration of K.S.A. 79-34,170 through 79-34,175, and
amendments thereto, shall be credited by the state treasurer to the state
general fund.
Sec. 170. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-955 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 82a-955. (a) On July 1, 2024, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $45,000,000 from the state general fund to the state water
plan fund and. On July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer $35,000,000 from the state general fund to the
state water plan fund. It is the intent of the legislature to provide for the
transfer of $35,000,000 from the state general fund to the state water plan
fund on July 1, 2026, and July 1, 2027.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph paragraphs (2) and (3), the
state water plan fund shall continue to be appropriated and expended for
the purposes prescribed in K.S.A. 82a-951, and amendments thereto,
except that if an appropriation is made for any fiscal year as intended in
subsection (a), on July 1 of such fiscal year, or as soon thereafter on such
dates as moneys are available:
(A) $5,000,000 shall be transferred from the state water plan fund to
the water technical assistance fund established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-
956, and amendments thereto; and
(B) $12,000,000 shall be transferred from the state water plan fund to
the water projects grant fund established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-957,
and amendments thereto.
(2) On July 1, 2024, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer

HB 2082 318
$7,500,000 from the state water plan fund to the water technical assistance
fund and $19,500,000 from the state water plan fund to the water projects
grant fund.
(3) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $7,000,000 from the state water plan fund to the water technical
assistance fund and $19,000,000 from the state water plan fund to the
water projects grant fund.
(4) The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2028. On
July 1, 2028, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer all moneys
in the water technical assistance fund and the water projects grant fund to
the state water plan fund and all liabilities of the water technical assistance
fund and the water projects grant fund shall be imposed upon the state
water plan fund. On July 1, 2028, the water technical assistance fund and
the water projects grant fund shall be abolished.
(c) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any restrictions in K.S.A. 82a-951, and
amendments thereto, the Kansas water authority may recommend to the
legislature the appropriation of up to 10% of the unencumbered balance of
the state water plan fund to be used to supplement salaries of existing state
agency full-time equivalent employees and for funding new full-time
equivalent positions created to implement the state water plan. Moneys
from such appropriation may be used to supplement existing positions, but
such moneys shall not be used to replace state general fund moneys, any
fee fund moneys or other funding for positions existing on July 1, 2023.
(B) Eligible full-time equivalent positions that moneys may be used
for pursuant to this paragraph include engineers, geologists, hydrologists,
environmental scientists, attorneys, resource planners, grant specialists and
any other similar positions.
(2) If at least two conservation districts present a joint proposal to the
Kansas water authority for a position or positions to provide shared
services to all districts involved in such proposal, the Kansas water
authority may recommend that moneys be used to supplement the salary or
salaries of such position or positions pursuant to paragraph (1).
(3) The Kansas water authority shall encourage funding requests from
state and local entities that cooperate with qualified nonprofit entities on
projects that provide a direct benefit to water quantity and quality,
including water infrastructures that are both natural and constructed, and
include matching funds from non-state sources.
(4) The Kansas water authority may direct the Kansas water office to
provide funding pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-956 or 82a-957, and
amendments thereto, for the improvement of water infrastructure in an
unincorporated area related to or serving a national park site or state
historic site if the request for funding is made by a nonprofit organization
or state agency that is willing to administer the moneys and oversee the

HB 2082 319
project, and the Kansas water authority deems such applicant capable of
successfully managing the project. Upon receipt of such a request, the
Kansas water office may award moneys in any fiscal year prior to July 1,
2028, with such awarding of moneys to be made at the discretion of the
Kansas water office.
(5) The Kansas water authority shall encourage the creation of grant
programs for stockwatering conservation projects. Such grant programs
shall prioritize the use of fees collected pursuant to K.S.A. 82a-954(a)(3),
and amendments thereto.
(d) All reporting requirements established in K.S.A. 82a-951, and
amendments thereto, shall continue and such reporting requirements shall
apply to the water technical assistance fund established in K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 82a-956, and amendments thereto, and the water projects grant fund
established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-957, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 171. If any fund or account name described by words and the
numerical accounting code that follows such fund or account name do not
match, it shall be conclusively presumed that the legislature intended that
the fund or account name described by words is the correct fund or
account name, and such fund or account name described by words shall
control over a contradictory or incorrect numerical accounting code.
Sec. 172. Severability. If any provision or clause of this act or
application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this
end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
Sec. 173. Appeals to exceed expenditure limitations. (a) Upon written
application to the governor and approval of the state finance council,
expenditures from special revenue funds may exceed the amounts
specified in this act.
(b) This section shall not apply to the expanded lottery act revenues
fund, the state economic development initiatives fund, the children's
initiative fund, the state water plan fund or the Kansas endowment for
youth fund, or to any account of any such funds.
Sec. 174. Savings. (a) Any unencumbered balance as of June 30,
2025, in any special revenue fund, or account thereof, of any state agency
named in this act that is not otherwise specifically appropriated or limited
for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature is hereby appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, for the same use and purpose as the same was
heretofore appropriated.
(b) This section shall not apply to the expanded lottery act revenues
fund, the state economic development initiatives fund, the children's
initiatives fund, the state water plan fund, the Kansas endowment for youth

HB 2082 320
fund, the Kansas educational building fund, the state institutions building
fund or the correctional institutions building fund, or to any account of any
of such funds.
Sec. 175. During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all moneys
that are lawfully credited to and available in any bond special revenue
fund and that are not otherwise specifically appropriated or limited by this
or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature are
hereby appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state
agency for which the bond special revenue fund was established for the
purposes authorized by law for expenditures from such bond special
revenue fund. As used in this section, "bond special revenue fund" means
any special revenue fund or account thereof established in the state
treasury prior to or on or after the effective date of this act for the deposit
of the proceeds of bonds issued by the Kansas development finance
authority for the payment of debt service for bonds issued by the Kansas
development finance authority or for any related purpose in accordance
with applicable bond covenants.
Sec. 176. Federal grants. (a) During the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, each federal grant or other federal receipt that is received by a state
agency named in this act and that is not otherwise appropriated to that state
agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature is hereby appropriated for fiscal year
2026 for that state agency for the purpose set forth in such federal grant or
receipt, except that no expenditure shall be made from and no obligation
shall be incurred against any such federal grant or other federal receipt that
has not been previously appropriated or reappropriated or approved for
expenditure by the governor until the governor has authorized the state
agency to make expenditures therefrom.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by any state agency that is named in this act and that is not otherwise
authorized by law to apply for and receive federal grants, expenditures
may be made by such state agency from moneys appropriated for fiscal
year 2026 by this act or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature to apply for and receive federal grants during
fiscal year 2026, which federal grants are hereby authorized to be applied
for and received by such state agencies: Provided, That no expenditure
shall be made from and no obligation shall be incurred against any such
federal grant or other federal receipt that has not been previously
appropriated or reappropriated or approved for expenditure by the
governor until the governor has authorized the state agency to make
expenditures therefrom.
Sec. 177. (a) Any correctional institutions building fund appropriation
heretofore appropriated to any state agency named in this or other

HB 2082 321
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature and having
an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of $100 is hereby
reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the same uses
and purposes as originally appropriated, unless specific provision is made
for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This section shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any
account of the correctional institutions building fund that was encumbered
for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 178. (a) Any Kansas educational building fund appropriation
heretofore appropriated to any institution named in this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature and having
an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of $100 is hereby
reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the same use
and purpose as originally appropriated, unless specific provision is made
for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This section shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any
account of the Kansas educational building fund that was encumbered for
any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 179. (a) Any state institutions building fund appropriation
heretofore appropriated to any state agency named in this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature and having
an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of $100 is hereby
reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the same use
and purpose as originally appropriated, unless specific provision is made
for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This section shall not apply to the unencumbered balance in any
account of the state institutions building fund that was encumbered for any
fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 180. Any transfers of moneys during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, from any special revenue fund of any state agency named in this
act to the audit services fund of the division of post audit under K.S.A. 46-
1121, and amendments thereto, shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on any such fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026.
Sec. 181. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 2-223, 12-1775a, 12-5256, 65-180, 74-
50,107, 74-99b34, 75-5748, 76-775, 76-7,107, 79-2989, 79-3425i, 79-
34,171 and 82a-955 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 182. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.